I said for the most part.MIB2 sucked balls.I only recognized the GOT one, but I figured if THAT was actually happened, then the others probably did too.I actually had to clarify that they meant *teabagging* teabagging and not some other meaning of teabagging.Oh, I hadn't even considered that. That could be a possibility, but it still says hand-to-genital touching. Heh, I was the one who made that obligatory backstory post like 4 days ago on a different thread.Eh, my post was pretty vague aside from the zombie swarm thing.I have literally never once in my life heard anyone use a trigger warning, or complain about someone else not using a trigger warning. I do see, every fucking day, guys on Reddit mocking those people.&gt; Honestly, you should know better than to take the headline at face value.

TOO LATE. This thread is filled with guys masturbating over how men are just naturally stronger than women.Men In Black: [92% approval on Rottentomatoes.](http://www.rottentomatoes.com/m/men_in_black/)

Men In Black II: [39% on RT](http://www.rottentomatoes.com/m/men_in_black_ii/)

Men in Black III: [69% on RT](http://www.rottentomatoes.com/m/men_in_black_iii/)

MIB2 sucked balls
There isn't, but I couldn't be sure since she was talking about middle school students.Seriously, fuck these people. There are literally millions of dogs that need adopting in American right, and these fuckers not only didn't adopt one of them, they also spent $100k on cloning their last dog. Imagine all the good that $100k could have done for shelter dogs.It's Waffle House's property, and they have the right to ban guns on it. This is a non-issue regardless of the specific circumstances, and it's EVEN MORE a non-issue based on this statement. Really, they can't just be looking shit up for no good reason.Then next time say, "I enjoyed MIB2" instead of "It didn't suck balls." It sucked balls, you just happened to like the way that movie sucked yours.Newsflash: Schools have dress codes that parents and children must abide by if they want to attend that school. My high school, waaaaaaay back in the late 80s/early 90s also forbade spaghetti straps. We fucking got over it because while we may HAVE pussies, we're NOT pussies.Well, I could argue that euthanizing one dog is less bad than letting thousands of dogs be euthanized because you spent $100k cloning your dog twice. But yeah, I get what you're saying.My point is that these people are so selfish, theyd' rather spend $100k cloning their dog twice than spend $100k on helping out shelter dogs, or even just spending a couple hundred on adopting two new dogs from a shelter.Is there something that inherently grants you permission to carry your weapon onto someone else's property? Because I'm pretty sure that if I invite you into my house but tell you to leave your gun outside, you can't legally come inside with your gun.It doesn't matter so long as Harry's eyes were the same color as Lily's. Even JK Rowling said that.Okay, cool. :)My favorite uncle committed suicide on my husband's birthday. 

That same uncle's birthday was September 11, so it got ruined by 19 dicks crashing planes. (That's not why he committed suicide.)My husband has a high school diploma, and I'm currently working on my second bachelor's degree with plans to get a PhD later. It hasn't affected us at all. He's actually really smart, he just didn't want to go to college. He's successful and makes more money than I ever have.That's because you're not old enough yet to realize your parents aren't/weren't right about everything. The hardest thing about growing up is realizing your parents are flawed. And I don't mean in the small ways, I mean in huge, life-changing ways.That moment when you realize your parents just faked it throughout your childhood and they really had no clue what they were doing. And that they're flawed people, as flawed as you. (General you, not YOU you.)Just the kid. The adult has the same colored eyes.I got laid off in the Great Recession and we moved to Seattle from DC for my husband's new job. He'd gotten laid off six months earlier, and that's when we found out I was to be laid off as well, so we decided to move. And then, because I had no contacts, I found it impossible to land a job. Employers were being dicks and filtering out anyone who was already unemployed. I couldn't even get a shitty retail job because I was way overqualified (I'd been a data analyst). So I went back to school to get a nursing degree. I'm right now doing the last few prereqs before I apply for UW's accelerated BSN program. 

So yeah, life handed me lemons.So your sister's stepdad kidnapped her? That sounds... rapey. :(

But I'm glad you found her finally!Sounds like you caught a good one. :) A True life partner and not someone you compete with. Well OF COURSE they do, they're just really really not supposed to. A couple years ago there was a big flap about the CIA spying on Congress.My high school excelled in every sport except football. But because we sucked at *football* we were mocked by everyone in our district. Forget the wall of Metro and CIF championship banners hanging in our gym. Because we sucked at football, we were a shit school. Yeah, but if you're flat broke, even dirt cheap is too much. Especially when you've got more than one kid. I played AYSO soccer and LL Baseball (and then Bobby Sox Softball, 'cause I'm a girl), but once I got into middle school, everyone was playing on traveling teams. My parents didn't have that kind of money, so my performance dwindled. I went from being in the top 10% of my league every year in both sports to JV in 9th grade, because my parents just couldn't afford the coaching the other girls got. I guess that's kind of how education works, too. Rich kids get more tutoring and therefore outperform the poor kids.That's actually a viable path for white people, as well.&gt; 2) Get cat

Get one anyway. They're not that expensive, and they're awesome pets. I woke up this morning to my little guy sleeping on my chest. :)Cool! :D&gt; Political correctness is really slowly killing the world.

Oh, please. It's really not.You're not wrong. [It looks like women are better chopper pilots than men are.](http://time.com/8404/army-women-helicopter-pilots/) And that seems to hold up for [civilian airline pilots in the UK](http://www.independent.co.uk/news/women-pilots-are-safer-than-men-1591809.html), as well.  Finally, there's no reason women can't be as good as men at sniping.If the bakery didn't want to get sued, maybe it shouldn't have illegally discriminated against the gay couple and then doxxed them.You need to read up on the history of treatment of blacks in America, particularly in the South.It's not all of Congress, just the GOP. [They filibustered and killed a different first responder health care bill back in 2010.](http://thehill.com/policy/healthcare/132907-health-bill-for-911-workers-fails-key-vote)No PP clinic sells fetal tissue, because it's illegal. They just charge for the cost of prep and shipping. With the higher value's end point lower on the Y axis than the lower value's end point.The wealth gap in our nation is the highest it's been since the Gilded Age.

University education is so expensive that it's literally retarding the financial success of graduates.

Middle class jobs are declining while low-wage jobs are increasing. 

Our national parks need over $11 billion in repairs and maintenance because they've been ignored by Congress for the last decade.

And let's not forget the shitty state of our infrastructure. We need to dump trillions into it in the next couple of decades to make up for shit we've ignored for multiple decades.

And let's not forget our ultra-expensive health care system. The ACA helped, but it's like putting a band-aide on a gunshot wound.



They should have called that the cube deal. &gt; not even on the JV-Varisty swing team

Heh, I *was* on the JV-Varsity swing team. Got called up for half of one season when Varsity had 2 broken bones and a severe ear infection. My parents just couldn't afford to pay for the coaching the other kids got in middle school. My brother was going to college then, and that's where all their money went. At least the Democrats are just greedy, corrupt, and pro-big business. They do throw us plebs a bone from time to time, and they tend to lube us up if they decide to fuck us.This may be the best-made movie of all time (OF ALL TIME) but I'm never, ever going to watch it. I have problems just playing video games that depict heights.The nudity in ST both made sense, though. The shower scene explained A LOT about that society, and the scene between Rico and Diz was character growth for them (and hey, also Radcek). I really don't mind sex scenes/nudity so long as they actually contribute to the film or show. 

Meanwhile, half the bullshit on HBO (and an even greater percentage in films in general) is just softcore porn and serves no purpose other than to titilate and shock. There was no need for us to see Littlefinger wipe the cum of the whore's mouth (and it's also unrealistic that she'd have left cum on her face in the the first place), and there was no reason we needed to see Attia judge a slave based on the size of his ginormous dick, and there was no reason for us to be subjected to that awkward sex scene between Neo and Trinity in Matrix 2.Why are you downvoted??? Have an upvote.I would LOVE a poster of [this](http://img08.deviantart.net/9246/i/2014/048/e/c/edge_of_tomorrow___rita_vrataski_by_phelandavion-d76vfat.jpg), but apparently they're not a thing. There's a pretty good deviantart version of it, but I want the actual image from the movie.Honestly, for me and my husband, if we like a movie enough to watch anything more than the blooper real, we like the movie enough to buy it anyway. I feel like the point of Cast Away wasn't whether or not he'd live, but HOW he lived. 

Also, the music in the Cast Away trailer is from the Braveheart soundtrack.It's not 12 that sucks, it's everything else. The stories suck and the companion sucks. &gt; But then I realized what made it hard to really remember 10 fondly: the sadness. First Rose, then Donna, then his depression fueled failed attempt to change a fixed point in time. When he's about to regenerate and he's saying he's not ready to leave, it's just ferociously heart wrenching when you realize how much sadness he's clinging to.

That's why I love him, though. He's the most human, the easiest to identify with. But still just enough alien enough to be interesting. David Tennant has amazing chemistry with Catherine Tate, and that's why Donna's season is my favorite. It's just *fun* to watch them play off each other. I used to manage repo vendors for a large bank. One of our vendors was an old guy who loved to golf. He'd visit companies all over the country and then spend a day or two each place to golf.Andre Agassi hated tennis. :(You know how sometimes someone fucks you over, and you stop talking to them for a while, and then one day they just pop into your life like nothing happened? My husband calls that "forgetness," meaning the other person is hoping so much time has elapsed that you'll forget what happened and the relationship will return to how it was before.My uncle committed suicide a few years ago. It was and still is devastating. At his funeral, the pastor didn't say, "It was God's plan" because that makes God seem like a dick. He said that God gave us free will, and suicide is an exercise of that free will. That doesn't meant it's what God wanted. 

That being said, I'm am atheist so that didn't comfort me except to make me feel like my religious family members had been comforted by the sermon.Yeah, that's a pretty fucked up thing to say. And it's not at all like, "If you can't be my friend when my life is shit, then you don't deserve to be my friend when life is great."A lot of schools cost that much. But unless it's Harvard or Yale, it's stupid to pay that much for a degree. The UK used to do that, and it pigeonholed kids into one path or the other at a young age. It didn't work out so well.Not to mention self discipline and how to deal with other people.Except for my brother, who just has opportunities fall into his lap. Even he acknowledges that he's had every door opened for him while I've had to open all my own doors.-Abraham LincolnI still have a Thomas Bros Guide for both San Diego and Seattle.San Diego is pretty well gridded out. It's not perfect because of the coast and the hills and canyons we have, but it's pretty darn close. Seattle is total fuckery, though.We have to do the same thing in Seattle, but because the street names change so often. We just use landmarks because we can't remember what the road is named at that intersection. My older brother can't read a map to save his life. When we were kids, our family did a long driving vacation throughout the southwest. At first, my dad tried to have my brother navigate, but he was shit at it. I was 4 years younger, and actually good at it, so my dad actually got in the habit of calling me his navigator. He even called me that when I was an adult. I grew up in my brother's shadow, so it was really cool to be good at something he sucked at.I grew up in CA, and CalTrans typically has signs that say, "National City next 3 exits" or "La Mesa next 2 exits" or even "El Cajon 5 miles" ([example](https://c1.staticflickr.com/5/4029/4331474723_0ca631ff9b_b.jpg)) so you know generally where you are at any given time. It also has 3 or 4 of the upcoming exits listed on the same sign so you know how far away everything is, from several miles off. ([example](https://farm3.staticflickr.com/2796/4286715649_71d998438c_b.jpg)) 

And that being said, [this sign](https://s-media-cache-ak0.pinimg.com/736x/e8/f9/63/e8f963901aaf5f9295a64d968591ff77.jpg) use to exist.

Washington doesn't do that. I have no idea how far away I am from any given exit until it's the very next exit, and it annoys the shit out of me. I'm using to knowing miles in advance, and now I have to be prepared to just get off in 3/4 mile at any given moment in time.40-year-old college student. Can confirm.I think commerce in general is just amazing now. I can check the internet on my phone while standing in Fry's for a comparison price of something I want to buy, and then just go ahead and order that thing from Amazon and get it in 2 days. No more driving around the fucking city hoping the next store will have that hot album or NES game I want. Remember when X-Files moved to Sunday? Fuck!Or you'd call the radio station and try to remember the tune and that snippet of the chorus and hoping they'd understand what you meant.HELLO and welcome to MOVIE PHONE brought to you by KSON!Or you could call the hotline and hope you didn't get a busy signal.I've got a history degree. Yep.On the other hand, I game online with family in Hawaii, MD, and VA, while living in Seattle. I think modern gaming is fucking awesome. This wasn't possible in the pre-internet era.Seriously, who's surprised that a shit series became a shit show?[This is one of my favorite memes of all time](https://s-media-cache-ak0.pinimg.com/736x/7d/4d/f7/7d4df7d19cc564ec7e80febdb97aba02.jpg). OF ALL TIME!My husband and I were *very* disappointed that we got to see how they met, but not see how their relationship grew, particularly after watching 9 years of Ted's relationships grow and then eventually fail. I feel like we should have been allowed to learn about the mother (I don't even remember her name!) like we'd learned about Robin and Stella and Victoria and Zoey. But it's his actual wife and the mother of his kids that we don't get to learn anything about. :(&gt; And the entire last season was a joke, **especially the finale.** 

Sherlock Holmes faked his own death in the books, though. This whole show is a modern retelling of Sherlock Holmes.

He doesn't Coral. He very clearly says Carl. Maybe Carrl. Definitely not Coral.S3 was the worst of the lot. S2 actually holds up well to repeat viewings, because you know what's going to happen and you can't help but root for Lori because she's so very right about Shane. But 3 is awful, aside from the prison stuff. 4 is really good, and 5 was fucking fantastic.You do realize that TWD isn't about the zombies, right? It's about the people, the actual walking dead.I was fairly bored with the first season, but so far season 2 has been amazing! The guy playing Penguin is great, and so is the guy playing future-joker.&gt; the first season was non-stop action. 

That's really not True. We go whole episodes with no zombies. And when the camp is overrun, there's like 8 zombies. Nowadays we have whole fucking herds.&gt; NOT ENOUGH ZOMBIES!

TWD isn't a gore show, it's a character drama. It's not about the zombies it's about the people. "The walking dead" doesn't refer to the zombies, it refers to the survivors.&gt; I think one of the themes of the show is that zombies aren't always the thing you need to worried about in this world.

That is the MAIN theme of the show.The only time a small number of zombies killed people is 1. early on when folks didn't know how to deal with them; and 2. when people are incapacitated like asleep in the prison. At this point, unless it's a dozen, it's no big deal.There IS no explanation for the zombies. Not even in the comics. Because the characters never learn the cause, and the comics/show aren't even about the zombies.&gt; Omg, Carl likes this new girl but his dad doesn't approve.

What??? That his literally *never* happened in the entire history of the show.It's pretty realistic, actually. Most people would only survive by luck, just long enough to figure out how the new world works.Especially when Yvette Nicole Brown is on! That woman takes notes like there's going to be an exam!&gt; Honestly, I think this is the biggest show on TV right now that NEEDS to end. I'm just burned out on it.

So just stop watching it, dick. You don't have to ruin our good time just because you're bored of it.Ditto for Community.We just ran through S1 again for like the fourth time. The differences in the characters is amazing! Rick literally apologizing to a walker, "I'm sorry that this happened to you" and then wasting a bullet on a walker with no legs. The character development in this show is *fucking amazing.* And yet people in this thread are complaining that it's boring and there aren't enough zombies. They're watching the wrong show.Yep, that's it. It's neat, but I want the real thing.The problem, in a nut shell, is that a child's future was seriously impacted by how well they performed on one test given to them when they were 11 or 12 years old. Here's the wikipedia article on the [tripartite system](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Tripartite_system_of_education_in_England,_Wales_and_Northern_Ireland). I like that other one because it's reminiscent of propaganda posters used in WWII.Based on his comment history, I bet you're right.Yeah, that's a great idea! It was gross for gross's sake.Yeah, god forbid the show spend an entire episode on the death of a very popular character! Also, that's not what anecdotal means.Yes, I realize that. But the focus of the show isn't the zombies, or even killing zombies. It's about mankind's survival, and how living in that world changes people.&gt; There's a luck factor, but nobody is that lucky. 

Sure they are. How many men march off to war and come home? Millions.I actually am, a bit.13 is very, very different from 7.Who's the pedo?The Duggars knew what their son did and did nothing about it.&gt; Roger Stone (former Trump advisor) 

Ooooh, I bet that's unbiased and no way meant to fuck up Hilary's campaign.Is this any different than Bill Clinton playing the sax on MTV?I don't want my brother to "get his", I just want to not have to work so fucking hard in order to succeed. The recession has really fucked me.And yet the vast majority of soldier ON the front lines still come home.Am I missing a joke? Everyone seems outraged, and I just see picture of Moe from Simpsons.I have a sense of humor. This wasn't intended to be funny, it was supposed to be gross and controversial."And I'm a giant fuckface and didn't tell the authorities."And? It's not like they're humping in heavy machinery.Yeah, that was my point.You know women go backpacking wearing 70-pound kits, right? There's no reason to think a female soldier wouldn't be able to do that.Coincidentally, my husband missed an exit today off the 5.&gt; Excellent username by the way.

Thanks!!If you're burnt out on it, stop watching. Millions of us aren't, though.I'm not into tats, but I hear you! I keep forgetting about those! CA didn't have those until a few years ago, and they don't even make sense anyway because they don't have exits that evenly spaced.Courage, yes. Principles? Dunno.He apparently bought Nazi memorabilia, so he's probably a skinhead. So, neither liberal nor conservative, just all asshole.That's apparently not True, based on what someone else said in this thread.Good. I actively plan ahead so I don't have to go shopping on holidays.Suicide is an act of impulse. [90% of people who survive a suicide attempt never actually commit suicide.](http://www.hsph.harvard.edu/means-matter/means-matter/survival/) Guns make suicide attempts very successful, so those people never have the opportunity to unmake their decision.&gt; Suicide is victimless  

Know how I know you've never lost someone to suicide?[90% of people who fail at committing suicide never end up committing suicide.](http://www.hsph.harvard.edu/means-matter/means-matter/survival/) So while I agree with bodily autonomy, I think we should require people to undergo counseling for years before we allow them to commit suicide.SDSU PARTY SCHOOL!!!Yeah, I should clarify that I was talking about the exit numbers, not the post mile markers.I hadn't thought of that, and yes, it makes total sense.Exactly!What an obnoxious statement. That seems like a pretty dark corner to me.No, religion shouldn't be injecting itself into our government. I can't see WotC being cool enough to make Vin's RPG, but Monte Cook or Paizo would be. Or even Green Ronin, who does the Game of Thrones RPG.I think you had a dream, because That 60s Show was never a thing.It's amazing how much more the male actors make than the female actors.But those places you can't get to a through a Google search, and this jackass would never have found those places. So 4chan is the darkest place on the net any normal person can reasonably get to.My husband and I are gamers, so we get lots of games for Christmas, birthdays, and anniversaries. It's kind of the best relived-childhood ever.My extended family is at the point where we alternate weddings and funerals. 2008 grandpa died, later 2008 I got married. 2010 my dad died, 2011 my cousin got married. 2013 my cousin's dad died, 2014 my other cousin got married. Fortunately, my asshole uncle just died like a month ago, and they didn't even tell us because my dad has been dead for 5 years, so there was no longer a connection between the halves of the family. My uncle fucked over my dad financially, so none of us gives a shit he died. So that means I get to skip this funeral and jump right to the next wedding! Yeah, I briefly entertained the idea of joining the Navy a few years ago when the recession happened. Too old.Or that you can't eat some things or it'll give you heartburn. Or that you can't NOT eat certain things or you won't shit for 4 days. Or that you can't eat something because it invariably gives you the shits, or makes you really gassy. I just sang the exact line you're thinking of yesterday in a conversation with my boss about how the fuck did it get to be 2015 already??? 2015 is the future!The 2000s were amazig for technological advances. Broadband internet meant streaming movies and youtube and shit like that. Playing MMOs with friends across the country. The advent of the smart phone. Flash drives still amaze me, especially when I see 1 GB flash drives in the $5 bin at Office Depot.The other day, an article referred to the turn of the century. It wasn't the turn of the century that I was thinking of, and wow, did I feel old.God dammit! The turn of the century doesn't refer to the 21st Century!! *shakes elderly fist*In 10 years, you're going to think about this post and laugh at how naive current-you is. Seniors in college are young enough to be my legitimate child. As in, not accidentally pregnant in high school child.

Edit: Did the math wrong. People who graduated college this year are young enough to be my child.ITT young people who feel old because they're not in high school anymore. For the most part, anywa. 

How's this, Reddit? My brother has 2 grandkids and another on the way, and my sister-in-law also has 3 grandkids. The first cat I got as a young adult died 4 years ago. A cousin of mine died from a heart attack 5 years ago. One of the kids I grew up with died from cancer 8 years, and another just up and died in her sleep last week. My father and my father-in-law both died in 2010. He's worsened the obesity epidemic!Your family is adorable!Just eat more veggies, or try Raisin Bran cereal or Shredded Wheat. He has no experience in game design, though.The first flash drive I ever got was 4mb, but I can't remember how much it cost.Just because he likes playing RPGs, that doesn't mean he wants to create an RPG studio. How is it not related? The guy was talking about how now he thinks clothes are cool, and I was saying that we still like getting "toys" for gifts.Huh, I didn't know that!The explanation is completely irrelevant, though. Why would you be mad that the writer isn't interested in explaining something that is completely irrelevant to the story? Are you disappointed that JK Rowling never explained why Harry Potter doesn't have any grandparents, or why muggle-born Hermione has magical abilities?Nope, the article I read was referring to 2001. (Centuries start in -01; there is no year 0, there's just a year 1.)NNOOOOOOOO because my mom is the matriarch of the family! :(And my point is that that's apparently changing.One of the original TSR artists goes by the nickname [Diesel](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/David_S._LaForce). I have some of his [sculpts](http://shadowcastings.samsbiz.com/), and they're pretty freaking awesome! He's also a genuinely nice guy. I fucking love Amazon because they really do take care of their customers. Plus, I live in Seattle so I am actually helping out the local economy when I buy shit from them! *You're welcome, John!*I mean, that's pretty much exactly what happens to Archer when he tries to make Babou his best friend.Yeah, I didn't know he already had a video game studio when I wrote that.Well, we better hurry up with that space travel, dammit! Every moment we waste we just make the journey that much longer!Fucking sig figs, am I right??*makes Robert Deniro face* I would drink that.A friend of mine got in the habit of setting an alarm at 2am so he could get his son up to piss. He'd carry his kid to the bathroom, stand him up, pull down his pants, say, "Alex, pee." then pull up his pants and carry him back to bed. Alex basically slept through all of it.&gt; Things go wrong with genes and biology ALL THE TIME 

I'm honestly amazed things go right as frequently as they do.&gt; a number of kids see it as a fashion trend and give up on it in 6 months

Citation fucking neededReally? That's your take-away from my post?It was, but the article I read explicitly said "turn of the century" meaning the transition to the 21st Century.FYI, Alexandria ends up being a more or less permanent location for them.I think Matt Damon is really good actor. I feel like that's a minority opinion, for some reason. Like, he don't get no respect.Are you anti-marriage or something? Why is it so weird for someone to mention their best friend in an anecdote?A million different individual minuscule fuck ups could lead to non-viability for a fetus. It blows my mind!Jello is a great low-cal (and low-carb) dessert if you eat animal products.That's not a citation.So Kim Davis and her husband are bearing False witness. &gt; Just seemed like you wanted to mention you had a **partner**

You used the word "partner" in reference to my husband. Are you a little homophobic and looking for a reason to be outraged?&gt; small, Midwestern town

Key phrase thereThat was by multiple attackers who were separatist rebels. Not even close to the same situation as a single shooter.Suicide is an impulse action. 90% of people who unsuccessfully attempt suicide never actually end up committing suicide. Guns make suicide attempts significantly more successful. Take away the tool that enables suicide and you reduce the suicide rate.Same with the Aurora shooter, and Sandy Hook.Why is a terrorist intentionally flying a plane into a building worse than a good-guy pilot crashing his plane into a building? Intent.You would have a point if thousands of Americans on American soil were murdered in acts of terrorism perpetrated by American Muslims. 9/11 was 14 years ago. The Middle East is fucked regardless of which religion they worship. But the Muslims in America are peaceful, law-abiding citizens.No one thing will solve this problem completely. But the answer to that riddle isn't, "Then let's just do nothing!"No, see, nothing will work. Really, just trust them. They have nothing to gain by lying.Why would my husband not be my best friend?&gt; Life is almost unbearable.

I'm sorry. I wish I could help. :(My dickhead neighbors let their dog run around outside without a leash. He was hit by a car last week. I fell bad for the dog, but I don't have a single ounce of empathy for his owners. Edit: Heard a bit of a ruckus outside and these exact same people are outside with the exact same dog, still not on a leash, shitting on the sidewalk.I'm sure he's right because Hollywood is notorious for that shit. But I still blame him for The Last Airbender.You're still comparing apples to oranges.And yet guns make it much easier for them to do so, which is why they tend to use guns. That doesn't change the fact that suicide is an impulse action, and guns make that impulse very effective. So yes, guns WOULD make a difference.What the fuck is wrong with you? No.&gt; but I think he'd be ostracized in sports and society.

You think so? Isn't it pretty much common knowledge that unless a video gets out, those guys just get away with it so long as they keep winning?I can't even do one beer these days. Instant heartburn. Which means I stick with vodka.She's not Catholic, though.That's great! Don't be afraid to see a new doc if things don't seem to be improving. And new doctors actually know more than old doctors because scientific advancements.&gt;He hasn\u2019t had the flu in over two years.

Influenza is cased by a virus, you stupid fucks, not a bacteria. It's a coincidence, nothing more. &gt; If America takes in 100k refugee

American already takes in 75k refugees each year. We're just upping that figure by 25k over 2 years. Unbunch your panties.And I have another friend who used work on White House grounds doing tours during the Clinton administration. She got to meet Hilary multiple times and said she was really nice. &gt; Abrams nailed it IMO.

Are you into Trek? Because IMO they're not very good Trek movies. More, Space Action Movies.&gt;  You want to do animal testing on them as well so that you totally undermine all the ideals that are supposed to exist in the 23rd century as set out by Gene Roddenberry?

It's sort of like how Man of Steel had Supes destroying whole parts of a massive city, and then he kills Zod. Many fans feel those actions are very outside the normal for Superman, even contrary to his personality and morals. I happen to be one of them, and I agree with you about the ST reboot, as well. I have so many problems with ST '09. So many things just don't make any sense, or are obviously contrived to make an action moment. Like how Scotty transports into the water system in the engine room. And the pipes are clear, so you can see where her's flowing around. And you can see the big fan that moving the water, and he's going to get chopped up by the blade OMG!!!!!!

*barfs* 

Or how the giant space spider decided to chase Kirk on the ice planet (how does an ice spider stay warm on a subzero planet like that????) instead of eating the space polar bear it had just killed? It makes no sense. It'd be like a lion killing a gazelle and then leaving its kill to chase a mouse. WTF????

And that's not even touching on how it totally doesn't have the feel of any Star Trek movie at all, and how the characters act out of character, like Spock dumping Kirk off on that ice planet. Spock never, ever, ever, ever would have done anything even remotely similar to that. Ever.BMI is a pretty bullshit metric, though. It's not science. I would say being disabled or elderly and trying to climb Everest is taking an unnecessary risk.I'm not sure what your point is.I know someone named Tinley. I always thought it was a great name. And apparently Terry Brooks (Shannara author) has told my friend in the past that he wanted to use her name in one of his books. I don't think he ever did though.But the other ST movies still feel like ST...Reddit has a rage hard-on for Hillary. I'm not sure why. She's just like every other politician out there.That's absolutely it. SHe was already psychologically fragile, and then she lost Joff (and she thinks it was Tyrion who did it), and her brother is a very different person now than he was one year before, and then Tyrion kills her father, too. It's just too much for her mind to hand and remain intact.He is apparently conflating illegal immigrant with legal refugee, which is really dumb of him, actually.Why is it not Star-Treky? Because the characters behave out of character. Spock gets emotional several times through ST, including kicking Kirk off his ship into who knows what kind of conditions not actually near any sort of civilization on a frozen planet. Seriously, the Enterprise has a brig. That would have worked just fine... Except Kirk had to meet Future Spock who'd tell him, "Hey, we become best friends! So totally don't worry about that totally dick then I just did!" Moving on, Scotty is unfunny comic relief, who saves the team not because he actually had a brilliant idea, but because Future Spock gave him the answer years ahead of schedule. Kirk is a just a dick, plain and simple. Shatner's Kirk was cocky, sure, but never unlikable. 

And then let's get to the shitty, shitty pseudo-science. The giant space spider that abandoned it kill (the space polar bear) to attack Kirk. Made no sense whatsoever. Scotty getting transported into the pipes was completely stupid, and only done to provide 20 seconds of action. It was totally irrelevant to the rest of the film. Dumb. Then, the drill + red matter. They have this bullshit substance called red matter that can create a singularity. No, fuck that, that's stupid as all get-out. Why the fuck doesn't Spock's ship collapse into a black hole with a fucking liter of the shit inside it???? Then the bad guy has to drill into the center of Earth to deploy the red matter? WTF? No, it creates a singularity. You can just drop it on the surface and it'll still destroy the planet and everyone on it. And why the fuck didn't the citizens of Earth freak out about the giant drill?? They just let it do its thing. And then that supernova that destroyed Romulus. Supernovas take millennia to occur. There was NO FUCKING REASON for people to still be on that planet, not with the technology they have. Fucking. Stupid. And instead of Nero realizing he's back in time and deciding to *save his entire species and planet* he instead wastes 25 years hunting down Spock. Fucking. Stupid. 

It wasn't a good movie. It was bad movie, and it was a *really* bad Star Trek movie.&gt; At the same time, though, she was raised to worship a very bad person for his evil deeds, which she was told over and over again were both wise and done for her benefit. I do think that fucked up her sense of right and wrong pretty dramatically, even before Joff's death.

That's what I meant when I said she was already psychologically fragile. All of Tywin's kids are fucked in the head, and it's pretty much all his fault.I just wrote this in response to someone else:

&gt;Why is it not Star-Treky? Because the characters behave out of character. Spock gets emotional several times through ST, including kicking Kirk off his ship into who knows what kind of conditions not actually near any sort of civilization on a frozen planet. Seriously, the Enterprise has a brig. That would have worked just fine... Except Kirk had to meet Future Spock who'd tell him, "Hey, we become best friends! So totally don't worry about that totally dick then I just did!" Moving on, Scotty is unfunny comic relief, who saves the team not because he actually had a brilliant idea, but because Future Spock gave him the answer years ahead of schedule. Kirk is a just a dick, plain and simple. Shatner's Kirk was cocky, sure, but never unlikable.

&gt;And then let's get to the shitty, shitty pseudo-science. The giant space spider that abandoned it kill (the space polar bear) to attack Kirk. Made no sense whatsoever. Scotty getting transported into the pipes was completely stupid, and only done to provide 20 seconds of action. It was totally irrelevant to the rest of the film. Dumb. Then, the drill + red matter. They have this bullshit substance called red matter that can create a singularity. No, fuck that, that's stupid as all get-out. Why the fuck doesn't Spock's ship collapse into a black hole with a fucking liter of the shit inside it???? Then the bad guy has to drill into the center of Earth to deploy the red matter? WTF? No, it creates a singularity. You can just drop it on the surface and it'll still destroy the planet and everyone on it. And why the fuck didn't the citizens of Earth freak out about the giant drill?? They just let it do its thing. And then that supernova that destroyed Romulus. Supernovas take millennia to occur. There was NO FUCKING REASON for people to still be on that planet, not with the technology they have. Fucking. Stupid. And instead of Nero realizing he's back in time and deciding to save his entire species and planet he instead wastes 25 years hunting down Spock. Fucking. Stupid.

&gt;It wasn't a good movie. It was bad movie, and it was a really bad Star Trek movie.

But, seriously, dude, I shouldn't have to read comics and novels to make sense of the plot holes in a movie. The movie is supposed to encapsulate the plot. The fact that they needed additional media publications to clarify stuff means they fucked up making the film. That

Is

Fucked

UpHeavy metal is toxic even at low doses! 

/I actually listen to metal. Still alive, haven't murdered anyone.No they didn't.That change actually really pisses me off, because in the original edit, the Jedi song plays in the background. It *always* gives me goosebumps, because that means Anakin is back and Darth Vader is gone. The NOOOOOOO obscures it, and frankly, I think it's a travesty.He's not even superfluous. He's Harry's and Hermione's source of info for the magical world. A great example of that is the Tale of the Three Brothers. In the first Transformers, they had Optimus Prime say, "Autobots, roll out." (Actually, he may have just said, "Autobots, transform." I can't remember.) All they had to do was have him say the *entire* catch phrase, and they fucked it up.It's her delivery. It's awful. But she makes up for it with that, "Is that how you normally look? It's a GOOD LOOK."Why was that dumb? I thought it was realistic, and everyone stared in shock at him.Hey, dude, you asked a question and I answered it. You don't have to shit on me because you disagree with me. She read the story, but it was Ron who already knew about it.Didn't the Boston bombers get one of their guns (used later against other cops) from that MIT cop they murdered? *shrug* I guess that's the downside.Good, fuck this bitch. Not only was it a terrible thin gto do to the cat, but imagine what the owners are going through. I've had several dogs and cats at this point in my life, and I was devastated when I lost all of them (not at the same time, obvs). She obviously didn't regret her choice because she posted that awful photo to Facebook. She's a terrible person who did something cruel for no good reason. Cruel to the cat, cruel to the owners, and then she fucking held it up like a hunting trophy. She's a bad person, and she should feel bad.

Damn, I guess I'm a little more angry about this than I realized. Sorry about the rant, guys.I love how you automatically assume that they did it intentionally with no regard to the civilians at the hospital. Texas Skool BoredDeath panels. Don't forget death panels.I work at and attend a CC, and I don't want teachers to have to carry weapons around. The odds of a school shooting are minuscule, despite what the media and the NRA say. There's no good reason to arm teachers, especially since 1) if those people wanted to be in the security industry, they'd already be in the security industry; 2) those people really aren't trained to deal with that kind of circumstance, and it's not something you can teach with one four-hour training course; 3) they already have enough on their plates. If Trump wants armed personnel on campus, then he needs to find the money to have each school hire a squad of well-trained cops, preferably ex-military trained in urban combat. Uh, dumbasses do dumbass things with guns every fucking day in America. First of all, you're talking about people who *want* to be armed at all times. I'm sure there are some profs who'd love to carry around a gun with them, but I'm guessing a huge portion aren't interested in that. And, frankly, if educators were interested in being part of an armed security force, they probably would have become cops or joined the military. The odds of any individual school have a mass shooting are minuscule. I know the press likes to play that shit up, but it's really not common at all. If teachers wanted to be armed security personnel, they'd already be cops. I'm sure there are *some* that are interested in carrying in class, but the extreme majority aren't. Source: I work at a community college and we talk about this shit.Dude, there's nothing wrong with limited where guns can be carried. It's on an infringement of 2nd amendment rights to keep guns out of certain areas. Or do you think it's unconstitutional to force people to leave their guns at home when they have to spend time in prison, or at the court house, or while on jury duty?How did you not realize this was sarcasm?Oh, good, iet's do what fucking *Israel* does. No, dude, you're being a dick. I'm done.You implied it when you said this, "It is extremely unlikely that the US was unaware of a Doctors without borders hospital... They could have easily told them to evacuate and leave the country."&gt; No law(s) could've prevented the tragedy any more than having speed limits prevents speeding. 

Really? I'm pretty there are a whole bunch of laws we haven't tried yet, and not even all of them have to do with access to guns. Israel is basically in the midst of a civil war with its Palestinian population. We should not be trying to emulate anything they do.So, again, your immediate assumption is they knew and didn't care.How about proper mental healthcare? How about registering guns so we can trace where they "go missing" when they're used in a crime? How about actual universal background checks? Why was the shooter last week able to get his hands on so many guns? &gt; Laws don't prevent actions, they can only create consequences

Bullshit. Making something illegal is a deterrent for that action. I know multiple people who don't smoke pot because it's illegal, but would if it was legal. And I live in WA, so I guess I'd know about that, huh? No, illegality doesn't stop EVERY bad action, but it does deter.&gt; You can get rid of obesity by killing all fat people, but we don't want to live in a world like that. 

Good lord, what a ridiculous statement.&gt; The thing that disturbs me the most is Obama wants an all out ban. 

He has never, ever even indicated such a thing. Get a grip.Haha, an Australian getting downvoted for daring to refute the Reddit circlejerk about gun control in Australia! Classic reddit.How is that "an all out ban?" Because it's a stupid False comparison. We're not saying "let's kill all gun owners" and we're not even saying "ban all guns." We're saying, 'There are a lot of reasonable laws we could pass that can help with this problem that America has." Your response to my statement was hyperbolic and provocative, and unnecessary.Because she's a woman.Give it a rest, buddy. &gt;She put a person with cerebral palsy on an exercise mat on a dirty carpet. That\u2019s love?

Look, I don't know enough this situation to know if it was rape or not. But that sentence up there doesn't mean shit.We can disagree on the proper course of action to take, but that doesn't change the fact that your original statement, "You can get rid of obesity by killing all fat people, but we don't want to live in a world like that" was hyperbolic and ridiculous.

Yes, 13 guns is a lot.It already has.Violent crime *in general* is down over the last couple of decades. But mass shootings are very definitely on the rise. Still rare as a per capita figure, but definitely on the rise.And to the extreme majority of Americans, that's a shitload of guns. You're essentially saying that because serious collectors have a lot of guns, that this woman having 13 guns isn't weird. It's weird, dude. If this was an American 13-year-old shot by American cops for throwing rocks, you'd be pretty pissed off.It's not uncommon to have more than one gun. In fact, [the mean is 6.6](http://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/pmc/articles/PMC2610545/). Of course, the mean for women is actually less than 5 (it differs based on marital status, but all of them are less than 5). So this woman owned more than double the mean amount of guns, regardless of which demographic you put her in. Because there's a difference between a newly discovered alien life-form and a woman being pregnant. The single fertilized cell you're talking about *has the potential* to become a human being. However it is not actually a human being. I support marriage equality, but yeah, you can't go against some of the most basic rules of your religious organization and hope to remain part of its clergy.John Boehner is the epitome of a career politician, and he even he can't control the GOP. &gt; Donald Trump, as he's told everyone, is a winner and successful businessman.

"Successful"

He's had to declare bankruptcy 4 times. &gt; and the Democratic insiders had anointed Hillary.

Just like how they anointed Hillary in 2008. Oh, wait.Well, his rich dad literally gave him his seed money. It's not like he worked his way up from the middle class. He also supported the war in Vietnam and the draft, and then managed to spend his missionary years as a house boy in a wealthy home in France. The guy's family has always looked out for him. He was born on third base and he thinks he's hit a triple.I can't stand Romney, but that's definitely True.I'm not sure, but I'm not a social scientist. But I guarantee you "keep on doing what we're already doing" isn't going to help anything. It's pretty obvious we need more mental healthcare, though.Well, you're both right. The GOP knew they were doing to lose the black and minority votes, and so they embraced the southern Dixiecrats who'd been alienated by the Democrats during the Civil Rights era. The GOP also started catering to the religious folks in the South to shore up their numbers. You may be familiar with the term, "[Moral Majority](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Moral_Majority)."Actually, what happens is that youthful liberals change the world around them. The old people die off, the young people become the old people, and the new young people find a new inequality to address. The new old people (the former youthful liberals) oppose those reforms because those things don't seem to so bad to them, and that's how things have always been so what's the big deal? 

For example, many of the very same people who fought for black rights in the 1960s now oppose marriage equality. (To be fair, a lot of people are assholes and oppose both.) They were the hippies of the 1960s, and now they're the assholes standing in the way of progress.You do realize that paying for every post-pubescent female to have access to FREE birth control for the entirely of her fertile years would still be less expensive than paying to help care for even a small percentage of unwanted kids, right? It's simple math. Right? What a bitch for getting a divorce and becoming a single mom. She should have just stayed married to that guy, regardless of the circumstances.&gt; she doesn't know how her vagina works?

She has TWO kids. That's less than average. She also was married when she had them and then got a divorce. 

Also, what you're implying is that a woman's financial stability is directly tied to her ability to control when she gets pregnant, even when she's married. Which is precisely why access to both birth control and abortion is so vital to women.Better yet, let's just make divorce illegal. Then women like her wouldn't have to struggle to raise kids on their own. Both of her kids were born while she was married, and financially stable. It wasn't until she got a divorce that she needed help. And she's managed to not make any more kids.&gt; We need free contraceptives ~~for those on social programs such as food stamps, and harsh penalties for those who ignore the contraceptives and decide to keep having children they cannot afford~~

FTFY. It's actually cheaper to provide free birth control to all people in the country than it is to support even a fraction of unwanted children.You do realize that she was married when she had her 2 kids, and then got a divorce, and that's when she started needing financial assistance, right?I think it'll be drug prohibition, prison reform, and university education reform. Maybe not in that order. But we're already seeing movement on at least marijuana, and small movement on prison reform especially regarding drugs. &gt; it started to get exhausting.

Well, the guy was stuck on Mars for 2 years. Shit's gonna go wrong.&gt;I agree such assistance can be less costly in the long run, but I object to the implementation. If it's simply a small office where people can go and pick up The Pill, probably in addition to mandatory education and counseling, and it's done locally then I'm fine with it. **My problem is it's done at the federal level which is guaranteed to be wasteful.**

Your bias is showing. 

There's a thing called the economies of scale, the cost advantages that enterprises obtain due to size, output, or scale of operation, with cost per unit of output generally decreasing with increasing scale as fixed costs are spread out over more units of output. The federal government greatly benefits from economies of scale. 

&gt;What we're doing is making things super simple, and treating people like victims of their own actions.

Where is she behaving like a victim? She's actually doing exactly the opposite by refusing to be ashamed that she needs public services to help her kids out.

&gt;We're saying it's okay to rely on the government to solve problems. It's not.

Why is it not okay to rely on the government to solve problems? That's literally why we have the government: To promote the general welfare. It's right there in the preamble to the Constitution.

&gt;You know what would be even cheaper than pills or condoms? Abstinence. 

Oh, I'm sorry, I live in reality. Hit me up when you join me here. Until then, say hi to Santa Claus for me.Just make it a blanket policy that applies to everyone, and then if wealthy people want to have 19 kids, they can."as he's told everyone"

Ah, I see that now.No, see, he wants his cake and to eat it to. He wants the world to be perfect, but he doesn't want to have to dirty his perfectly manicured hands to make it that way. He doesn't like the government, and he doesn't want to solve any problems using the government. Using the government for its intended purpose is icky, to him. So even though that would in fact be the most efficient, most successful, most egalitarian way, he refuses to do it that way.There's a few resorts and LegoLand, but as a former resident, I didn't see it as a tourist town. It's just another part of San Diego. Pretty much all of San Diego County can be considered a tourist town, aside from the low income areas. Honestly, I think the other guy just looked up Carlsbad on Wikipedia and read the first sentence and ran with it.Lots of people on Reddit don't actually think black lives matter.Well, if you're going to drive down I5 into San Diego, you're at least going to pass through Carlsbad on the way.She's a blight on society? Because she's poor? What in the actual fuck???Precisely.Lots of people on Reddit think all cancers need attention, not just childhood leukemia. Yet, nobody would dare say to any childhood leukemia organization, "Hey, ALL cancers need funding, not just yours!"But the point is that in an incredibly life-hostile environment like Mars, any tiny mistake can end up being life-threatening. And you can do everything perfectly right and still have random shit go wrong, and the universe doesn't care that you did everything exactly right. You're still dead.Reddit males like to masturbate furiously over how bad they have it thanks to feminism. Forgetting, of course, that feminism is why they can have sex outside marriage (or even inside marriage!) without getting a woman pregnant.Again, though, very hostile environment where a guy is struggling to survive for 2 years with supplies designed to last 30 days. Seems pretty realistic to me. Also, they DID have a SEVEN MONTHS LATER time skip where nothing happened. &gt; I just felt it brought me out of the world I was reading about, that the extreme despair associated with having everything go wrong was a little too exhausting for me.

It shouldn't bring you *out* of the world, it should immerse you *in* it. &gt; We've made progress which would have occurred anyway, and didn't need big government programs to do it.

Hmm, I think black people who grew up in the segregated South completely fucking disagree with that statement.I'm not sure why you're getting downvoted. It's not like the Catholic Church has a good record regarding child rape by its clergy. I mean, it's well known. It's like you have no idea that Planned Parenthood was founded by a woman, and that birth control was popularized by those same women. Carlsbad is a good 35 minutes away from the convention center, and it's not on any good public transit lines (neither the trolley nor the light rail). Nobody stays there to go to Comic-Con.Hispanic people can be white. One is an ethnicity and the other a race.If you read the article you'd know what's up with his name...&gt; kills a goat and drinks its blood "no violence pls"

Animal sacrifice has long been a part of religion. And Catholics believe that when they take Communion, they are *literally* eating of the body and blood of Christ.The US Constitution also bans this display. They're pissing in the wind.All of the Fox News channels.No, see in California the gays cause *droughts*.&gt; I can't even let a friend shoot one of my guns at the range and hand it back to me without us both being felons. 

Citation neededYes, these are *American* companies working the system to avoid *American* taxes. Don't want to pay American taxes? Stop being an American company. That's how I see it. But these companies reap the benefits without paying taxes back into the system.Maybe you should try Google? I have family members who refuse to read or listen to NPR because "bias." I try to explain to them that NPR is the least bias news source probably in the world, and they refuse to listen to me because I'm liberal and therefore biased. *Sigh*MSNBC leans liberal while Fox leans Republican. A subtle but very important difference. MSNBC will actually call out Democrats for their non-liberal shit, whereas Fox is merely the mouthpiece for the GOP. Whatever the GOP wants, Fox will vocally support.Pull yourselves up by your own bootstraps... But not TOO much.If you're working full time and schooling full time, you may not have the time to take public transit. Time is money.Have we tried arming all toddlers?My Tea Party neocon ex-uncle used to have a framed photo of Reagan up in his house. 

That same ex-uncle is now homeless and living in a VA shelter because he doesn't want to work. My aunt divorced him because she was having to work 60 hours a week to support his jobless ass and their kid. He's been trying to get on full disability for 3 years (since the divorce) and so far no doctor has been willing to sign off that he's too sick to work. The guy has a very minor case of fibromyalgia, and a very major case of lazyasfuckesia.But he *will* drag the Democrats to the left, which is a good thing. No, we're not getting single payer or free university education any time soon. But we might just get marijuana off the schedule 1 drug list, and maybe even some prison reform. None of that shit would happen under any other president, especially not a Republican one.I'm not so sure she wouldn't continue to be more lefty. She *did* try to get healthcare reform passed when she was First Lady, before she was even a "real" politician. She wouldn't be as left as Bernie, but I think she's definitely being dragged left by him.If she doesn't win this time around, she's already finished. She wants to be in the history books, and VP would still get her that.The issue is that if she was white, she probably wouldn't have been pulled over in the first place, and also her being rude wouldn't likely have led to her arrest and therefore death.I used to work in collections (not customer service) and we got to hang up on people who were dicks to us. It actually didn't happen that often. That being said, if someone was a dick to us, we didn't hold that against them and repossess their car immediately, because *we don't want their fucking car*. Cops shouldn't *want* to arrest people.&gt; It was a public forum, they had a right to speak. 

No, it wasn't, and no, they didn't. I support what BLM stands for, but that doesn't mean I have to agree with everything they do.Ah, that makes total sense. It's also a total waste of money and effort, but your statement makes sense.&gt; And given the movie is about his relationship with freaks and geeks co-star Linda Cardellini it's not a stretch that he drew from past experiences. 

Somehow, despite loving Forgetting Sarah Marshall, I did not know that!&gt; http://www.latimes.com/entertainment/la-ca-segel13apr13-story.html

Damn, that article is talking about shit that happened in the first season of HIMYM like it's news. 

*And then one day you find*

*Ten years have got behind you*Bland character? Marshall Eriksen? The guy who helped invent baskiceball? Who has a Fight Club with his brothers? The guy who truly believes that both Bigfoot and Nessie are real? The guy who would do literally anything for Lily and Ted? You mean Big Fudge?

Hunh.I got into an argument with a doofus here yesterday about how the number of things that go wrong over 2 years on Mars in a hab designed to last 30 days *isn't* stupid. The guy just felt it was too exhausting going from crisis to crisis, and it took him out of the movie. He felt that having so many crises was contrived. 

How many astronauts have died just trying to get into orbit around our own planet, or to our moon? But having Mark Watney deal with a shit-ton of crises when stranded on Mars for over 2 years with only 50 days of supplies is somehow contrived. 

*shakes head*The odds of our planet being the only planet with life are minuscule. That being said, life on our planet won't necessarily look like life on any other planet, because life is shaped by its environment. So, in that regard, yes, our planet and the lifeforms on it are unique. That being said, convergent evolution is a thing, so it's very possible we'd see similarities of body functions. The odds are pretty high that alien life has organs that detect light, and organs that clear waste from the body, and organs that protect it against injury and illness. They just may not look like eyes, or kidneys or livers, or skin, or white blood cells. Do you not know where plants get their energy???The entire backstory of how The Martian was written is that the author wanted to make it as scientifically accurate as possible. So, it's pretty cool that NDT says, "Yeah, this really darn scientifically accurate!"I actually do care if a fictional film gets the science right. It actually *really* bothers me when films break the known laws of our universe. Remember in Prometheus when the alien fetus is left alone for several hours in a sealed room and somehow it grew like 2000% in size and mass? Where the fuck did it get the mass and energy for that? That one plot point broke *two* major laws of physics. Laws that even high school students should know (or at least have heard of). Is it so bad to ask that movies adhere to high school level science?I don't know how many times Redditors throw out there, "Harry Potter is just a kid's series!" as an attempt to undermine the awesomeness of Harry Potter. I was in my 20s when HP came out, and I love that series to death. Some stories transcend age.At this point the Capital is sort of like North Korea. Gotta keep up appearances.While I don't think these are the greatest books/movies of all time, I *do* really appreciate how the author isn't glorifying war. Every single character has very extreme forms of PTSD that they never truly recover from. Sort of like how Frodo never truly gets over being the Ringbearer. I think in that way they are unique and amazing. (I do enjoy the movies, and the books, but I don't think they're utterly fantastic.)She's actually doing alright. Not having to pay to help another human being survive is a relief, even though he's still not paying any child support. Not that he contributed when they were married, but still. Not having another "kid" to clean up after is a relief.Junior high school science, man. Absolutely. Life evolves to survive in its own environment, as we've evolved to survive on Earth (in a variety of environments). The odds are minuscule that we'd find another planet we could survive on. California really does need high speed rail, though. CA has 2 huge metropolises (LA and SF) and two more that are very large as well (SD and Sacto). CA is the most populous state, and the third largest land mass. The east coast has its own high speed rail that goes from DC to Boston, a distance of 454 miles. San Diego to San Francisco is ~500 miles, so a comparable distance. And Southern California is densely populated, essentially city from the Mexican border to ~250 miles north. 

Essentially, it's really easy for people like you who are from smaller states to see the HSR plan as a boondoggle, but you don't live here, and you have no idea the unique challenges CA faces because of its population and size. Personally, I look forward to taking HSR to San Francisco for a nice weekend trip.We are, but we have a lot of rural areas as well, and those tend to be Republican. Also, we get a LOT of retired military, and those also tend to be Republican and also raised in other parts of the nation. It's why San Diego is traditionally more conservative than the other 3 big cities in CA.&gt; states like Texas will still stick their heads in the sand and go LA LA LA LA LA LA LA LA LA

LOUISIANA LOUISIANA LOUISIANA LOUISIANA LOUISIANA LOUISIANA LOUISIANA 

Well, it turns out that Louisiana has the 8th highest teen pregnancy rate in the US, and the 6th highest teen birth rate. So yeah, it kind of fits.As I once argued elsewhere years ago, this is just *knowledge* and *facts* being imparted to students. Parents can still provide all the moral background they want regarding sex. As they should be. I hope they win (and I think they will).&gt; 70 MPH is NOT High Speed Rail. 

Where are you getting that figure from? Because everything I'm reading about it says up to 220 MPH. Sure, *some parts* may "only" be 70MPH, but those won't be the norm. From the wikipedia article: "As regards train speed and travel times, the train must also be electric and capable of a sustained operating speed of no less than 200 miles per hour (320 km/h). There are also a number of travel time benchmarks. The ones applicable to Phase 1 of the project are: (1) a maximum nonstop travel time between San Francisco and San Jose of 30 minutes, and (2) a maximum nonstop travel time between San Jose and Los Angeles of 2 hours and 10 minutes. (Thus, a nonstop time from San Francisco to Los Angeles in 2 hours and 40 minutes.)"

&gt;I live in CA and we are NOT getting HSR. 

Are you rejecting my reality and substituting your own shittier reality? Because CA very much IS getting high speed rail.

&gt;This is a train from Modesto to Bakersfield for $100B. 

Do you know that there's multiple phases to this project, and that it's eventually going to go from San Diego to SF? Phase 1 is going from Anaheim to San Francisco, over 500 miles. The *first* part of Phase 1 connects Merced to Bakersfield, but that's not where they're ending the project. 

Where the hell do you get your news, because you're seriously misinformed."Abortions for some, miniature American ~~flags~~ guns for others."&gt; I find it funny that you are willing to buy into a face sucking alien species but aren't willing to buy into how or why such a species could grow 2000% from its starting size.

Because the first part of your sentence has a basis in reality (there are in fact parasites that attack the face and mouth), whereas the other breaks TWO very basic laws of physics. Physics doesn't just work on Earth, it works everywhere in our universe. The alien fetus *has* to get its mass and energy from somewhere. I would fucking love to be able to take a train instead of flying. Science isn't asinine, or nonsense. I just want my movies to adhere to basic science. Fuck me, right?Do you know the word pretentious means? Its root is "pretense" so that should give you a hint. 

NDT isn't pretentious. He doesn't *pretend* to be anything. He's actually smart as fuck and has a PhD in astrophysics. He's the exact opposite of pretentious.You joke, but one month after JPMorganChase announced all-time record profits to the tune of $17B, they turned around and told all their employees that the maximum raise that year would be 2%.I'm about as libtarded as they come, and I don't see the big deal with what these students do. It has nothing to do with racism or the historical (and racist) use of blackface.&gt; 1800's technology.

I had no idea that trains in 1840 could go 220 mph.Not a single citation, not a single refutation. Just a long screed that essentially amounts to, "Nuh uh, you sheeple!"I did actually take Astrobiology and the Search for Extraterrestrial Life at university. It was my favorite class of all time (OF ALL TIME!). It was a little bit of bio, a little chem, a little physics, and of course a little astronomy. So, I can't take credit for formulating those thoughts, but I do remember a lot from that class, even though I took it over a decade ago.That, and it makes for a boring *action* movie. Edit: Guys, I'm dissing Hollywood. I"m not saying that what they SHOULD do, I'm saying that's probably what they WILL do, because Hollywood is dumb.That scene in Apollo 13 when Jim Lovell's kid asks, "Is it a problem with the door?" fucking kills me every time.Aw, thanks, man!You know those things aren't real, right? And that you're just supporting my theory that you don't live in reality?The sad thing is, it didn't use to be that way. Chase's tagline *used* to be, "Chase: The Employer of Choice." That was before BankOne and Jamie Dimon, though. Dimon took over and it all went to shit. Cuts to employee benefits, reduction in raise amounts and also frequency, you name it. Fuck Chase, and fuck Jamie Dimon. He's the worst thing that ever happened to that company.I think he feels redeemed by The Vision.The real-life events of Apollo 13 are why all the valves and whatnots in The Martian all fit interchangeably together. 

And sorry about the doofus. I just had a hard time reconciling your statement. I try to reserve "cunt" for actual cunts, though, and not just people whose opinions I disagree with. And yeah, it's a unisex term for me. If that ever happens again, you should point that idiot to the wikipedia page for child soldiers.Yep! Played it, beat it, blew my mind!I think after 9/11, or rather, after the United States' response to 9/11, we're all a little too keenly aware of the power of propaganda. It's part of why I so very much appreciated Order of the Phoenix.Well it went from being about the size of a young human fetus (too small for her to "show") to much larger than an adult human. There's nowhere near enough nutrients in air to let that happen. I even doubt we're along in the Milky Way Galaxy, it's just so damned big. But, we're still far enough away from any other life that we'll likely never, ever encounter any alien life for the duration of our species.I have to say, as a native San Diegan, getting into Disneyland for a reduced rate is pretty awesome!I know it's not, but does Hollywood know that? &gt;  I was very disturbed by their double standards.

Sure you were, buddy.The left didn't attack Sarah Paling *for being a woman*, they attacked her for being a total fucking idiot with no discernible skill set who was completely unprepared to be VP of our nation, and for being a huge hypocrite. Her gender had absolutely nothing to do with it. He has -3 karma on that post and you have +19. You were saying?Do they? Hwood makes an awful lot of flops.I think the DNA was interesting in a legal sense because it was tied into one of the kids' bindings at the crime scene.Not for actual nurses. CNAs maybe.The vast majority of nurses don't actually use that type of information on a day to day basis, though. It's good background knowledge, but there's no need to understand what the endoplasmic reticula do if your job is to give shots and change dressings and perform CPR and hand doctors stuff.Probably not. She switched out the needle but retained the syringe portion. If it was malicious, she would have just used the same needle over and over.It's probably just stupidity. She switched out the needle between patients but retained the syringe portion. She's just dumb.&gt; And if your job can do without you for 3 months, how valuable are you?

I would argue that if your empoyer isn't allowing you to have a lifeoutside work, that's when your employer doesn't value you. When you value things, you take care of them.If you're actually working 60 hours/week, then your $51k salary is only about $16.36 per hour. That's not something to brag about.http://www.npr.org/sections/thetwo-way/2015/06/30/418908804/california-governor-signs-school-vaccination-lawBut I've been assured by Republicans that there's no war on women. Because dozens of men with knives attacking civilians is *just like* a single gunman murdering 10 people in a minute.I remember when JPM was the conservative bank that didn't take risks. Then BankOne and Jamie Dimon took over.The dad also got in on that victim blaming. 

&gt;The boy's father, who is also Hatt's ex-lover, claimed his son was 'fully up for this experience' as he pleaded for the babysitter to be spared jail over the 45-second sexual encounter.

&gt;In a statement, the boy's father said: 'I know he told her he was 15. He looks older than his years. He is sex mad. He would have been fully up for this experience and in many ways sees it as a notch on his belt and is totally unaffected by it.'





I don't think the housewives portion of that statement is particularly relevant.When this is all done, get collision damage. Now you know why it exists.And my point is that gender doesn't matter.Nothing. The other guy doesn't know wtf he's talking about. In fact, the war on drugs under Nixon and especially Reagan focused on pot so much that heroin and cocaine (and crack) became much cheaper than pot. Which meant more and more people turning to those very damaging drugs instead of just sticking to relatively-harmless pot.

[Here is a good article about this](http://www.huffingtonpost.com/2012/01/11/rick-ross-crack_n_1198092.html). It seems like it's unrelated based on the title, but if you go down a bit it actually talks about Reagan's crazy focus on mj, and the result that had on the drug trade.&gt; The war was needed at the time in the 80s when things were way out of control. 

No, it wasn't. Reagan's focus on marijuana worked... On marijuana. Because mj was so hard to get, and it was now so expensive, people turned to other drugs like cocaine, crack, and heroin. [Reagan's War on Drugs was a huge failure.](http://www.huffingtonpost.com/2012/01/11/rick-ross-crack_n_1198092.html)

Edit: This is the same guy who is arguing that making guns illegal wouldn't do anything about our violent gun crime rate. But somehow, magically, making drugs illegal will help our drug problem. Dozens of men, and only 3 times as deadly. Hmm. And four of the men were killed by police. Hmm. The extreme majority of Americans go through life without committing any serious crimes at all. When you're filtering people out of a prospective job pool, a criminal background is a really easy way to filter out the people too stupid or too immoral to not know they shouldn't commit a crime. It may not be especially fair, but it's totally legitimate. Especially if you're trying to minimize the risk to your company. My aunt took in my cousin's best friend when he was in 9th grade. He lived in poverty with his terminally ill dad; his mom was a drug addict in prison. My aunt took care of this kid for 3.5 years. Fed him, housed him, clothed him, treated him like her own son. He called her mom, and my cousins his brother and sister. 2 months after he graduated high school and moved into his own apartment with a buddy, he was arrested and indicted for breaking and entering into someone's house. After all my aunt did for him, this is how he thanks her. By fucking up almost as soon as he chose to move out of her house. And yes, it was his choice to move out. She would have let him keep living at her place, but he wanted to be able to smoke pot in his living room. 

This kid had a real chance at breaking the poverty/crime cycle. My aunt was urging him to join the Navy or go to mechanic school to fix cars. Mechanics make good money, and it's honest work. But nope, he wanted to fuck around and break into people's houses and steal their stuff. The good news is that my cousin (who is a couple years younger than the scumbag loser) now realizes what a loser that guy is, and no longer hangs out with him. So, silver lining and all that.Standardized testing needs to go away. There is no standardized testing at the college level, unless you want to go to grad school. The vast majority of people don't go to grad school, so there's no point in hammering our kids with standardized tests (that actually aren't very good at providing us any info anyway). And then when kids become adults and get jobs and careers, the vast majority gain don't have to deal with any standardized tests. So we're torturing these kids for no good reason.He's not wrong about how the market works, though. We pay teachers so poorly that it's actually a poor financial decisions for smart people. Also, teachers *must* have at least a BA + certification. That's a hell of a lot of school just to turn around and make $35k. We need to pay teachers what any other professional class with 5+ years of education would get.&gt; The unlucky teacher that had the worst kids blew a gasket because it would make her look like a terrible teacher, even though she was one of the best and just happened to get several kids with mental and behavioral issues that year.

That's actually a known thing in many industries. For example, does Hospital A suck because they have a high death rate? Or are they awesome so everyone sends their sickest patients to Hospital A which leads to them having a higher-than-normal death rate?&gt; I understand that there's no simple plan that works everywhere, but "throw more money at a broken system" is no solution either.

It's a perfectly valid portion of a solution, though. Teachers have to go through *at least* four years of university, and also obtain certification which can take another year or two. No other industry pays so little for so much education. People like me who have the desire to teach but not the desire to live in near poverty will choose to pursue other options rather than teaching. Like the other guy said, why does "You get what you pay for" ring True for literally everything except teachers? We don't dare limit how much CEOs get paid because companies need to be able to attract talent, but "there's no evidence that paying teachers more results in better student learning." Funny how that works. *raises hand*

People like me. Smart as hell with a near 4.0 GPA in science courses (bio and chem), but I'm not touching education with a 10' stick. It just doesn't pay enough for the kind of shit I'd have to put up with. And it's society's loss, because I'm great with kids. (I'm not bragging, I'm just using myself as an example. There are hundreds of thousands of people like me who *want* to teach, but they more don't want to live in near poverty. And since we have the capacity to do something other than living in near poverty, we choose to do so.)Our governments pay private companies to run our prisons.Yes, just keep making teaching as unappealing as possible and see how that works out for the quality of people you get to teach.&gt; Teachers are essentially useless babysitters now.

Know how I know you have no fucking clue what teachers do?And the point of this article is that *that's the best data we have, and it's shit.* Actual research would provide us with actual information, instead of just shoving two maybe related things together on the same graph.I actually do use logic and reason to make decisions, but I also was a data analyst for 9 years. I *want* this information, because I don't know what to believe. My gut tells me gun control is the answer, but other people's guts tell them the exact opposite. I want better information than my gut or someone else's gut.So you're acknowledging that this is a health issue. Cool.Then fuck it, let's just not do anything then.Well, I mean, kids pick their schools because that's where they spend most of their time. That's where the people they're angry with are. That's the place they know backwards and forwards and schedules and patterns of what goes on there. Of course they pick their schools. It really doesn't have anything to do with gun free zones. It's just the familiarity of the setting.I have never attended any school/community college/university that had metal detectors.Meanwhile, the TSA shit a brick when my brother tried to check my dad's replica Civil War era blackpowder long rifle into the cargo hold of a plane. Because when ever second counts, using a black powder rifle that takes 25 seconds to reload is totally the way to go.The Founders gave us a way to amend our Constitution for a reason. You're suggesting that even if we somehow did manage to amend the 2nd Amendment, that the military wouldn't honor that change even though they're sworn to uphold the Constitution? 

I mean, do you understand the words you're saying?Not really. I saw a PBS documentary a while ago that had kindergartners placed into a play room with a hidden prop gun. Every single kid who found the gun played with it, pulled the trigger, and didn't tell a grown up about it. Including the kid of the cop who'd explicitly told his son numerous times "If you find a gun, don't touch it and immediately go tell an adult." Obviously, that's just one anecdote, but kids are notoriously bad decision makers.&gt; in acting

Enacting?There is nothing inherently unAmerican, undemocratic, or unconstitutional about amending our constitution.Because the border wall is fucking stupid and a waste of money. Especially when things we've already built need trillions of dollars in repairs.That shit didn't start in the 90s, it started when Reagan came into power.But the law prohibits suits against manufacturers and dealers *regardless of circumstance*. It's a blanket policy enacted specifically to protect manufacturers and dealers *even if they are in fact at fault*. Name another industry in our country with that kind of protection. &gt; it's a completely ridiculous idea regardless on where you stand on guns. 

But what happens if the manufacturer really is at fault (negligence, a fucked up firing pin leading to multiple deaths, whatever)? This law protects them from being held accountable even when there is a legitimate fuck up on their part. Aren't lawsuits supposed to be a way for grieved parties to seek redress in the court system? And this law takes that away from people.

Caveat: I'm not saying manufacturers should be sued when people use their guns to kill other people. That's what guns are for. I'm just saying that this law protects them even when they really are at fault.And I *really* appreciate that. It's very realistic.I'm not talking about drug laws, I'm talking about laws that actually make sense. Although to be fair, if someone is in prison for being addicted to serious drugs (not pot), then that's a good reason to not hire them. Nobody in their right mind would knowingly hire someone addicted to drugs.You think teachers do nothing all day except corral kids.We could do massive studies on how the different gun control laws have affected gun crimes. We don't have that data now. All you're doing is comparing numbers of guns to numbers of gun crimes. That's a pretty simple statistic that really doesn't tell us anything at all. 67% isn't an extreme majority? It's double the rate that goes to prison. [Here's the background story to that quote.](http://www.npr.org/2015/03/02/390245038/ben-franklins-famous-liberty-safety-quote-lost-its-context-in-21st-century) It doesn't mean what you think it means. In fact, it more means the opposite of what you think it means.I'm gonna need a whole bunch of citations to back up all your statements.While I appreciate that comment as a (possibly unintended) compliment, I don't think it's a waste of talent to inspire generations of kids to make the world a better, smarter place. I missed the boat earlier in life when I could have become a scientist because at that point, girls didn't go into science. Now I'm too old to pursue the course I really want (PhD in chemistry), so I'm going into nursing instead. I'd *love* to inspire kids to get into science. My biggest regret in life is not pursuing a chem PhD after high school. If I can steer even *one* kid in the right decision, then maybe I didn't totally fuck things up when I was young.&gt;Why didn't your aunt just let him ~~smoke pot~~ drink beer where ever? Seems like she forced his hand to move out. 

How do you feel about that now? Did YOUR parents let you get smashed in the living room when you were 18?There's actually a lot more data we could use. I gave an example above, but you ignored it.&gt; Teachers are essentially useless babysitters now.

That's where you said that.Oh, I'll take your anecdote over a plethora of studies that say otherwise.I can understand and acknowledge that blacks are unfairly targeted by police while also understanding and acknowledging that eliminating job candidates based on criminal background checks is perfectly valid.Eh, plenty of film actors kick ass on stage, too. See: Dan Radcliffe. He was 18 when he took the role in Equus, and apparently did a great job even while naked. A lot of people shit on Kevin Costner's accent in Prince of Thieves. IMO, I'd rather an actor retain their bland American accent than butcher another one. It's not like the English in 1200AD spoke with modern English accents anyway (or even spoke English at all, because at that time French was the language of the nobility). I would rather a bland American accent than a butchered any-other accent.IIRC, the nobility spoke in Middle French, because of them Frenchies that took over in 1066. But the commoners would have spoken ME.OO DE LALLY!I always chalked his bad acting up to "the character is pretending to be Mr. Body and is super nervous about fucking this up."&gt; The scene where he duels Voldemort in the Ministry of Magic is brilliantly intense and showcases how he is as a magical warrior.

Absolute the best wizard duel in cinematic history. Sorry, Gandalf, but Saruman grabbing your ankle with a Bigby's Grasping Hand wasn't nearly as terrifying as Voldemort's fire snake.That scene in HBP where he's telling Dumbledore "I have to kill you. Or he's gonna kill me" gives me goosebumps just thinking about it. Draco is *almost* a tragic story.&gt; She started off as fairly good

Ugh, she was terrible in SS. Dan wasn't much better. Rupert, on the other hand, was brilliant as Ron. He did a *great* job in the chess scene. "As for me. I'll be a *knight.*"She definitely grew as an actress, but she started off as terrible and wooden. Which is a shame, because I thought she did a great job in the later movies, especially when she was allowed to be more than just angry at Ron and Harry.I assumed it was because the light was so bright it hurt his eyes.Well, the kids used stupefy and expelliarmus a fuck ton in the books. They were also known to be Harry's attack spells of choice by the Death Eaters.I've always felt that Richard Harris was way too old and frail to play Dumbledore. It always seemed like a good stiff wind would knock him down.I really enjoyed his playful and mischievous Dumbledore in POA.I prefer Michael Gambon's Dumbledore, but you're totally wrong. This isn't going to be a popular opinion, but Ian McKellan never would have done both LOTR and HP. And since that is the case, I'd rather have him as Gandalf than as Dumbledore. His Gandalf is one of my favorite performances of all time (OF ALL TIME!).&gt; People always give Grint grief and say he just goons to the camera all the time, but I think throughout the series he was the only one of the three who was convincingly human.

Ruper *was* Ron. I absolutely LOVE that Rupert said at their first press interview, "[Well, speaking as a wizard, we're going to get paid in Muggle money, and I don't really understand it.](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=6zmKIIQXMnY)" 

To be fair, Emma *is* Hermione: a brainy goody-two-shoes know it all. And Dan *is* Harry: A kid having to fill some big shoes and really desperately not wanting to let anyone down.There's nothing wrong with a retail store choosing not to hire someone who is a known thief. There's nothing wrong with a bank choosing not to hire a known thief/embezzler. (Actually, I think it's against the law to hire an embezzler at a bank.) There's nothing wrong with a school choosing not to hire a child abuser. And I'd be one of those people if we didn't have actual real work that needed to be done. My alma mater (SDSU) was partially built by works programs in the early 20th Century. When the economy needs a boost, there's nothig wrong with coming up with public works projects that can be done to get money into the economy for a temporary boost. It's just that right now, we have actual shit that NEEDS to be done regardless of the economy, so let's fucking do it already! It'll kill 2 birds with 1 stone.So you're the one who would NOT be using facts and logic to make a decision. If numerous studies *did* show that gun control laws did nothing, I'd say we should try something else. That's because my goal isn't to ban guns, it's to lessen our gun violence rate. Meanwhile, your goal is to protect gun rights at all costs.Then why the fuck are you even commenting? I wasn't talking to YOU, I was talking to the other guy. 

Know how I know the other guy doesn't know what teachers do all day? Because he said, "Teachers are essentially useless babysitters now." Really, it's not difficult to see where I was going with this.Draco was going to be an asshole no matter what just because of his dad. Bit he could have been a dead 17-year-old asshole.No, dick, I was 30.Because I'm not saying, "reduce gun violence at all costs."I feel that way too. Way too many spells were just "fling arm with wand shooting stuff" in the films, and that's not at all how the battles/duels worked in the books. I mean if magic is that easy (essentially "point and click"), why send kids to magic school for 7 years?And from the article I linked to, 

&gt;An eighth of an ounce of pot in 1981 was going for $25. It stayed roughly the same in 1982. By 1986, it was up to $53, and it hit a high of $62 in 1991, a 150 percent rise over 10 years. Coke, meanwhile, become much more affordable. It cost nearly $600 a gram in 1982. As Reagan directed resources toward the pot battle, coke's price began to tumble. By 1989, it was down to $200 a gram, cheaper in real terms than it had been during the last national coke binge a century earlier. At the same time, average purity nearly doubled.

Yes, they're comparing ounces to grams, but cocaine works very differently from marijuana, and as they pointed out, the purity of coke nearly doubled. Yeah, I get that response too. It's infuriating.Jesus hated women. It is known.I'm aware of that. That's why I explicitly said drug addictsAbortion is definitely a public health concern, and I would have no problem with the CDC studying it, even though I'm pro-choice. So, I'm not sure why gun violence isn't a public health concern if abortion is.What you're doing right now is an ad hominem attack. You can't debate the substance of my argument so you're attacking me instead. 

Your assumption that I haven't read the series because I was an adult when it came out is completely irrelevant to which actor read the series and was a fan. 

For the record, I own all the Harry Potter books and movies, as well as several of the soundtracks, and even a couple of books of literary essays about the series. Odds are that I have a better understand of the series than you do.

Finally, Michael Gambon is the one who has never read the books, whereas Richard Harris took the role because of his grandkids. So, your initial statement is incorrect.Eh, I don't think HP is a bag of skittles to LOTR's prime cut ribeye. Maybe chicken cordon bleu, or beef wellington. I really think HP will be taught to children in future generations as literature, it's just that good (as LOTR is). It's just different. And I'd be trading what I know to be one of my favorite performances of all time with a big question mark. I'm sure IMcK would be amazing as Dumbledore, but I'd still rather have him amazing as Gandalf.&gt; The CDC can and does do this research, and nobody cares.

It doesn't do that, though. It's not allowed to spend money on that kind of research, unless it somehow magically knew the result would be "gun bans don't work."

&gt;Would you support the CDC using tax dollars to advocate for banning abortion?

If the data said that banning abortions would actually be better for America, yes, I would. And paying entry level teachers poorly is a problem. Especially when those people need 5+ years of school to become a teacher. If it doesn't work out and they can't make ends meet (which is incredibly common; 47% of teachers don't last 5 years), what will they do with that education they paid for?When did that happen?So, a citation from 20 years ago, of a lady who worked for a gun-control organization. I'm supposed to be outraged by this?&gt; This is provable, as the above link proves :)

The only studies they're allowed to do are ones that don't conclude with gun control as a fix. 

&gt;The problem is that "better" is a value judgement which scientists cannot make without the input of human values.

Is it? I use facts and figures to make decisions. If the facts and figures showed me that abortion is harming America, then I would oppose abortion. But the facts and figures show me that *banning* abortion harms America.&gt; Okay. Research doesn't ever have to pose political solutions, even though the authors sometimes do.

Good scientists often propose solutions. It's not their fault that guns are a political hot topic.

&gt;Okay, why does accidental death harm America? Objectively.

Off the top of my head:

1. The cost to treat the wounded before they die.

2. The cost to determine COD by the ME.

3. The cost to the family in the form of loss of income, which can put a family into poverty (which of course costs us tax payers in the form of social benefits like social security, welfare, and TANF).

4. The cost to the family of burying/cremating their loved one. 

5. The loss of work and income due to bereavement, funeral, and even grief counseling.

6. The cost to the employer of the decedent in having to find someone to cover that person's job duties, hire a new employee, and train them. Nick Stahl has some [major drug problems](http://radaronline.com/celebrity-news/nick-stahl-meth-rehab-relapse/), poor guy.I don't think his acting in EoT was amazing, but the guy works his ass off to make great movies. Watch the behind the scenes stuff and you'll see him working long hours to perfect stunts, all while wearing 80lbs of gear.They put the Sol date at the start of every scene on Mars. They also did a 7-month jump, which they also told you about. They also showed his naked, skinny-as-hell-because-he's-slowly-starving-to-death body as he gets out of the shower. I mean, it's pretty fucking obvious how time passes in the movie.I agree with you to some extent, but they did address (and show) JPL and NASA working round the clock, as well as China pitching in to help. That woman worked for the CDC?I'm not sure as I've never really thought about it like that.I'm sure Amazon has far, far more middle class jobs than Walmart does.It's not just them, though. I used to manage repo vendors for a huge bank. We used to get calls from repo companies begging us for work. One vendor called us out of the blue, and when I asked if they had computers and internet access (all assignments were sent via a web program), they said, "No, but we have a fax machine!" I don't necessarily expect repo guys to be at the high end of the tech spectrum, but they didn't have a fucking computer, in 2009. WTF????And then they'll come back to FB when they get out of college and they want to see what Stefanie from high school is now up to.And thank the gods for that, because now I just need to edit my posts for my mom instead of for my mom and also all the little shit sin my family who I'm not allowed to swear around.&gt; The "Cut the Cord" movement, switching people over to Internet based entertainment, is really starting to gather steam.

I really really want to do that, but my husband has a couple of shows he wants that apparently he can't get without cable. :(&gt; But, I fully expect them to increase the price of internet to compensate once the number of cord cutters rise.

Well that's just basic supply and demand. The demand is up, so the cost increases.Well, okay.For one, based on the services they provide. Amazon is considered a tech company while Walmart is a low-cost retail company. Also, I did a quick google search, and it looks like the average salary for a Walmart store employee is $8.36. Amazon's minimum pay for warehouse employees is about $3 more per hour. Really, you don't think studying how existing gun control laws affect gun crime rates would provide us with more data? I find that hard to believe.Ohhhh, so you're just interesting in continuing to be a dick. 

Why don't you have a nice cup of fuck off?I was simply comparing the lowest-wage employee at Walmart to the lowest-wage employee at Amazon. That alone would put the average Amazon salary above the average Walmart salary. 

But the best number I can find is that Amazon's average salary is [$55k](http://www.careerbliss.com/amazon/salaries/), and at Walmart it's [$24k.](http://www.careerbliss.com/walmart/)It's less rational because it's literally less rational. 

Rational: based on or in accordance with reason or logic.

Protecting something at all costs means you're literally ignoring the costs associated with that protection. You're not doing a cost/benefit analysis. You're choosing a course of action regardless of the costs associated with that course of action. You are ignoring reason and logic in favor of following something you believe.

 
I agree that Amazon's warehouse employees don't make very good money, but they still make more than Walmart's grunts do. Also, a smaller percentage of Amazon's staff is at this level; they have many more tech jobs than Walmart does. The best number I can find is that Amazon's average salary is [$55k](http://www.careerbliss.com/amazon/salaries/), and at Walmart it's [$24k.](http://www.careerbliss.com/walmart/)Why do you say that? She probably did this out of ignorance. &gt;Him moving out and smoking weed has nothing to do with his moronic decision to break into someone's home. 

I am a former pot smoker and I am aware of what it does and does not do. I don't know why he broke into the house. I just know that it was his choice to leave my aunt's house where all his expenses were covered and move into his own place at 18 years old specifically because he wanted to be able to smoke pot freely whenever he wanted. He explicitly told my aunt and cousins this. Yep, I know. I have cousins who couldn't wait to get on FB when they turned 13, only to abandon it once they realized they'd get in trouble for posting inappropriate shit. So now they're on snapchat and instagram because we grown ups don't use those, and they can say and do whatever they want there.I think direct hires.Oh, I agree completely. Aside from the occasional Haley Joel Osment, most kid actors are awful. I definitely don't hold it against her. I thought she did a wonderful job in the later films, especially since she got to do more than just "knowledgeable and stuck up" and "angry at Ron." &gt; Do you have any doubt that the people working at top-paying firms, e.g. Goldman Sachs, Sullivan&amp;Cromwell, McKinsey, etc., tested very well?

But who gives a fuck? Does Goldman Sachs ask you for your aptitude test from when you were 8? Of course not. I've never even told a single employer what my SAT score was, because who gives a fuck? Report cards do just as well a job as detailing student performance as aptitude tests, if not better. Or she didn't realize it was a big deal. /u/kobmoney43, are you smelling toast???I think I see why his ngf gets angry with him...LOLWant oral sex? Wash your junk. Goes for both genders.But... Guys do that same exact shit. Oh, we women hate that shit, too. I need my damn pocketses, Precious!Haha, someone needs to send that to my husband's youngest niece! 32, treats guys like shit and expects them to treat her like a princess. She's just not a nice person in general. I have so many stories...Nope, it can happen to any guy, regardless of how healthy he thinks he is.My husband and I perfect together. We'll realize we're having a moment of silence and he'll ask what I'm thinking about and I'll say "Dinosaurs in jetpacks" and he'll say "That totally should have been an episode of Better Off Ted!" and then we'll be talking about random shit like that for a good 45 minutes.You need to marry a geek girl. My husband and I talk about crazy shit like that all the time!And you also need to marry a geek girl. We do exist!Yeah, this is True for both genders.It's not. RIGHT???

True Story: My cousin was accidentally knocked up by a Marine she was seeing, so they got married. She realized the marriage was going to fail when she asked him to feed their infant son while she was cooking their dinner. Her ex-husband, who was playing WOW while she cooked, said, "No, I'm playing my game right now." Unfortunately, a lot of people don't realize that being a grown up doesn't mean getting to do anything you want. It means having to do shit you don't want because nobody will do that shit for you.If she's worth staying there for, she's worth marrying. If she's not worth staying there for, there's no reason to stay together. Aaaand I typoed and my computer thought I meant "stigmata." I mean, would you want a guy to cum on YOUR face?Hannibal Lecter cares.Plenty of fat people are married, though. So, maybe YOU won't ever want to date a fat person, but plenty of people aren't that shallow.If you're a parent, don't expect to hit your kid without also teaching your kid it's okay to hit.Or your maid.Guys, if you want women to continue having sex with you, don't shame them when they do.My husband just takes clippers to his head every Sunday.Do I have to say it a third time? And?Kids pick their schools FOR MASS SHOOTINGS because that's where they spend most of their time... &gt; His lack of supervision is probably the biggest factor in him deciding it was a good idea to try and get away with a federal crime. 

Thank you, that's what I was trying to say without realizing it. He did some shit when he was living with my aunt, but nothing felonious like that. Moving out was a bad decision, which he made because smoking pot is really important to him and he's also not too smart. He's a bad decision maker in general. There's nothing wrong with recreational pot us, but this guy smokes multiple times each day. He based his housing arrangements on his ability to smoke pot, FFS. Overall, his priorities are fucked up.And yet still hale and hearty, not at all like Richard Harris.The Stephanie I've known the longest has a PhD in Immunology. ANd I don't mean that she's a slut and has contracted every STD known to mankind. She's literally got a PhD in Immunology.Actually, I was thinking of my brother and his ex. They were pulled literally in different directions, and although he tried to make it work, it just couldn't. She wanted to be in NYC and he wanted to be in Seattle. He tried NYC for 2.5 years and hated it, and she wanted to stay. He was miserable and depressed there, and she'd have been miserable and depressed anywhere else. It was doomed to failure.Haha, no worries! Yeah, my cousin is doing great! She's married to a different guy who's been helping her raise her son since he was very small. (Her first marriage died in her son's infancy.) He's actually in the process of adopting her son right now. The funny thing is, my cousin and her new husband are both gamers, and her hubby plays WOW a lot. But you know what he doesn't do? He doesn't refuse to be a grown up when she needs him to be a grown up. Her ex just couldn't figure that out. I live in Seattle and have multiple friends who work at Amazon. They make good money. All of the people who work at Amazon HQ are office workers that make at least middle class salaries. Yes, Amazon has lots of warehouse workers, but they also have a shit ton of office personnel. More than Sears or Walmart or pretty much any other retail place.It absolutely is, and I don't blame him for that. He's had a pretty rough life. But as I said in my first post about him, my aunt gave him the opportunity to walk away from that life, and he just couldn't manage it. I have no doubt he's going to spend the rest of his life in poverty.Just make sure you set timeframe goals. Otherwise suddenly it will be 10 years later and you're stuck there.Exactly. My aunt tried to get him to join the Navy, but he wanted to smoke pot. She then tried to get him into a program to learn auto repair, but there wasn't anything in their area. Not everyone is suited for going to college, and that's fine. But it just blows my mind that literally 3 months into his adulthood he's already seriously fucked himself. 

I just googled him, and he's been charged with five felonies, all in relation to the burglary. It was in response to a guy saying kids pick schools because they're gun free zones. I was refuting that.Baggle.I used to have a bunch of Peanuts (you knowm Charlie Brown) books when I was a kid. Shroeder loved to play Beethoven. You know? Beeth-oven? Famous composer? Sigh.Penny-lopeWhen I was a kid, I "got" to read a Bible passage at church in front of the entire congregation. Yeeeeeah, the bad guy's name isn't Satin, it's Satan.

As an adult, I once said veeHEMent instead of VEEhement. My friend laughed his ass off like a motherfucker. Dick. I'd only ever read that word!!How about collectible golf balls? Also, isn't it a stereotype that a guy buys an awesome car and takes great care of it but never, ever drives it?Yeah, he's fucked.You shouldn't *douche*, but that's not the same as washing the exterior. As I said, goes for both genders.I'm a straight woman. I don't even want MY OWN sweaty vulva in my face!Sexy shower time!Why is FB pathetic? I help same keep up with my friends in family from all over the world. It's kinda awesome.~~If the guy's not a legal tenant with a contract and paying rent, then yeah, the parent can kick him out.~~

I guess I'm wrong. I'm not an adult living my parents, though.The issue is that fat people are shamed way, way more than drug users are, especially on Reddit. Drug users never *had* to do drugs in the first place. It's something they *chose* to do. But everyone has to eat, every day. And we are genetically predisposed to LOVE the foods that are the worst for us. Imagine if we could get fat for breathing too much. We need to breathe, and it feels good, just like we need to eat and it feels good, and it feels REALLY good when we eat bacon and sugar and butter. 

Doing drugs requires a conscious choice, while getting fat does not.Seriously, he's like the fourth Redditor to fuck that up!&gt; Brotip: 

Bro**tip**?

(To quote Arya Stark: I'm a GIRL!)&gt;I'm really not up to much.

Yoda: You will be. You. Will. Be.&gt;  if expecting company

HA! That's an awesome euphemism! A friend of mine coined the term "biobreak" as a euphemism a couple weeks ago. We console game online and he was going out of town with the wifey the next weekend, so he needed a "biobreak" and wouldn't be able to play the next weekend.&gt; Source: overweight recovering alcoholic with a history of drug use.

Damn, you just hit the lottery, didn't you?I know plenty of 50+ people who are on Reddit a lot. I'm not supposed to keep up with my friends and family that live thousands of miles away from me?&gt; Only if you count all the non-retail tech people that Amazon employs (techies supporting AWS and things like prime video). 

Why wouldn't I count those people? &gt; He will never vote again

Not actually True in most states.Yes, that's correct.No, he's facing 25 years for giving his login information to Anonymous. I use to work at a bank. I guarantee you if I'd given my work login info to Anonymous you'd want them to throw the book at me.Why do you value an employer who doesn't value YOU?It's like a fucking game of Ars Magica!&gt; In German it might be Benghaziuntersuchungsuntersuchungstor. 

German is *amazing.*it's [unconstitutional](http://www.nytimes.com/2014/12/04/us/politics/court-strikes-down-drug-tests-for-florida-welfare-applicants.html) to test all welfare recipients, so they're only testing the people who admitted to illegal drug use.SCOTUS has already ruled that it's unconstitutional for states to require drug tests in order to receive welfare benefits. That's why TN only tests the people who admit to drug use.&gt; No, the testing simply shouldn't be.

This is the correct answer. SCOTUS has already ruled that it is unconstitutional for states to drug test welfare recipients.SCOTUS has ruled it's unconstitutional to just drug test every welfare applicant. So they only test the people who admit to using drugs.Am I the only one in this thread who knows SCOTUS has ruled that drug testing welfare applicants is unconstitutional? That the states must show a need or an indication that welfare recipients are more likely to use drugs, which is why they specifically ask the applicant if they do drugs? SCOTUS has ruled that it is unconstitutional for states to blanket drug test all welfare recipients. That means states specifically ask if the applicant uses or has used illegal drugs, and they use that as (essentially) probably cause to drug test them.SCOTUS has ruled that it is unconstitutional for states to blanket drug test all welfare recipients. That means states specifically ask if the applicant uses or has used illegal drugs, and they use that as (essentially) probably cause to drug test them.&gt; It should have been randomized. 

It's literally unconstitutional to randomly drug test welfare recipients. States have to have a reason to drug test someone, which is why they ask that question. SCOTUS has ruled it unconstitional to drug test welfare recipients unless there's a demonstrated need. Like they answer "yes" to that "do you take drugs" question.I have compassionate conservative Christians in my family who are in favor of drug testing all welfare recipients. I so very badly want to ask them if that's what Jesus would do.

And yeah, it's a fucking non issue. Heh, that's a really good point.One of my oldest friends had similar thing happen to him. Actually, both him and his sister. Except it wasn't their sibling, it was their dad. He seriously fucked them. Took out full POAs on them when they were 18/19 and visiting England for the summer. He'd told them they were partial POAs, but he switched out the signature pages. He put his house in their names, and then didn't pay for it for almost 2 years. He also had both of them take out student loans that he said he'd repay. He also took cash from one of them when she got her first job and told her he'd write the IRS a check for her federal taxes, which he never did. When he died, they found out they were literally hundreds of dollars in debt, and past due tens of thousands of dollars to the IRS, their student loans, and the lenders on the house. Their dad had also neglected to pay his own income taxes, or property taxes, for nearly a decade. Fortunately, it all worked out in the end, but I just can't imagine a parent doing that to a child.Don't worry, it probably never even happened.More like Chaotic Bullshit.Similar thing happened to me, only not as justice porn-y. A few years ago a lady made an illegal left in front of me and I hit her car. It was totally her fault, 100%. I broke my ankle and my car was totaled. (I hit her in the front panel, where the engine is. Her car was also old, and mine plastic. It didn't stand a chance.) She didn't have insurance, and her registration was expired. She also didn't have a cell phone; she literally interrupted my husband on the phone with 911 to ask if she could call her daughter. 

In Washington state, if you're uninsured and and are at fault in an accident that does $750 in damages OR causes an injury, you will lose your license for 3 years. My insurance also sued her for the cost of the vehicle, my medical expenses, and for pain and suffering. That woman was already poor, and I'm sure this ruined her financially, not to mention she couldn't drive for 3 years.Don't dream it, be itMy cousin married his first ever girlfriend. They started dating in 9th grade. They've been together longer than I've been with my husband, and we've been together over a decade now. And, yes, they're still together. They just made a baby!Congratulations! You're now old enough to literally ruin your life. Try not to do that. Well, between her $750 fine and the fact that her car wasn't drivable, I'm guessing she didn't have the money to repair it. At least not right away.I doubt she could afford to repair her car. She also got a $750 ticket. I'm a woman, and I totally agree.Yes.No, you're thinking of douching. I"m just talking about washing the exterior.I think at this point you can remove the quotation marks.People have a problem with it for numerous reasons, not the least of which is it's unconstitutional.&gt; I'm willing to bet you the choice to take debt to court is done by algorithm by most of these companies. And I'll also bet "are they black" isn't in the computer code. It's "if(expected recovery)/(court cost)&gt;1:then(take to court):else(write off)"

It's not an algorithm, it's a person making those decisions. Source: I used work to in collections, for nearly a decade. Yes, the employees look at numbers like balance and credit rating, but it's still someone having to decide to pull the trigger. 

We used to have a problem with fraud in Glendale CA. Actually, just a few zip codes. But because of the FDCPA, we couldn't refuse to lend in those zip codes because it would be discriminatory to the minorities who make up those zip codes. And the minority in question wasn't Hispanic, in case anyone is wondering.Heh, my grandfather lost a nut in his youth when a horse/cow/hoofed mammal kicked him in the sack. Didn't stop him from making 4 kids later.&gt; This is why the "but sport makes you healthy" arguement doesn't work

Most sports DO make you healthier. Just not football.Your dojo/school should have kicked that guy out. It's bad sportsmanship and he REALLY could have hurt you.Not to mention, I'm pretty sure Junior Seau would have happily traded his TBI for a sore shoulder.Imagine if a motivated kid put 20 hours a week into science instead of sports.&gt;  legions of soccer mom's will get freaked out that football might make the little kid too dumb to go to college so they will pull him out before he even gets on the team in middle school

You say that like this isn't something to freak out about.There's an easy solution to that: No more heading the ball. It definitely wasn't. The fire department had to pour sand all over the street to soak up gasoline.But that wasn't his point. You know what his point is, you're just trying to Hermione him.Oh my gods YES! WTF happened to him???And before that it was the lazy drunk German invasion! We even had a political party form in response to it.I'm sure he has no idea what a plurality is.They are. But that didn't stop Reddit from downvoting me to the negative teens for pointing it out. Unchecked GLOBAL population growth. Clearly, you haven't actually been listening to what we've been saying "for the last 50 years."&gt;  I live in one of whitest places in the entire midwest, and yet my city amazing diversity.

I live in Seattle, one of the whitest cities in the US. But the community college I attend is the most diverse in the nation. Literally 3/4 of my classes (all science) are filled with non-white kids and immigrants. I know people from all over the world and of every major religion. It's pretty amazing. In fact, my A&amp;P prof last week said, "If you have a problem with diversity, well, you should probably change schools."Why not? Why is your family so special that they got to stay?Because we're the wealthiest nation on earth, we helped cause this problem, and it's the right thing to do. It's called being a world leader.Obama in 2008 had more experience than all three of the candidates Kristof is talking about combined.I feel like XKCD needs to do a baseball version of that. "No batter has ever hit more than a single against a left-handed pitcher in the 3 o'clock hour of a fourth inning on the west coast."You don't think Trump and Fiorina are corrupt?I'm from San Diego, and my mom and I often talk about how easy it would be to switch to solar here. Every flat roof, every hospital, school, mall, and office building could have solar panels on top. Obviously not every part of the US can do this, but SoCal can.It's very likely NOT a person making a racist decision. But it doesn't matter, because the law states that a lender cannot take any action that has a disproportionately negative impact on a group. So if say BofA decided to set repo parameters to Y, and that meant that Hispanics were disproportionately impacted by those repos because most people who met Y criteria were Hispanic, that's illegal. Conservative America -  Where the rights of a fetus far outweigh the rights of the adult woman carrying the fetus.&gt; more adorable child care

I think America needs this! My mom is *incredibly* religious. But she understands that evolution is a thing and that the Bible isn't literally True.

On the other hand, my oldest brother believes the world is 10,000 years old and that Jesus rode a dinosaur. 

There's a difference between religious and insane.Uh, we're explicitly talking about refugees legally allowed to seek refuge in the US. &gt; Like by loaning when they normally wouldn't, they repossess more against that group.

Except historically they lent to everyone but only went after minorities. Or they charged minorities more, while using statistics as justification. I don't think that happens too much these days at the big banks because they get their underwriting requirements from corporate, but I bet it still happens at small local lenders.I've only ever had good interactions with cops who've pulled me over. One time I was driving home from work at sunset, driving west. I was trying to turn onto a side street and stopped at a red left turn light behind 5 other cars. I drive this route every day, and usually the left turn light stays green for all the cars in the lane because it's a popular route to take. But the sun was setting and it was highlighting gunk on my windshield, and I couldn't actually see the light. When the cars in front of me went, I went. And when I was halfway through the intersection the sun went behind a tree and I was shocked to find that the light was red. Motorcycle cop pulled me and the two cars in front of me over. He hit me up first, and I explained what happened and he just let me go. I think he saw the shocked look on my face when I saw that the light was red. I *totally* deserved that ticket, and he absolutely let me off the hook. [Red Light Cams Linked to Increased Rear-End Collisions in Chicago](http://time.com/3643077/red-light-cams-rear-end-collisions-chicago/)Actually, it's that people are so scared they're going to get a ticket, they slam on their brakes and get rear-ended. &gt; This is what drives me nuts about the conservative message these days - people will roll their eyes and say things like "47% of all food stamps recipients have flat screen televisions." No shit - why should these individuals not be allowed any form of luxury or recreation?

Not to mention, a flat screen TV is a very good investment in entertainment. You can get 50,000 hours of viewing out of a flat screen.Then what IS the point? Because all TVs now are flat screens, which means people are bitching that poor people have a TV at all.That may be True, but it's a stupid requirement when other states have legalized recreational use of the drug.&gt;Police say the 66-year-old owner of the cat, who lives within a block of the incident, called to report that he believes he was the owner of the cat identified in media reports, and Kitsap County Animal Control has confirmed that the cat was his.

Fucking hell, that's heartbreaking. This is part of why my cats are indoor only cats.&gt; she's the only person who put herself in this situation

No, the guys who decided to rape her unconscious body put her in that situation. She chose to to take the Xanax, but they chose to rape her. It was their decision.&gt;"If you don't drink alcohol, you reduce your chances of becoming a (sexual assault) victim by 99.9 percent,'' Hood said.  

How about, "If you don't rape, you reduce your chances of becoming a rapist by 100%." 

Edit: Thought of a great different version. "If you don't drink alcohol, you reduce your chances of becoming a rapist by 99.9%" Why is it that it's the victims who are expected to abstain from alcohol? Why not the people doing the raping?LOL! That was awesome!I think it was before that, actually. Sadly.I totally gerunded her name.Other states seem to be able to prescribe pot without getting sued.I used to know a guy who was an RN. He was originally from Afghanistan but moved to the US when he was 10. He would work in the US for a while and save up money and then spend a year in Afghanistan providing medical care for the people. He said people would pay him in goats and chickens. He wasn't even a doctor, but he was the best they'd ever seen.Okay? I'm not sure why you responded to my comment about the legality of blanket drug testing with this?&gt; Just like someone with bad eyesight shouldn't be a pilot.

No, that analogy is bad. It would be akin to saying 'If you're a bad cook, don't be a chef."Did you know that grapefruit can fuck with prescription drug efficacy?Chopped is one of two reality shows I like. The other is Face/Off.I love how the two about the wife totally play up to stereotypes about women.If I was a guy, I'd be really offended that people think this way. Like, all men are just one passed out woman away from turning into a rapist.Did your lab not use different samples for each group? Because mine did. Woman ARE taught to be careful. Nobody is saying don't teach them stuff. We're just saying that the focus shouldn't be on making sure women alter THEIR behavior. "Why should I change my name? He's the one who sucks."But, essentially what you're saying is that EVERY neighborhood is a bad neighborhood for women, so long as men are around. The constitution does actually say we have a right to privacy, and freedom from searches without probable cause. People's whose job it is to determine this shit has ruled more than once that you can't just drug test people for no reason, including if they apply for welfare. So, you're just going to have to trust those subject matter experts, because you are not a constitutional lawyer.&gt; Sometimes I want to tell them yo relax, I'm just minding my own business. 

That's just what a rapist would say!!!

In all seriousness, though, there's nothing you can do to make us women feel better in that kind of situation. We've spent the entirety of our lives since we learned that rape is a thing that we need to be careful when we're out in public. Keep your keys in your hand with your car key pointing out in case you need to defend yourself. Get mace if you feel extra unsafe. Always park under a light in a parking lot. Don't go anywhere alone at night. Be aware of your surroundings at all times. Keep track of where people are and where they move to. This is shit I do every single time I go out alone at night."But it's still kinda her fault for doing what guys do without thinking twice about it."These are things we only teach women. Guys can get blackout drunk and if he gets raped, nobody says, "You dumb fuck, don't get blackout drunk!" We say, "Oh, that's terrible!" and that's it. There is a double standard for men and women regarding their behavior. And that double standard is why the cop said, "If you don't drink alcohol, you reduce your chances of becoming a (sexual assault) victim by 99.9 percent" instead of "If you don't rape, you reduce your chances of becoming a rapist by 100%." Heh, it wasn't even bird shit or anything. Just a weird film left by dun Dun DUN me cleaning the interior of my windshield a couple days earlier. Shades wouldn't have helped.No. Nobody is saying that. Women are all already taught to be careful. And yet they still get raped. Not to mention, everybody is taught basic home security, but only women are taught to never ever go to the bathroom at a bar by herself (etc).&gt; If someone cared as much about the sanctity/inviolability of their own body, as much as they care about their car, their wallet, or their iPhone, then they'd undertake the same basic precautions to avoid victimhood against both crimes.

You say that like we women don't already take precautions. 

*does Shane from The Walking Dead impression* 

Lemme ask you somethin. Do you ever go to the bathroom at a bar by yourself? Do you leave your drink unattended? Do you go out to bars alone? Do you just park wherever the fuck you want at night? And at night, do you walk to your car without a care in the world, not worrying about what that guy across the way is up to, not holding your ignition key in your fist *just in case*? Because these are all things women are taught to do starting in high school. A few weeks ago, Reddit was in an uproar because the University of California made that "yes means yes" rule. This exact incident is why they felt the need to do that. Four college guys thought it was a great idea to fuck an unconscious female student. Oh, you poor babies. Do you know what women are taught? We're taught to never go to bars alone. We're taught never to go to bar bathrooms alone. We're taught never to leave our drinks unattended. We're taught to not accept drinks we didn't see poured. We're taught to always park our car under a light. We're taught to walk to our cars at night with our ignition key in our fist in case we need to stab a guy in the carotid artery. We're taught to not walk to our cars at night alone, not at school, not at work, not at the movies.

So forgive me if I'm crying crocodile tears over your "don't rape" education.Why do you think you know more about my car accident than I do?

The woman I hit got 2 tickets totaling $750, for failure to yield and failing to maintain insurance on her vehicle. It's right on the police report. In addition, her vehicle wasn't drivable, my vehicle was totaled, and my insurance company sued her for pain and suffering and the cost of my vehicle. Good heavens, you're dense.Fun Fact: Brian Banks still isn't a rapist. I didn't say "no harm done." I said he wasn't a rapist. Your analogy was bad, and now you're moving the goalposts.&gt; there probably wouldn't have been an assault if the victim didn't knowingly consume Xanax and alcohol.

It was definitely a rape (four rapes, rather) of opportunity.&gt; So your argument is that since we're doing a disservice to men by not teaching them these things, we shouldn't teach anyone?

No, that's not at all what I said. Everyone should be taught basic personal safety. &gt; The saddest part is in this thread you have people saying women need up go out of their way and be more cautious to prevent rape and then you have people criticizing women for being overly cautious.

That is an incredibly astute observation.And my entire point is, Women already protect their shit. Men need to rape less.Maybe it's the guys who shouldn't drink, so they don't accidentally turn into a rapist.They sure did. Or -yan.Nope, not Asians. Not Asians, actually.Haha, no worries, man! They have that at the zoo, too! It's great!Because only one person in a household is allowed to watch tv, right? &gt; I don't really believe the rapists get as drunk as their victims, that would be contrary to their plans.

You are assuming the rapists planned to rape someone. I would expect a huge proportion of rapes occurred because the guy is drunk and doesn't know when to stop, or his inhibitions are lowered and he doesn't care to stop. 

&gt;You people are hard to understand. 

Really? I feel I've made my point pretty well. Maybe the problem is on your end?

Sure. But nobody chooses to be a victim, whereas people choose to be rapists.Please. We have a civil society. Some things are just imperfect. Hyperbole doesn't help anyone.&gt; Yes the whole point is to make it as difficult as possible for Sea World to improve the life of the whales

If Sea World gave a shit about improving the lives of the whales, they'd have already done it. 

But yes, the goal is no captive orcas, because living in captivity is detrimental to their physical and mental health. They are actually *less* healthy in captivity than they would be in the wild, which is exactly the opposite of most captive animals (at least in the US).What a fine detective he is!It's a War on Police!Yeah, but I work in a chem lab so my favorite documentary is Breaking Bad: The Story of How Walter White Became Heisenberg.Except that the "Wild West" had practically no checks and balances on police. Really? You think Americans in 2015 are dumber than Americans in 1950? Also, the violent crime rate is the lowest it's been in decades.Right?!? It's only been 10 months. She should still be in quarantine!Literally nobody said that, for two reasons. One, vaccines can't cure someone who is already sick. Two, she didn't receive an experimental vaccine. Now, she *was* treated with experimental antiviral drugs. Is that what you're thinking of?Apparently this woman was actually really responsible and took her illness seriously.&gt; The left really needs to clean up house, their SJW crazies are off of the leash and are making a mess everywhere. 

Really? What a terrible mess, pissing their pants in anger on the internet. Call me when they take over the Democratic party the way the Tea Party has taken over the GOP.If Soul Man was okay, White Chicks was okay.Because you may as well be arguing that the earth is flat. Vaccines are very solid science. They've saved millions of lives in the US alone, billions worldwide. It's exhausting arguing with the same knuckleheads over and over again about vaccine safety, because those people don't listen to reason or facts or use logic.Herd immunity. Look it up.&gt; I have friends who railed about it online and then moved out of state.

Did they actually move out of state, though? The one anti-vaxxer I know is in CA and she's not going anywhere. I actually booted her from my Facebook because I got tired of how every other post was some bullshit anti-vaccine wharrgarrble. I had tried to assuage her concerns in the past, and she actually deleted my comments fro her post. So, fuck her. I'm out.You're either really gifted at sarcasm, or really bad at trolling.No white people would ever vote for a black president! It is known!And Republican!Those are literally the words that went through my head, too.I don't remember him being this awesome the first time around, but I was a small child back then.What about him?Yeah, think of the young people brought here as small children who have no memories of their home nation and have only known what it's like to live in America. You gotta be a bleeding-heart liberal to think of *those* people!Yeah, if we had gone full Alexander the Great, Iraq wouldn't be in the midst of a civil war right now. (I am not suggesting we should have gone full AtG.)It is definitely easier to kill lots of people at once now. Fortunately, apparently the rate of mass shootings is actually staying steady.How would your parents have stopped a legal adult from renting an apartment?The actual percentage required varies by disease. But, yes, herd immunity requires a certain vaccinated threshold be met.So your parents aren't idiots, but they'd let you smoke pot (which does in fact change the brain in young adults) but they wouldn't let you move out on your own and be a legal adult. Okay then.It went against the anti-cop circlejerk of Reddit. I expected it, sadly.Are we basing the civility of our entire nation on the actions of one man? Is it? What's wrong with an 18-year-old acting like the adult he is?Well, Canadians have totally different anatomy and physiology than Americans. It is known.Damn, dog, ~~in~~appropesYes, I definitely know the difference between the Romans and that Macedonian guy who was the son of Phillip and Olympias who conquered multiple nations and then died of a fever at age 32. 

I was referring to the fact that Alexander crucified [2000 civilians after sacking Tyre.](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Siege_of_Tyre_%28332_BC%29#Conclusion_of_the_siege)

Edit: Also, who the fuck said anything in this thread about the Romans?*puts away ripped jeans, flannel overshirt, metal band tour shirt, and black 10-hold Docs.*Fuck you, dude, I'm not 55!To be fair, the surface of Venus is like 850 F and it pours acid rain there.Actually, Disney dropped it *before* it didn't perform better. Weeks before release, Disney pulled practically all marketing for it. We need to bring that shit back. (Not V, week-long miniseries.) The best shows are the ones where the story is planned well ahead of time and they create a proper arc. I much prefer the way the BBC does it with stuff like Broadchurch.The central topic is "Hey, Zach, I knew your dad, and your mom is fucking nuts."I watched it a second time when I realized that Lucius Vorenus is the cat piss guy.My husband and I actually hardly ever dine out. But we love to cook, and we cook better than pretty much all inexpensive restaurants. Fucking hell. It is in fact 11:52 pm, and I swore to myself I'd go to bed at 10:30 because I've average 5 hours of sleep this week.

*doesn't turn off monitor and go to bed*There used to be a Mexican place in San Diego that had a big billboard that read, "We're so hot, we'll burn you twice!" I never ate there.Native Californian currently living in WA. I definitely still conserve water. It was beaten into my head as a kid and now it's just routine.That's pay TV. I'm talking about broadcast or just basic cable. Just finished Fargo S1, and it was awesome!Did you ever stop and consider that there were *legal* reasons why the guy wasn't allowed to smoke pot at the house? Like, security clearance reasons? No, you just assume it's my aunt being a bitch.It's not glorification of thug culture, it's poverty. The vast, vast majority of blacks aren't in gangs.You realize that Americans can be accepting of brown immigrants and also oppress black Americans, right?These people want everyone to think that America's attitude towards blacks changed the moment the Civil War ended. They pretend that black people have had all the same rights as white people for 150 years now. The reality is that blacks *still* have fewer rights here than whites. Yesterday in a thread on askreddit, someone posted a link to a CNN article from 2009 about how a supervisor at a factory made the black employees go 5 floors down to use the bathroom, a bathroom which wasn't kept up or cleaned regularly. The whites got to go up one floor to a very nice bathroom that required a physical key to be opened. And the real kicker is this happened in Philadelphia for over a decade in the 1990s and 2000s. And let's not go into detail about how shitty schools are in black neighborhoods because black people don't have fancy houses and fancy property taxes to cover their schools' expenses. Or how the cops stop blacks much, much more frequently than whites do. Hell, NYC stopped and frisked more black people than there were black people living in NYC.

Black people are still oppressed in the US. Sure, it's to a lesser extent than it was in the 1950s, but it's still definitely happening. But these white people on Reddit don't want to hear that, because that means they're part of the problem. It's much easier to just blame blacks and say they're shitty people.No, it's because America doesn't give a shit about black people. That's why Black Lives Matter is a thing.&gt; the only reason the US isn't like Greece is because it's a world superpower. 

You have no idea what you're talking about. So stop talking.Why is that contradictory to you?In the UK.Really? The woman, who didn't rape anyone is worse than the guy who raped the girl numerous times and impregnated her?I have no idea why you're getting downvotes. She probably included loans to live on while going to school.You have no idea how many times when I was a collector that I'd encounter debtors who had no idea what interest was, or that it even existed.The Doctor.We let them out after a couple of years and then let them get back to their lives.I'm on a List because I work in a chem lab. It really doesn't bother me. It makes sense to log who has regular access to stuff that's very dangerous.You say that like it's not noteworthy and unique.It's like the guy has never heard of Lord of the Rings.I watched all three Lord of the Rings movies at least 5 times in the theater. The first two I watched six times because of the extended editions. For some reason, they didn't do an extended edition for ROTK, or at least it wasn't available in my area.

Why? Because those movies are fucking awesome. I waited my whole life for movies like that, and I wasn't going to miss my opportunity to revel in that awesomeness.Yeah, I agree completely. Even if you somehow magically procreate with yourself, you won't end up with a clone, because of [chromosomal crossover](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Chromosomal_crossover). It's high school fucking biology, for pete's sake. &gt; We went to war against their home country

Good heavens. You do realize that their home country is America, right? George Takei isn't Japanese, he's American, born in Los Angeles. 

That fact that you'd make such a ridiculous statement makes me want to ignore everything else you've said.Funny how you think that black people aren't stopped by the police far, far more often than any other demographic.No, she's just poor. 

Also, for the record, it's not like community college is cheap these days. My CC is &gt;$100/unit. A 15-unit quarter filled with science courses costs more than $1500, and that's not even factoring the cost of books and that bullshit online access. My CC has a nursing AS that requires you to take 109 credits. That's over $10,000 in tuition alone. Thank you, that's exactly where I got that from.Ah, okay. That makes sense.And that's a very good point.I actually stayed all the way through D&amp;D, but I left 3 minutes into B:E.Do you know why I know that? Because I work in a chem lab, and that shit makes a real difference.Wasn't it called Your Operation, though? But yeah, I used to watch that on PBS when I was a kid. It was fucking amazing!My husband and I learned to cook from ATK (Cook's Illustrated) and Alton Brown. While True, they actually have a really good "behind the scenes" line of articles now. They had one with a woman who lost her legs in a train encounter, and a guy who spent months in a coma. Pretty fascinating to get that kind of persepective, IMO.I've noticed that /r/news has become fairly racist over the last month or so. I'm not sure what's going on. It's in every immigrant thread and every crime thread. *shakes head*No, it indicates a correlation between immigration and xenophobic, racist reactions.We didn't oppress and enslave other ethnic, racial, and minority groups for centuries.As I said, "It's much easier to just blame blacks and say they're shitty people."But institutionalized racism is why blacks are poorer than whites, which means it's blacks living in ghettos, and then they get arrested because they're easy targets, which means they find it even harder to find work, and then they're even more impoverished etc etc. It's a catch-22.I'll have to check him out!I would say it's a pretty generalized and accurate portrayal of the South. My brother grew up in San Diego in a middle class family with liberal leanings. He's lived in a shitty little town in Missouri for the last 25 years, and he's completely adopted the lifestyle. He came out for a visit this summer, and I shit you not, he said one day at dinner, "But seriously, all the blacks in our town are lazy drug dealers on welfare." His wife nodded sagely. 

Really bro? All 5000 black people that live in your town are lazy drug dealers on welfare? Hmm, I think your town might have a drug problem.Yep! I don't remember what that's called, but yes, minorities are always representative of their group, whereas white males never are. Even white women are stereotyped. They're women first and people second. There's an [XKCD](https://xkcd.com/385/) for everything!Also WA!WA has all mail in ballots, but you can still drive to the elections office and drop your ballot off.So they should be considered refugees...Sadly, I've had people here on Reddit tell me that little boy deserved to die because he was waving his toy gun around. Same reason why San Diego always plays second fiddle to Los Angeles. Just once, I want those fucking alien invaders to attack the **military** town of San Diego instead of LA. Dammit. What a shit blog post. Who the fuck is this moron?Okay, Ron Burgundy. ;)Nope. Nothing to eat, really.Is this /r/gifs? No? Then it's not a repost.There is an Old Town Trolley Tours thing you can do that'll take you to a variety of touristy spots in SD, including Coronado. It's a get on, get off whenever you want type deal, but it's a tourist thing so it's not cheap ($35 online).Apparently Albertsons did some shady crap after Haggen bought some of their stores. [Haggen is suing.](http://www.seattletimes.com/business/retail/haggen-sues-albertsons-for-1-billion-over-big-grocery-deal/)&gt; The options provided show so much turf, which is questionable in current drought conditions

Eh, it's probably more cost effective if they make a green park and then expect residents to have non-green lawns.Calc and organic chemistry are weeder classes. If you can't do well in them, they don't want you."O Chem killed my 4.0, but I can totally draw a perfect hexagon!"

But seriously, I'm a gamer, so that's a pretty handy skill.&gt; I just want a chemistry class that isn't just stoichiometry and energy equations. 

Yeah, that's called organic chemistry (as you're probably aware) and it's a very different animal from the mathy chemistry. It is quite challenging for the vast majority of students, which is why medical schools require kids to take it: If you're not smart enough to figure out o chem and do well at it, then you're not smart enough to be a doc.I have a history degree. I'm going back to get a BS in Nursing.FuckMy history degree is useless, except for winning arguments on the internet. As a happily married 40-year-old, sometimes reality lives up to the dreams. :)A former boss of mine used to call the lottery the dream tax. You pay your dollar and then you spend the next 5 days dreaming about what you'd do with that $234 million you're not going to win.I used to buy tickets from time to time. Then the grocery store I bought them from had a megamillions winner. I then realized that the odds of me being a second megamillions winner from that store would be astronomically tiny, so I stopped. I have bought a ticket since, and it's been at least 8 years."I just *heard* you get an erection, Archer!"THERE REALLY IS AN XKDC FOR EVERYTHING!!!A few years ago my 10-year-old cousin tripped and fell, and he cracked the dirt he landed on. "Look! I'm an Earthbender!!"That's True. But you said you wanted a chem class that's not stoichiometry and energy equations. That's the closest you're gong to get. Although, you're never going to get away from stoichiometry. No, if they thought he actually had a gun they 1) shouldn't have pulled up to within 4 feet of him and 2) should have actually given him the opportunity to drop the gun they thought he had. But they shot him within 2 seconds driving up.That's part of why I keep my cats indoors.Same for [octopodes](http://grammarist.com/usage/octopi-octopuses/)! Which my fucking computer apparently doesn't know.So, OP is wrong?That doesn't mean it has peanuts in it.Picture an atom in your mind. That picture is wrong, and society has known that for decades, but that stupid image is still what everyone thinks of when they hear the word, "atom."My brother lives in New Madrid county. It's about as South as you can get without being Mississippi.No, it wasn't. People already had CDs and laserdiscs.Halo: Reach is my favorite of the group, followed closely by 2.He was being a dick, though. Bullying people. I get where he's coming from, but it's still a pretty shitty thing to do.I agree with that completely.Haha, so True!Yes, the article addresses that.I do if it's a bug.And that's actually fine, because we are in fact speaking English. :)The kid's a ninja and he just moved to fast for the camera to catch him. You know, like Dash from The Incredibles.*shakes head*

I guess MT never considered the idea that God made humans smart enough to figure out canning, and that canning tomatoes for later use IS having faith in God. 

(I'm an atheist, just using logic MT should have used.)&gt; Self defense can be considered good cause outside of the major metro counties.

So you mean outside where all the university campuses are?No, actually. But don't let that stop your jerking.What would you have done if you did have your gun? America has a hardon for guns. I mean, guns are cool. But we've gone full retard about them. It's actually super duper close to 100%. But if your *algorithm* is fucked up, then you might get the wrong answer.I'm taking A&amp;P to become a nurse. The woman sitting next to me had a cold, and she was complaining that her doctor wouldn't give her antibiotics. She said, "I'm 38. I think I know when I need antibiotics." 

No, dumb bitch, you have a cold. The odds are you have a viral infection, which antibiotics don't help cure. You just need time. And this is someone who is a CNA. Should really should fucking know better. Although honestly, she's not the brightest bulb in the chandelier. She's also struggling with intro to chem, in chapter 1.You do realize that all children regardless of nation of origin are required to get vaccinated if they attend public schools in CA, right? So yes, they do care. I actually really love the way the BBC does TV seasons. Just write a story and then figure out how many episodes it needs. No filler, no stupid episodes that do nothing to further the plot. Just 8-12 hours of solid quality entertainment. Sort of like how Fargo, True Detective (S1) and Agent Carter did it.NOT REAGAN!!!! *GASP*I know, but I'm saying she SHOULD HAVE used her own logic.That is my understanding. And honestly, there's a difference between wanting to carry a gun around for your protection, and wanting to carry a gun around so you can get into a firefight with a dude who's intent on killing as many people as possible. There's nothing wrong with a CC person not wanting to take down a bad guy if their own life isn't in danger. I agree completely with that. Reddit loves the concept of armed civilians defending masses of students against crazed gunmen, but the odd of that happening are slim. Remember how the two assholes who shot up that Walmart killed a concealed carrier? CC is not the solution.Please name one CA college in a rural area.So he did nothing. Just like what the vast majority of carriers would do. And there's nothing wrong with that.I actually said the very same thing in [nother post hours ago](https://www.reddit.com/r/news/comments/3oaeni/gov_jerry_brown_bans_concealed_guns_on_california/cvvxxp6). There's no reason we should expect concealed carriers to be our saviors. Most people who CC do it for their own safety, not so they can get into a shootout with a crazy dude.It was a toy.Uh, every single UC school you named is in a city. I just had a guy tell me it wasn't a toy gun because it looked a lot like a real gun. *shakes head*I'm just going to say this as gently as possibly: You really have no clue what you're talking about. San Diego is home to the bulk of the Pacific Fleet, and houses the HQ for the Naval Air Force and Air Force Pacific. It also has the Naval Special Warfare Center. You know. the Navy SEALS. In addition, the bulk of the Navy's helicopter fleet is stationed in SD. As for the Marines, SD is home to both Camp Pendleton (with 42000 active duty personnel at any given moment) and MCRD (the place where they train new Marines on the west coast). 

There is no reason any invading alien fleet would attack LA and not San Diego. I'm not saying don't attack LA. I'm saying it's stupid that the aliens never attack San Diego. One of the reasons I like Battle: Los Angeles is they explicitly state that San Diego was already attacked and neutralized.Now you know how all women feel at night on campus. Really? You don't think women walk to their cars at night with their ignition key in their fist, *just in case*? You don't think women always park under the street light? You don't think women are keenly aware of their surroundings when walking to their cars at night? You must be a guy. Actually, you must be a pretty self-centered and oblivious guy, because I know plenty of guys who completely understand why women take such safety precautions at night. 

Oh, wait. [You're the same dude who told me that Tamir Rice's toy gun wasn't a toy.](https://www.reddit.com/r/news/comments/3oaexa/tamir_rice_shooting_was_tragic_but_reasonable/cvw0ckt) Based on the comments you've made just today, I'm guessing you're more than a little bit racist against black people and possibly Muslims. You post a lot in /r/TumblrInAction, so I'm guessing you're a guy looking to be outraged that other people have reasons to be angry.What the fuck does Trump have to do with this????&gt; you have never met some oncology terrorists who have to be validated as right.

YOu had me until you threw the word "Terrorist" out there. Why'd you have to go and do that? It casts doubt on your entire argument by making you look like a reactionary fool.He can't. For him to acknowledge the inherent racism against blacks in America would require him to acknowledge that he's part of the problem. Potato breadHaha NOICE!Not NJ, NYC. Seriously, I have visited numerous cities in the US, and only in NYC were the majority of people I encountered assholes. I even know a native New Yorker who once told me he intentionally sends tourists off in the wrong direction, because "If they're too stupid to know how to use a grid, they deserve to be lost." &gt; New Jersey is the most population dense state in the country. This is despite being in the bottom 5 of square miles (so least amount of land).

Uh, the reason why NJ is has the greatest population density is *because* of its small land mass, not despite.It might explain some stuff.Stephen Maturin and Jack Aubrey.Not women.I did see the map. It's not labeled "rural" and "urban." You're going to have to do better than that.&gt;  I think that was one of the main issues with Shane.

Shane was downright fucked in the head. He zoomed past that line you can't cross and retain your humanity, and he did early in S2. Rick still isn't where Shane was then, and Rick has bitten out a guy's throat.Go back to Storm Front, jackass.Dr. Bhamba: This is all my fault. I knew there was a problem with the pasta sauce, but I did not notify my superiors because, well, I'm a drug addict. My goodness, how I love the drugs. I would take them in my house. I would take them with a mouse.

Veronica: With a mouse, people. Now that's rock bottomIf that was True, then please explain all those Mormons in Utah donating millions to help get Prop 8 passed in California.And by "no expiration date" we mean it's happy just hanging around as it is and it won't react with anything or decay into something else.By "blowing some up" do you mean the walkers?Right?!?

The scary thing is, a few people have upvoted that guy, which means he's not the only one who's all Archer regarding helium. Exactly. He didn't NEED to kill Otis, he just couldn't figure out another way.  If you watch that scene again, you can see they're a good 20-25 feet away from the walkers. All they had to do was keep moving. Also, they kept taking potshots at the walkers. You know, the ones that were 20 feet away at worst. They should have saved their rounds and kept going, only shooting when they absolutely had to. 

Shane made a really bad decision that day, and I think he knew it. The broke when he shot Otis, and he never recovered. Between that and his obsession with Lori undid him. 

And I also don't believe that Rick would ever shoot an innocent person like that just so he could escape. Rick doesn't think that way. Rick may be the kind of dude to who breaks another dude's neck because that other dude is screaming about getting half is face eaten off. But that dude was already going to die, and he was going to get the rest of them killed, to. Rick *still* just doesn't kill people for fun and games.Okay. The way you phrased it made it sound like you wanted to blow up the helium. That's why you got downvotes.That would be radioactive decay, so, no.What's your point? Do you REALLY think white men never rape black women? And why are you even bringing race up in the first point? I didn't say anything at all about race. 

Based on the posts you've created since you made this account yesterday, I'm going to operate on the assumption that you're a conservative racist. If it walks like a duck and quacks like a duck, it must be a duck.Oh, it would be. Remember Carol blowing up Terminus? Yeeeeaaaaah!When I was a kid (1980s), we got to wear costumes, but it was a totally normal school day otherwise.It's actually the opposite of political correctness. It's because so many dick parents don't let their kids dress up and participate because Satan that the school district felt that it was unfair to those kids to continue. It's an example of one small group ruining a good thing for everyone. It's not just JWs, it's Christian fundamentalists. My cousin's stepfather refused to let her participate in Halloween when she was a kid because Jesus. And it wasn't just that she didn't get to participate, she had to watch her classmates participate. Imagine if you were the only kid not allowed to participate in Christmas, but you still had to sit around and watch the other kids eat candy, sing carols, and open presents. Her mom eventually let her just stay home from school on those days. 

And then fast forward a half a dozen years, and her stepfather absolutely allowed her little brother to participate in Halloween. It was just *Erin* who wasn't allowed, because her stepfather is a huge asshole. Fortunately, her mom divorced the stepfather, so only Erin's childhood was ruined and not also her adulthood.

Edit: I should add, they lived in NJ at the time, so it was extra hard on her because she was the weirdo in that regard. She was the only one not allowed to participate.This is a perfect example of a small group of assholes ruining a good thing for everybody. 

When my cousin Erin was a kid, her stepfather banned her from participating in Halloween. It's Satan's Holiday, you see. After a couple of years, her mom allowed her to just stay home from school that day, which made it a little easier to bear. Fast-forward several years and suddenly my cousin's little brother Mark *is* allowed to participate in Halloween. So it was only *Erin* who wasn't allowed to participate in Halloween. The day my aunt divorced her dickhead, hypocrite husband was a very good day.Enjoy your smog. Edit: Damn, dogs.Retarded Christian fundamentalists (specfiically the retarded ones) think it's an avenue to witchcraft. My cousin wasn't allowed to participate in Halloween as a kid because of her stepfather. Can you imagine getting to do Halloween all your life and then at 10 years old suddenly you can't? At least her mom eventually let her just stay home from school on those days. Of course, several years later when my younger male cousin was old enough for school, he was absolutely allowed to participate in Halloween, it was just my older cousin who wasn't allowed.Eh, the Germans didn't actually let the Jews convert. Once a Jew, always a Jew.A lot of people on /r/news don't like blacks, or Muslims, or Jews, or women. This place is kind of a cesspool.How about I enjoy breathing, instead?They could probably find a tanker truck of gasoline. Sure, half the gasoline will have decayed, but obviously the writers of TWD are ignoring that anyway, so why not? Just have them dump the gasoline all over the zombies and WHOOOF!Good lord, what are you, 7? Do your parents know you're on the internet?Yeah, and I bet their kids like broccoli better than chocolate, too. *shakes head*Ah, thanks. Edit: Jesus Christ, I'm downvoted for saying thanks to someone. Okay, and? 

I've lived in three states: CA, VA, and WA. Of all those states, WA has the stinkiest cars with the worst emissions. CA has worse smog due to population, but WA has really stinky exhaust. Just this morning I drove behind a guy belching blue-white exhaust. He even passed a cop, who didn't pull him over. 

Inspections exist for a reason, and they do help the environment.I just want clean air to breathe. Fuck me, right?Do you know what the word pretentious means? I'm guessing that since you used it in reference to me saying I didn't want to breathe smog that you don't. 

"attempting to impress by affecting greater importance, talent, culture, etc., than is actually possessed."

I'm not *pretending* to care about breathing clean air.I have a friend who swears that Obama only won in '08 because blacks overwhelmingly voted for him. He ignores the fact that even more white racist assholes *didn't* vote for Obama because he's black.It's no more irritating than John McCain bringing up every 30 seconds that he's a veteran and former POW.&gt;  I could have voted in 2008 and 2012, but I didn't care either way

Really? After 8 years of W and 12 years of GOP owning Congress and fucking up our country, you couldn't be bothered to vote?&gt;  if you have to have a text book to teach a class then you should be in a different profession.

Really? You don't think there's a perfectly valid reason to have a math or bio or chemistry text book for lower level courses?That teacher is a dick. I'm a science major and every single of my profs has told us on day 1 whether or not we'll be using the online portion of the text. They also tell us if we can prior editions to keep down costs. My school also has at least one copy of each current text book, so students can just use that if they don't want to fork out the money. Exactly. But they may have sat out and not voted at all. Instead, they went to the polls and voted for McCain so the black guy wouldn't win.Antibiotics don't have any effect on viruses.There is some evidence that happens. But that still doesn't lead to any mutations in viruses. Well, the important thing is that you get to feel better than me.It's not? Half our population is female and yet you think the president's gender doesn't matter?That's a good point. I just assumed that he was too young to vote for W, but you're probably right.On the flip side of that, when BankOne took over Chase, they started doing to departmental audits. BankOne had already been doing them, so we Chase folks really chaffed when they announced this shit. It was fucking *awesome* when our first monthly audit came back without a single derogatory mark. And the trend persisted for the rest of the time that that department existed. Yeah, that's right. BankOne canned that department and moved it to Phoenix, where it struggled so badly that the manager ended up getting forced out. They destroyed a very well functioning department to save a few bucks on rent, and it fucked them in the end. Fuck BankOne, and fuck Jamie Dimon.A video game company my husband used to work for had a round of layoffs. Turns out, one of the IT guys they let go was literally the only person who knew how to maintain the MMO servers. They called the dude the very next day and begged him to come back. He drove a hard bargain, made them give him a 20% raise and a signing bonus worth thousands of dollars. It was a good company, they just made a dumb decisions, and they paid for it.&gt; oh, i just finished saving up 800\u20ac to buy a violin.

You say that like it's a lot of money.I worked at BBV in the mid-late 90s. I once had a customer rent an R-rate movie and bring it back the day it was due and demand a credit because "it was inappropriate for his children." This guy pulled shit like this all the time, but I was just a CSR and the manager went ahead and gave him the credit. The fucker gets in someone else's line to check out, and what does he rent? Motherfucking Showgirls. It's been nearly 2 decades since that happened, and I'm still angry about it. 

Another time one of our semi-regulars didn't return two movies. He called the DM and swore up and down that he returned them. And because he was a semi-regular, the DM has us waive all charges for the two lost videos. A month later, Hollywood Video finally got up off their asses and sent down to us about 20 of our tapes our shared moron customers had turn in at HW instead of BBV. Sure enough, that guy's two tapes are in there. Next time he came into the store, we pulled him aside and told him about the Hollywood Video thing and he just laughed it off like our store didn't take a fucking hit for him. Dick. 

As an aside, the Hollywood Video store was full of assholes. We used to get their tapes all the time, and we *always* and *immediately* called them so they'd know. And they never called us, despite our store phone number being printed right on the case. They just gave zero fucks, and they intentionally fucked our collective customers over. It was fucking ridiculous. And years later when they went out of business, I did a little cheer. In my late teens and early 20s, I was friends with a trio of siblings. 2 guys and a gal, the gal being the oldest. We were all young enough that we got to know their families as well because we all lived at home or with family in the beginning. In our late 20s, the gal comes out, and her family has a hard time with it, but they don't disown her. During that whole Chik Fil A kerfuffle, one of the guys posts a picture on FB of him and his wife and kid eating at CFA on CFA Appreciation Day. I comment something like, "Dude, your sister and two of your other family members are gay. I can't believe you'd support CFA's anti-gay agenda over your family, including your sister." His response was, "Nah, it's okay. She knows we love her, we just don't love her lifestyle." How can you love your sister while also telling her you don't think she should be allowed to marry the woman she loves?*This* is the most satisfying "No" you've ever given? :(He's a white supremacist, so he probably thinks that's 12% too much. 

And I should clarify: This is a dude I knew in high school. We were barely friends then, and we're not friends now. We just met up on FB. I have since unfriended him due to his constant racist and sexist remarks. I guess I used the word "friend" as a way to indicate he wasn't just some random stranger I encountered on the internet. Yes, I know, because I live here. Wa still has the worst emissions of any state I've lived in, because their requirements are shit. And the fact that 90+% of blacks vote Democrat all time, even if the candidate is white.The GOP controlled Congress from 1994-2006. But my point is that this guy is acting like he's awesome because he lives comfortably on 15,000 \u20ac a year, and he threw that comment out there as proof that his life is great. He's like that young guy who got his tax rebate check from Bush and then took a photo of himself with a handful of 20s thinking he's a fucking badass because he's got $300.I grew up with a young lady named, uh, let's say Marie. Marie was one year younger than me, and we ended up working at Blockbuster together. One day we're at a company holiday party that our district manager was attending, and she talks about how she was a total alcoholic in high school. In front of the district manager. I thought that was dumb. But then a couple of weeks later we're at a birthday party and she says, "I'll do a quadruple shot of vodka! I totally used to do that in high school all the time!!!!" So we pour her a quadruple shot of vodka, and she immediately chokes on it and it slams up into her nasal passages. And that was when I realized she was completely full of shit.Driver Driver.My hick brother refuses to wear a seatbelt as a way of sticking it to the evil government. He also thinks the world is 10,000 years old, though.To be fair, I once had some guy tell me he liked my Pink Floyd shirt, and then say, "I love their first album, The Wall!" It may have been him trying to test my PF knowledge; he may have though I'd just found a neat rainbow prism shirt and was wearing it because I thought it was cute. But I wasn't sure, and I didn't want to make him feel bad in case he really didn't know, so I just let what he said slide. My husband's entire family used to give him shit for being a bookworm. Well, his parents were cool about it, and the entire family used to say, "[Mr. Damn_Dog_Inappropes] is going places!" but they still made fun of him for loving reading.The worst is when someone sees you yawn in class at 8am, and they ask "Tired?" and when you respond with "Yeah I think I got like 4 hours of sleep last night" they turn around and say, "I got 2." They *totally* set the entire conversation up so they could tell you they got 2 hours of sleep. I used to take a couple classes with a chick who did this all the fucking time, and not just with sleep deprivation. She'd ask how your weekend was just so she could tell you how shitty hers was. It was fucking obnoxious, and it got to the point where I'd actively avoid being near her.Spud?That's fair. :)No, the guy's just a dick. He's a Christian fundamentalist who thinks women should always be subservient to men. Meanwhile, he couldn't hold down a job (and still can't; he's unemployed, homeless, and living in a VA shelter because that's easier than getting a job) which meant my aunt had to work 60+ hours a week at two different nursing jobs to make ends meet. I have SO MANY STORIES about shit this guy did to my older cousin but not my younger cousin. It's not because he had a change of heart, it's because he's a dick and wanted my older cousin to be a diminutive good little girl subservient to the man "running" her household. (I put "running" in quotes because he didn't run anything except his mouth.) His son (the younger cousin) gets away with everything and is completely undisciplined. Meanwhile, my older cousin had to pay rent at 16, and was required to have a job, and wasn't allowed to have a bedroom door because when teenagers have privacy, they fuck and do drugs. 

Can you tell I hate that guy? I really hate that guy. I'm soooooo glad his life is shit.That's fucking hilarious!!It's a character in Trainspotting. Fuck off, you piece of shit. You probably say that because you have a kid somewhere you're emotionally and physically neglecting because you're just not ready to be a grown up.I had a really bad mycoplasma lung infections a few years ago. I was treated with clarithromycin, which works against bacteria (like mycoplasma) that have no cell wall. Turns out, beneficial gut bacteria often don't have cell walls, so I developed a mild case of colitis. The solution was to eat a container of Greek yogurt (with live cultures) with every meal until my bowels returned to normal. Between that and the prednisone (bad break out and really bad insomnia), I was miserable for about 10 days. Of course, I also felt like shit because my lungs were infected. So that was a really wonderful time in my life.These are exactly the assholes everyone was referencing when they called their Confederate flag a symbol of racism. These morons just proved their point.Yeah, I've looked into that, and it's some pretty fascinating shit. Heh.Well, are you going to Taco Bell every 10 minutes?I knew a Vern Jr. who had a half brother also named Vern Jr. His dad had a secret family. :(That's pretty adorable.Female gamers, UNITE! Now, you! You go make us a kick ass game, okay?!?I actually left Reddit for a while because of the sexism and racism. Came back with a new account a little while ago and I feel like it's actually worse than it was before. Every day in /r/news there's some shithead talking about how blacks commit more crimes than whites. Yesterday I had someone tell me that blacks rape more white women than whites rape black women, in a thread that had nothing to do with race. Like, why the fuck bring that up except to spread hatred and fear of blacks?Yeah, heaven forbid he grow as a person.I feel like the only people who get angry over political correctness are the ones who want to be able to just spew verbal diarrhea everywhere without consequences.Oh, but he was one of the "good ones."And Jimmy Fallon! And James McAvoy! And Colin Hanks! And Jamie Bamber!Exactly. I've owned 4 different digital cameras, but now that my cell phone has a decent camera on it, the odds of me buying another digital camera are remote. I haven't had a land line in nearly a decade. My husband and I are slowly converting our library to digital to conserve space (and our sanity). In just the course of a few years, all those items are obsolete. I do still have a Thomas Brothers Guide, but it's pretty old and outdated at this point.My boss and I were talking about how live in the future, and I said, "For Christ's sake, I carry miniature computer in my pocket all the time now!!" I bet Gene Roddenberry had no idea tricorders were only a few decades away.The most delicious kind of technically!We'll get that when we get to "Carl's, Jr. Fuck you, I'm eating." and Ruddfucker's.&gt; And God won't save people who actively refuse him, because they are exercising their free will to do so.

See that right there? Fuck that. I could be a (non-canonized) saint and that wouldn't be good enough for God. I'd be sent to Hell along with Hitler and Jeffrey Dahmer just because I choose to not believe. That doesn't make me want to worship your god. That makes me think your god is an unjust and spiteful jerk.&gt; Even if your god rewards good people who don't believe, why is the belief required in the first place?

Honestly, I feel like people who were good simply for the sake of being good without any promise of eternal happiness deserve eternal happiness way more than people who were only good in order to gain access to Heaven. But then I'm a non-believer, so of course I'd say that.What I can't believe is that I have a higher tax rate than Mitt Romney.Well, seeing as how humans have only been around a few hundred thousand years, I can honestly say the Himalayas existed during Noah's lifetime. Also, we're talking about religious people who think the Earth is 10,000 years old.But to the residents of the area, it would seem like a worldwide flood. I'm atheist though, so I don't really have a horse in this race.My dad would pause when talking and it often seemed like he was done because it was the end of a sentence. So you'd chime in and he'd get mad because he wasn't actually done, he just decided to pause for 10 seconds for no reason.Did you miss the fact that they became uncontained?Flammable liquids/gases are actually superduper common, though. They wouldn't need to use gasoline. They could use propane or sterno cans or white gas or god damn ethanol. I mean, we kind of got a little taste of that from This is the End, didn't we?No, not really. They're just two black and white images of two different quarries. They don't really have anything else in common.But it's not the restraints of their own making. There's still system-wide repression of black people. And let's not forget how blacks are unfairly targeted by our "justice" system. During NYC's stop and frisk program, they stopped more blacks than there were blacks living in the city. Meanwhile, [blacks receive much harsher sentences than whites for the same crimes](http://www.wsj.com/articles/SB10001424127887324432004578304463789858002).But seriously, nobody expect the Spanish Inquisition!In 2010, he had a tax rate of [14.1%](http://money.cnn.com/2012/09/21/pf/taxes/romney-tax-return/) on income of $13.7 million in 2011. His 2010 tax rate was 13.9%.Thanks, man! :)Well, he's unemployed and homeless. I feel like he's popped himself in the mouth. And the balls. And the wallet.But blacks don't vote for the Republican candidate, [they overwhelmingly vote for the Democratic candidate](https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/the-fix/wp/2015/07/07/when-did-black-americans-start-voting-so-heavily-democratic/), by a margin of 3 to 1. McCain was NEVER going to get 95% of the black vote. From your link, it shows that 2.1 million additional blacks voted in 2008 compared to 2004. So even if 95% of those 15.9 million black votes went to Obama instead of the typical ~80% that normally voted for him (in addition to the 2.1 million new voters), it wouldn't have closed the [9.5 million vote difference between Obama and McCain](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/United_States_presidential_election,_2008).Instead of posting in the threads that piss me off and therefore getting downvoted to oblivion, I should probably just check your links out. Thanks! And thanks for saying so! It's so easy to do the opposite on the internet.I will keep that in mind!He also refused to release his tax returns for 2009, the same year rich people were granted immunity from hiding their money overseas so long as they brought it back over to the US and paid their taxes on it. I have no evidence that that's why Romney didn't show us his long form tax certificate, but why else would he hide that shit when everybody else published theirs?He's a video game writer! The rest of his family are factory workers and manual laborers. So, while most people don't think writing video games is particularly glamorous, his family does. Good for him. Kim Davis could learn something from this guy. It seems like a pretty legitimate apology to me. The language he used isn't the normal "nopology" bullshit we normally see. He actually called himself an asshole. I choose to believe this kid has learned a lesson and will strive to be a better human being form now on. Maybe you could learn something from him.True, but I wasn't trying to explain that. I have a brother who, as a mature adult, decided that his fundie church pastor was right and that the world is 10,000 years old. We weren't raised that way, but that's what he chose to believe. Again, I could be a perfect and good person, but because I don't believe in God, I'm going to hell. Fuck that.The cops pulled to within 5 feet of him upon arriving at the scene. Less than 2 seconds later they shot him dead. They SAY he was reaching for his gun, but they also SAY that they told him to drop his weapon. 

If your gun is in your waistband, how do you drop it without reaching for it?

Of course that's a moot point because they shot him less than 2 seconds after pulling up to him, so it's not like they even gave him the chance to drop his weapon. They just killed a 12-year-old kid for no valid reason.&gt;  And I actually have ADHD. You cannot play video games if you have this.

That's complete BS.Juveniles are either children or they are adults. If we're going to hold them accountable for their crimes and send them to prison for the rest of their lives, then we need to let them vote, smoke, and drink. They're either adults or they're not. No more of this worst of both worlds bullshit.This is pretty sketchy. I'm guessing shenanigans.&gt;\u201cI was at a party recently, and it was difficult to hold my hors d\u2019oeuvre plate,\u201d she said.

Is this real life?Every time there's a gun-related accident, the owners of the gun should be held legally accountable.And? They're still children. We should either treat them as children, or treat them as adults. None of this bullshit in between where they get the worst of both worlds.I'm most definitely an atheist. What I'm trying to figure out is why people like you believe, even though you know your God would send good people like me to Hell simply for not believing. How is that a good and just God? How is that a God worthy of your worship?Well, I don't swat people, so I have no idea what their motivations are for doing so.Open your eyes

Edit: IT'S THE NEXT LINE OF THE SONG, PEOPLE!How is a robber stealing your weapon a gun-related accident?You seem to think there was a valid reason for cops to pull up within in 5 feet of a 12-year-old boy and shoot him less than 2 seconds later. His point was these people who work 60 hours a week at minimum wage aren't working ONE job and getting overtime. They're working 2 jobs and NOT getting overtime.If someone has to work 100 hours to make ends meet, how are they going to do training "on the side?" In my youth I did the "multiple part-time jobs with no benefits means I work 60 hours a week" and I had no free time at all. I was also constantly exhausted and sleep deprived, and I didn't get any overtime for those extra hours. I was fortunate in that I could just move back home with my parents, but not everyone can do that.But how could they even see the gun if it was stuck in his waistband? And cops give *adults* more than 2 seconds to respond to a request. There was no valid reason for them to shoot that kid. And it's basically a repeat of the Ken Starr investigation of Bill Clinton, which is why they tried to impeach Clinton for lying... about a blow job. They were looking for *anything* to hang Clinton with, and the best they got was him getting a beej from someone other than his wife and then lying about it.Yes, exactly. I know, because when I was 21, I did exactly that. Worked 2 jobs, got ~60 hours/week, got no benes, barely had enough dinero to make ends meet.The reality of the situation is that a cop fatally shot a child less than 2 seconds of arriving on scene. And if those cops *really* felt that their lives were in danger, why did they pull up to within a few feet of the kid?&gt; i understand that he has no understanding what time and a half is.

How many times does someone have to explain this to you??? 

People who work 100 hours a week aren't working one job and getting 60 hours of overtime, they're working 2 or more jobs and not getting any overtime at all. 

You ARE dense.Poor people should try Mitt Romney's suggestion: Just borrow from your folks!Right??? How dare politicians grow as human beings and change their minds about issues."Black Lives Matter? *ALL* Lives Matter, you racist shit!"How is that opinion a circlejerk? They all DO suck. The last thing America needs is another Bush in office. I'm not excited about another Clinton in office, but at least it's not another Bush. You mean the Benghazi scandal where over and over again they've found she did nothing wrong?Yes, lying under oath... about a blow job. People who work 100 hours a week aren't working one job and getting 60 hours of overtime, they're working 2 or more jobs and not getting any overtime at all. 

If you check your records, I believe my first warning was retracted. I called myself a libtard, and the mod thought I was calling someone else a libtard.Dude. You were the one who said, "[the "required hours per week" doesn't include overtime bonus pay (time and a half) someone would get for working over 40 hours](https://www.reddit.com/r/politics/comments/3ol5tm/you_have_to_work_100_hours_a_week_to_get_by_on/cvy6l4k)" so he was commenting on what YOU said. If the 100 hours isn't a valid point, then YOU shouldn't have brought it up. All he was doing was running with what you said.Possibly? It was nearly a month ago though so I'm not sure. Can you message me what I said in that comment?And my point is that despite an investigation that lasted well over a year, the worst thing they found was Clinton lying about a blow job.I'm still not sure why her following along with her constituency is a problem. Isn't that literally what politicians are supposed to do?I tried going back through my comments and my inbox, but it exceeded the number of comments Reddit would let me see. But, you know, those people should just invent a Time Turner or TARDIS so they can find the time to also get some training. How about you address the rest of what he said instead of cherrypicking one part of it?I can agree with that. You'd think after decades in politics, she'd know how to handle that kind of crap better.There's actually a story about [Newt Gingrich getting a blowjob in his car from another dude's wife while his own kids were hanging around outside the car](http://talkingpointsmemo.com/muckraker/newt-gingrich-s-second-wife-dishes-hard-to-em-esquire-em-his-money-woes-his-philandering-his-meltdown). But you know, gotta throw the book at Bill for doing exactly what those other guys were doing.IIRC, the Marine Corps requires every Marine to qualify every year. So maybe it's not constant training, but it's still something that needs to be maintained well enough to pass a test every year.Haha, RIGHT!? I had never even considered that point, but you're dead right!Also, if you're struggling to pass, don't they give you extra training until you do? It's not like they let you off the hook if you can't do it. 

/Not a Marine, just from San Diego and have known lots of Marines.I just remember vague stories of "He had to train an extra week to qualify" about people I only knew by name, rather than it having happened to any of my friends.Why the fuck was she spraying the people on the sidewalk rather than the people in the street?"It's almost 2012! You got to believe something!"

I do? Why? And I never understood why people get down on atheists for saying "Oh my god!" They're just words, and they're part of our collective culture. Of course, he probably gets pissed off when atheists say "Happy Holidays" instead of "Merry Christmas."He's wrong because humans didn't evolve from monkeys. Humans share a common ancestor with monkeys.And also because humans didn't evolve from monkeys, we just share a common ancestor with monkeys.I do know what literally means, and I literally meant literally.How DARE Hilary Clinton's opinion on gay rights change!I suspect the same thing, but I don't have any proof of that. I do know that while I was never opposed to gay marriage, there was a time in my life when I didn't even think it was a thing to be considered. It wasn't until the early 2000s that gay marriage became something the average American thought about, and I suspect the same is True for Hilary. Plus, she's in her sixties, which means she probably went a good 40 years without even thinking about two gay people getting married. It just wasn't a thing to consider even 15 years ago. That sounds mean, but I'm straight, and I was young so none of my gay friends had longterm SOs they were wanting to marry. I didn't say anything about letting them get away with anything. I"m just saying that teenagers are children, and it's a really shitty thing to sentence *children* to life in prison. My husband totally caught that! :D&gt; no appreciation for her exceptionally unique position

Are you daft? She mentioned *multiple times* the fact that her problems may not be relateable to most people because she's rich and famous.I'm not sure what this has to do with Jennifer Lawrence being too afraid of blowback to properly negotiate her salary.Maybe that was when she decided to become a strong negotiator.Congratulations, you found the ONE career that pays women better than it pays men. And JL isn't a porn star.So the other dude is even more retarded than I thought. Gotcha.Damn, dog, inappropes!*shrug*

I haven't seen that show, and I'm really liking Blacklist. Well, I mean, I did actually do SOME work to help legalize gay marriage. But I'm never giving up the fucking F word!I agree with the pictures thing. I don't think students really need to know what Leonardo DaVinci looked like. Maps are useful, diagrams are useful, photographs of portraits, not so much.Name one other career where women are paid more than men. And don't say something stupid like "egg donor".Yeah, that's a pretty shit article. Less a news article and more a blog post. You do realize it only takes one person to start a lawsuit, right?The only abortions getting done at 32 weeks are ones where the woman's life is at risk, or the baby is so fucked up it can't live. But you knew this, you just wanted to piss a bunch of people off by turning this conversation to abortion.GOOD JOB OP! You posted a blog post to /r/news. &gt; Edit: I'll take all my downvotes like an aborted child: without a say in the matter.

Oh, look how fucking whiny you are! &gt; That's not going to draw many liberals into the comments. They don't care about the officer. 

Wow, that's only slightly offensive.You're not a good person.&gt; I just don't commit criminal acts. 

But according to you, it's okay if people who don't commit criminal acts get executed for criminal acts they didn't commit. Yes. Currently [4.29%-6.84%](https://studentaid.ed.gov/sa/types/loans/interest-rates) depending on the circumstances.Good, I'm glad the family was able to make this work. (On the other hand, forcing the woman to remain alive against the wishes of the family is pretty horrifying. I've *very* glad this was what the family wanted.)And that makes you a bad person.Yeah, that's because it was an obvious straw purchase. The store was negligent and they deserve this.&gt;\u201cOh my goodness,\u201d the victim's mother, Shannon Hazen, told The Oklahoman **after first learning of the arrest from the paper on Monday**. \u201cYes! Yes! Yes!,\u201d she said, then began sobbing.

Damn, that's fucked up. How about a phone call to the family, dicks?No, you didn't, but you did get all smug and say shit like "I just don't associate with low lifes who would be found in a situation that would end up involving execution" and "The people aren't plucked off the street randomly. They had some sort of association which brought the penalty against them," implying you're somehow better than innocent people convicted of crimes they didn't commit. You're worse than those people. You are a bad person, and you should feel bad about who you are.This isn't news and doesn't belong on /r/news.Apparently there's [a formula you can use to calculate the number of calories needed to maintain your weight](http://www.livestrong.com/article/307924-how-many-calories-are-needed-per-pound-to-maintain-a-body-weight/). For inactive men, it's weightx13. This guy weighs 800 pounds, and 800x13 is over 10,000 calories per day to maintain his weight. Meaning, if he was eating only 2000 cals/day the weight would be falling off him. Well, America is supposed to be the top world leader. There was a [horrifying incident a couple years ago](http://www.nytimes.com/2014/01/08/us/pregnant-and-forced-to-stay-on-life-support.html) in which a woman was kept alive against her husband's wishes because she was pregnant. So he just admitted to me that he's a bad person but he doesn't feel bad about being a bad person. The guy's a fucking sociopath.&gt; The media only reports on the very isolated cases that don't.

Well no duh, because those are the gun shops where bad guys get guns. The media SHOULD shine a spotlight on those establishments.I supposed it's possible, but I don't think that's the case.Teddy is far too liberal for the modern GOP.It probably shouldn't be.&gt; One on hand hand

*quizzical dog look*Do you feel like you won the lottery? Because I feel like you won the lottery.Human Sexuality in community college a good 20 years ago. Prof said that "Gay guys are stuck in [Freud's anal stage of childhood development](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Anal_stage), which is why they're gay." I raised my hand and asked if women who like anal sex are also stuck in the anal phase, and he said no. 

I don't know what the correct answer is, but it's definitely not the answer he gave. And for the rest of the semester, I just memorized the answers he wanted to hear but I didn't take anything he said to heart.I, too, am the only person with my first+last name combination. My last name is weird and unique, but my first name is a less common spelling of a very common name. The combination means I better behave myself, or Google will remember.I know someone named "Jeffery." Oops.My husband and I get ground bison instead of ground beef when we're making burgers. YUM! (Ground bison isn't really worth it in some other dishes because the spices overwhelm the bison flavor.)Man, Japan *really* had to go far out of their way to bomb Pearl Harbor.Science nerd who works in a chem lab here. Everyone know what everyone else means when they use the term "hydrogen bonding." Nobody hears "hydrogen bonding" and thinks "Oh, two hydrogen atoms have bonded covalently to each other." You're just being contrary for contrary's sake.Australia used to have a [kangaroo-dog](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Thylacine), but humans killed them all.I have noticed that biology professors aren't especially good at chemistry. Edit: I have to say, I honestly expected downvotes for that comment. I am pleasantly surprised!I'm sure that's what he meant based on context, but "One on hand hand" is pretty fucking hilarious.Sooooooo, you wanted to steal from people and make the world a worse place?&gt; Adenocarcinoma, the most common pancreatic cancer, carries a very poor prognosis.

Yep, my dad lasted a whole 24 days after his diagnosis.I think your "I hope not" is being applied to the other guy's "When I or any of my professors says "Hydrogen Bond" everyone knows they are referring to intermolecular hydrogen bonding" rather than his "It might change from region to region."Thanks. It did in fact suck as much as you think. None of us kids even got to see him, it was that fast. A friend of mine had to do that once at work. Her "office" consistent of her and her boss, and he was out that day. She started choking on her lunch so she jammed her stomach into the edge of her desk. It totally worked, but she peed herself a bit because she was so scared. She then had to ride public transit home. 

And I swear that this happened to a friend and not me. Really. This is the internet. If it was me, I'd just say it.&gt; The not awesome part: You're responsible for EVERYTHING. No one will help you cook, clean, pay bills, etc... I've asked my cat and he flat out refused to make the bed one day. Pffftt. You have to adult all the time. 

On the plus side, when find that SO and move in together and he/she does half the chores around the place, you find that you have twice the free time! Which is especially awesome when you're in that honeymoon phase and you're doing it every night.Don't worry about it. My dad felt that way about his kids til they were ~16. &gt; He just stared at me, then looked at the screen again until I figured it out a couple of seconds later.

For some reason, I visualized Archer doing that.Yes, the drug penetrates the blood-brain barrier and makes you sleepy.Also, when you go to the grocery store, just walk out with the stuff that you need instead of going into the line and paying for it.Thanks. Its' been several years, so we're all pretty used to the "new normal" without him in our lives. And yeah, none of us kids got to see him either. 

Fuck cancer.Sorry, I really wasn't trying to wreck your day. It's been nearly 6 years now, so we're all pretty well adjusted to our New Normal without Dad. Death is a part of life, after all. Now's the time to see him and let him know how much you love and appreciate him.  :( I'm sorry you're going through this. Holy shit, that guy was in [Starship Troopers](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=w_urWSSZgwU).I've got your back

'Cause you've got mine, tooThere really IS an XKCD for every situation!Even better, some people were saying they should have used the helium tanks to blow up the walkers.*rubs head*Proof right there that even back in S2, Rick&gt;Shane.Damn. I'm sorry. :(Right!? I facepalmed.Hahaha, RIGHT!? How many times did they try to explain that to him and he just couldn't get it.It is? Hunh, TIL. Thanks. :)Respectfully, that seems like a pretty sweeping generalization. Got a citation for that?Between laundry, vacuuming the house, cleaning the cat box, cleaning the bathrooms, cooking, doing dishes, putting away dishes, yeah it adds up.It was enough that she had to go home and change clothes, but fortunately she'd chosen dark pants that day, so you couldn't really see any color difference.Uh, I'm gonna need a citation for Dixiecrats being way to reactionary for modern Dems.Where were you living when you encountered this stupid teacher?That's a great point!Wow. You're not kidding. There are exactly 3 posts in this thread (not replies, just posts) that have above 1 karma, and which means there are 58 shitty posts.If that's the case, then why aren't we allowed to bring guns into a courthouse, prison, capital building, or any government seat in the United States?Actually, it's to help pay for these same jerks who choose not to buy insurance but will end up needing health care services anyway.&gt; otherwise it will completely fall apart just like Republicans had warned about.

Which is why the GOP has refused to expand Medicaid in their states, which would have extended affordable health insurance to millions of Americans. They did it so it would seem like the ACA sucks, because it was passed by the Democrats.&gt; And the young. Don't forget the big push to get young healthy people onto the rolls in order to offset the costs of the older sicker people... 

Did you forget that college students get to remain on their parents' insurance until age 27?I live Renton (read: lower middle class area) and pay nearly $1500 for a 2/2. 4 years ago when we moved it, rent was only $1050.Soooooo, *not* ethnic minorities, then.The GOP doesn't give a shit when [their own lobbyists *literally* write laws](http://www.prwatch.org/news/2015/02/12743/wisconsin-introduces-verbatim-alec-right-work-bill).And? A whole fuckton of them don't.A few kilos of cocaine.Yeah, that's part of the myth of Oedipus.We had here in the US 100 years ago.

Edit: [1936](http://www.motherjones.com/mixed-media/2014/08/last-public-execution-rainey-bethea), only 80 years ago.The FLDS still do that shit.Poor [Dr. Semmelweis](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Ignaz_Semmelweis). :(It's a total bunch of crap.&gt;  He also said lapdogs came about as a way to get rid of fleas. 

Have you ever had a dog? Fleas are perfectly happy on both people and dogs. All you do by adding a dog to the mix is provide another place for those fuckers to live.That's complete [bullshit](https://historymyths.wordpress.com/tag/people-didnt-bath-back-then/). I'm going to need a citation for that.That's not a citation.Good job, you provided a link to a document that's a dozen pages long. What is the text I'm supposed to be looking for? Here's my solution for this mess: We're going to be renting a house with a friend next year. And those of us in that generation can enjoy getting shingles in our fifties. Meanwhile, those whippersnappers who were vaccinated and never got the chicken pox won't ever have to deal with that shit.I have a friend who got it at 27. While he didn't get as sick as you, he was still out of commission for 2 weeks.Don't feel bad about living with your parents. Use that as a way to pay off your student loans, or your first car, or save up for a big down payment on a house. I'm going to need a citation for that. A whole fuckton of old people die before even get back what they put in. For every 95-year-old grandma sucking off the government teat for 30 years, there's 100 grandma's who died at 71 and didn't break even.That's because Walmart shoppers aren't the ones who give a shit about that. If CostCo or Whole Foods did something like that, it'd work very well.I want to agree with that sentiment, but considering how the GOP has shit on Tammi Duckworth, a woman who lost both legs (and almost an arm) when her chopper was hit by an RPG in Iraq, don't count on it.

http://www.politico.com/story/2012/07/congressman-attacks-rival-on-war-record-078101

http://crooksandliars.com/2014/05/allen-west-doubts-legless-tammy-duckworths100% correct. Source: Am Portuguese-American Klingon. Remember when Russians used to buy a fuckton of Levis in the United States and then bring them home to sell at a huge markup? Same shit, different day. And [The Donald](https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/post-politics/wp/2015/07/18/trump-slams-mccain-for-being-captured-in-vietnam/) is carrying on the tradition.Thanks for the citation. Essentially, what's happened is that decades ago, retirees got more than they paid in because Social Security was invented while they were adults. If retirement program begins 20 years before you're supposed to retire, *of course* you're going to get more back than you put in. There's still a discrepancy, but it would be reduced if we increased the maximum taxable amount.Good! Stay with your parents long enough to put a down payment on a house. Don't get caught up in having to have your own apartment. It's a money sink, especially in big cities, and it'll delay your ability to buy a house. Trust me on that. Yeah, someone else posted a link that talked about how prior generations got way more back in SS than they put it. It's because those people were already adults when SS went into affect, so they missed out on decades of contributions. Also, we have fewer workers now than we used to. Yeah, I have family members who are veterans, and they bitch about Obama, but are surprisingly silent on how the GOP has blocked jobs bills for vets, or VA funding for vets, and shit like that.&gt; /u/kilbert66's deleted comment:

I can see his comment, and that it wasn't ever edited...I'm a 40-eyar-old woman, and if one gender has to register for the draft, they both should.

That being said, nobody should have to register for the draft. In this day and age, the government can find you if it wants you to "volunteer" to be in the military. I used to know a guy who was 5'6" and 145 lbs with his clothes on and soaking wet. Skinny as hell, not at all athletically inclined, not in spectacular shape. He was a Marine, a TOW Gunner to be specific. There's no reason he should be allowed to be a Marine infantryman and in combat when healthy female athletes aren't. There is no reason a guy with Daniel Radcliffe's body type should be a Marine, but a woman with Emily Blunt's body (or even Linda Hamilton from T2) should be excluded."[Sixty-one percent of women polled by Florida-based CapitalSoup.com and the Mason-Dixon Polling and Research firm want the draft opened up to women, compared to 35 percent of men... Eighty percent of registered Democrats support drafting women compared to 53 percent of registered Republicans.](http://thehill.com/policy/defense/307047-poll-majority-of-americans-support-women-in-military-draft)"

It's not feminists who are preventing this form happening. It's males, and it's Republicans.&gt; Social Security is fairly easy to save, either by removing tax caps or increasing the retirement age three years or so. 

Yeah, my retirement is already set to 67. My dad died at 71. There's no fucking way I'm working til 70. I don't see how I did that. "[Sixty-one percent of women polled by Florida-based CapitalSoup.com and the Mason-Dixon Polling and Research firm want the draft opened up to women, compared to 35 percent of men... Eighty percent of registered Democrats support drafting women compared to 53 percent of registered Republicans.](http://thehill.com/policy/defense/307047-poll-majority-of-americans-support-women-in-military-draft)"

It's not feminists who are preventing this from happening. It's males, and it's Republicans.&gt; Perhaps anticipating a very soon need for 100,000 troops for deployment in the near future?

We wouldn't need to institute a draft for 100,000 troops. We can do that in our sleep. In 2008, we had nearly [190,000 troops (see page 14)](https://www.fas.org/sgp/crs/natsec/R40682.pdf) deployed in Iraq and Afghanistan.Tammi Duckworth had her legs blown off in Iraq and nobody gave a shit, and now that she's a politician, the GOP shits on her for being a Democrat.Way to move the goalposts. First you said "Yeah feminists demand things like allowing women in combat roles for the "you go girl" factor but strangely go silent on things like requiring women to actually serve in combat should a draft come up." and then when I proved you were wrong, you said it didn't count. Good job.Dude. Just stop. You said, "**feminists** demand things like allowing women in combat roles for the "you go girl" factor but **strangely go silent on things like requiring women to actually serve in combat should a draft come up**." I provided a citation showing the majority of women (not even just feminists, but all women) support women being part of the draft. That number is even higher (80%) when you look at registered Democrats, who are more likely to be feminists than registered Republicans. You didn't say, "feminists don't rally in the street about not being part of the draft." You said they were silent about it. They're not. 

How about [1936](http://www.motherjones.com/mixed-media/2014/08/last-public-execution-rainey-bethea)?Here's the deal. People who do manual labor (and even just more physical jobs, like nurses and other folks who spend all day on their feet and are expected to lug fat people around) should retire much, much earlier than people who work in offices. Like, they should probably be allowed to retire at 55. Manual labor is very hard on the body, and takes a toll when done for decades. Plus, once you hit about 50, shit starts going wrong in your body, especially after decades of wear and tear in a physical job. Those folks will have a very hard time staying healthy enough to work at their physical jobs. Those folks should be allowed to retire early. 

Office workers should have to work until after 67. I say this as someone who was an office worker for over a decade. People who sit in front of a computer just aren't as physically taxed by their jobs as someone who builds office buildings or installs plumbing. I'd be totally okay with that change. 

And no, peole shouldn't be relying solely on SS for retirement. However, a whole bunch of Americans lost everything in the Great Recession. My own progress towards retirement was greatly retarded because I lost my job. I still have some retirement, but was out of work for 2.5 years and not contributing towards any retirement at all. And how could I? I was barely making ends meet. So what you're saying is, "I didn't mean to use the words I used in my original post." Sounds like the problem is yours and not mine. Next time say what you actually mean.I think Target also changed their demographics and decided to be come a middle class Walmart. So that took a lot of more well off customers away from Walmart.I did *literally* critically evaluate your writing. That was the entire basis for my last three posts.

Oh, and now you DO mean to use those words? Then my response stands, and you still lose.I think for combat roles, there's nothing wrong with have universal standards in some very applicable metrics. But for non-combat roles, the goal is just overall healthiness, so there's no need to have women meet the same physical standards as men.I don't think the show/comics are going to end with Rick has a savior Jesus type. I think it's going to end with him dying and Carl strapping on his gun to take his place, having learned how to not just survive in the world, but to actually live. The story is about Rick teaching Carl how to live in this world, not about Rick saving and rebuilding the world itself. At least, that's how I see it. Seeing as how we're not at the end yet, I might be totally wrong.Honestly, there's probably a military safe zone in the CA or NV desert. It's a very rural setting, and an environment hard on walkers.I thought it was brilliant how the camera would do a slow pan from time to time and you'd see someone who *could* be a walker, or just drunk or sick. It would fill me with such dread for the safety of the characters in that scene. It's a perfect example of the audience having more information than the characters, and really made the show incredibly suspenseful.Does it matter? And wouldn't it be MORE offensive if it had happene din NON combat role? "She wasn't even supposed to be working that day."Do you even understand how citations work? Have you never cited anything in any paper, ever? You don't cite a book by an author and leave it at that. You cite a book, author, and then the fucking page number. That's what I said. Walmart shoppers don't give a shit about buying American, they just want as cheap as possible.Thanks, now I'm all HULK SMASH! Also, why didn't THAT John McCain run in 2008?I'm talking about a guy who had already been through Marine Corps boot camp and his A school and still had the muscle frame of Daniel Radcliffe as he is now. Pre boot camp Dan = post boot camp my friend.You have 15 pounds on my friend. Also, my entire point is that if short and skinny guys like my friend are good enough for the Marines, there's no reason athletic women couldn't serve in combat just as well. Jeezus, or Haysoos?Still a great move. How many people actually *learned* a foreign language in high school? Less than 1%, I'm guessing. But coding could be very useful to anyone with interest in computers.&gt; I wonder where dudes find a place to jerk off.

From my understanding, in their bunks into a sock or towel. (Doing it in the shower is a major no-no.) Everyone knows you're doing it, but everyone ignores it.This what happens when the population refuses to raise taxes. It fucking blows my mind how myopic people here are. Edit LOL a downvote for stating an actual fact.I don't know about income inequality overall, but I do nkow that the rent on my apartment has increased more than $400 in the last 3 years.Seattle has the worst fucking traffic.Yeah, someone else posted to the Max Cleland slander/libel bullshit. It enrages me so much! They say they support the troops, but then they turn around and denigrate the characters of the ones who are in the "wrong" party. Fucking hypocrites. I was so angry last year when WA voted *against* funding for bus routes. I wouldn't even have benefited me as I don't work in downtown. But I voted FOR it because once upon a time, I lived in a city that didn't have shit public transit. I feel like if VA, MD, DC, *and motherfucking Congress* can get their shit together to create a fantastic metro system like the one in DC, then why the fuck can't Seattle figure it out?Wow, the thought literally never crossed my mind.Should we be judging any social movement on how high school girls (or boys) behave?I don't know. Is that what you do with black people, Mr. Last Rhodesian 14-88? Just them individual based on their actions and not a whole based on their skin color?Do you not know how to use the internet? Do you not know that you have complete control over which websites you visit?I have one friend who is homeschooling her kids becuse her second oldest is just autistic enough that he really struggles in a school environment. But he does very well at home, and he's doing great. He's even in ROTC and Boy Scouts. So, they're not homeschooling for religious purposes, and their kids are smart and well educated. They're doing it the right way. 

On the other hand, one of my Girl Scouts is also homeschooled for non-religious reasons, and despite being 10 she still can't read. She can barely write. Her parents are literally retarding her success in life. And I wonder at what point do I need to call someone? I've been worried about her for years, but she still hasn't learned to read. And her parents say "She'll learn when she wants to." I can't imagine being 10 and being okay with not knowing how to read. I literally couldn't wait to learn how to read, and I started teaching myself in Kindergarten.Nope. I used to work on collections, and there was no way to call in to any employees. Management had phones, but the grunts just logged into a dialer system. Now my old company doesn't even do that. It's all point and click on their computers. Yeah, that's actually harassment and is illegal (although sometimes difficult to stop). There's nothing wrong with a lender calling to collect a debt from a delinquent borrower. The Fair Debt Collections Practices Act restricts how often a lender can call a debtor. If you're getting "harassed constantly" you need to report that to the Consumer Finance Protection Bureau. You can get up to $1500 per harassing call from the lender.We just came out of the worst recession since the Great Depression, and you blame the students and not the shit job market. Good job. WA state has a Running Start program. High school juniors/seniors can attend a local community college (tuition and fees covered, but not books) and obtain both their HS diploma and an AS/AA degree. That kills two birds with one stone, gets kids into college 2 years sooner, and does it for free. It also lets them decide if college is for them or not. I knew a girl who went off to UW at 17.5 years old as a college sophomore (missed the cut off to jr by 2 classes). She wants to be surgeon, and I have no doubt she'll make it. She's driven, super smart, and determined to do this. And she'll do it 2 years earlier than everyone else.At the very least, it's pretty clear those "Christians" aren't doing a good job emulating Christ. These people are assholes.Wow. [Here's your sign.](http://ywmovement.org/wp-content/uploads/2015/02/heres-your-sign.jpg)People aren't steaming assholes. We're just not sure what the signs on a web profile are that you're deaf if you don't actually come out and say, "I'm deaf." And if I were you, I'd put that right out there because it would keep assholes from wasting your time. Anyone not willing to date someone because their deaf is a fucking asshole. And that being said, I kind of understand why that date was mad at you. I"m sure your deafness isn't your defining feature, but it's still part of who you are, and you apparently didn't mention it on your profile. DO YOU SMELL TOAST???

(yes, I know that's a stroke)My dad died from pancreatic cancer several years ago. Actually, he had really bad ascitis and it prevented the blood from flowing out of his head and back down into his abdomen. The veins in his head exploded in the 10 seconds it took my mom to walk from the car, to her keys, and back to the car. He was dead when she got back. 

It absolutely sucks that my dad died, and that my mom had to see that. But you know what's worse? Watching him do the slow decline of terminal cancer, finally looking like a Holocaust victim. I know, because the same time my dad was losing his life to cancer, my father-in-law was losing his own fight. And he did the slow decline, and he looked nothing at all like the bright, vibrant man we'd all known and loved. So as awful as my dad's "gotcha" death was, it's a mercy compared to the one he could have gotten.If SW would phase out their orca population (through natural attrition and no reproduction), we'd all see them in a much more positive light. Sea World does sea rescues all the fucking time. They do a lot of good. But right now, it's overshadowed by the bad they do.That's not what we're talking about though. We're talking about legitimate debt collection.So you're a child. Got it.You have a weird definition of "[sparkling clean](https://38.media.tumblr.com/19abe7dc2e3b76ad808fe6f1d1359bd4/tumblr_nok8vfojGs1sz63g0o2_250.gif)."I wasn't fooled at all when this aired, but it totally fooled me this time because I had no context.Yeah, that's probably it.Am I the only one who hears "Caurrl" and not "Coral?" Because I keep seeing this stupid joke, and it doesn't even make any sense.Right, because being Asian is more important than being the same gender as the character.It is if it's a guy accusing a rape victim of making the whole thing up. Because sometimes Reddit is a cesspool of misogyny and shit.And he's been convicted of rape. Maybe she lied about death threats so her rapist wouldn't get out on parole so early?Because if you don't subsidize him up front so he and his family get insurance, you'll "subsidize" him later on when he goes to the emergency room and then never pays. 

Also, we're all in this together. Don't be so fucking selfish.The Pathfinder MMO by Goblinworks. I know it was a pipe dream, but I wanted to believe!I'm pretty sure the woman didn't beat the shit out of herself, cut herself on her neck and **back**, and then shove a gun up her ass.Wow. YOu're pretty frothy enraged about a woman who was raped lying about her rapist 17 years after the fact. I mean, the guy shoved his gun up her ass. But go ahead, tell me how he's the real victim here.My cousin's stepdad (now former stepdad, thank the gods) used her college fund for his own bachelor's degree. He's now homeless and has been unemployed for well over 6 years. (My aunt got tired of working 60+ hours/week to support his unemployed ass. So instead of getting a job, he's living in a VA home because it's free.)Why is it okay to spank a child but it's not okay to spank an adult (without their permission)? Spanking shouldn't be legal. Adults don't get to hit other adults, so why is okay for adults to hit children?And I'm 5% sure that was a reference to the latest season of The Walking Dead. Porch dick, I'm lookin' at you.&gt; Why does "my body my choice" only apply to women?

It doesn't. Jackass.And I have a friend who didn't give a rat's ass about corporal punishment. One time when he was 15 he got completely hammered on both drugs and alcohol. His parents caught him, and his dad pulled own his pants beat the shit out of him with a belt. Josh just laughed and laughed. (I heard this story from his sister, who was actually really traumatized by the event.)I agree. You can't spank an adult; that's assault. Why should it be okay to spank your kid?I think he'd recently been really sick in that photo.Nah, he's too whacked up on heroin.I don't think you've read *any* Stephen King novels.Zach Galifianakis. That man has crazy eyes.You don't think the victims should get a say in when their abusers are released?I guess I missed that alien invasion in Maine. Or Captain Trips. Or motherfucking IT.Heels fucking suck. That's a negative aspect of being female.&gt; Not having to worry about balls getting in the way all the time.

No, but we have tits, and they get in the way all the damn time.Say goodbye to ever sleeping on your stomach again.That scares most women, too.Well, as a guy you cane equalize the playing field by never committing any crimes.The odds of a draft being called are minuscule. (The selective service needs to end, but that doesn't change the fact that the odds of a draft being called are minuscule.)

This only affects you if you're the kind of person who commits crimes.

For some reason, society thinks men suck at raising kids. I guess that's that old "Patriarchy" feminists bitch about all the time. it turns out, gender roles can really suck.I think she meant in movies.Yeah, but there's that whole period thing. That's funny because every guy I ever asked out turned me down. :( I had a dry 7 years before I met my husband.The details of my anatomy and physiology class.&gt; Oh no, Reddit upvoted a post about **a man spending 20 years in jail because of a False accusation**.

There is absolutely zero evidence this guy didn't rape that woman. In fact, there's plenty of evidence he did. You're what's wrong with Reddit.Employees on a dialer can't get incoming calls. Their phones aren't set up for that.If your kid truly can't be controlled without spanking, then that kid needs some counseling. 

And incarcerating criminals would be like sending a child to their room with no tv or books or video games. It's not like spanking them. We don't cane or lash our criminals, because it's inhumane.Fuck yes, it is! Where's your proof that she lied him into prison?

Here's [an article](http://articles.latimes.com/1995-06-27/news/mn-17748_1_group-members) about the attack back when it happened.Except this guy *wasn't* Falsely accused of rape. This woman was beaten, slashed with a knife on her neck and her back, had an empty gun forced against her head and the guy pulled the trigger multiple times, and then he shoved the gun up her ass.You're not the defender. You're the dude who said he's innocent. Where's your proof that he's innocent?

The guy was convicted of his crime. There's no doubt she was actually attacked. And Steiner was previously convicted for making death threats against two California state representatives who support gun control. You're rushing to defend a guy who's already got a history with this kind of shit and was legitimately convicted for his crime, solely because it suits your agenda.There is zero evidence this woman lied about being attacked. And Roger Steiner had a previous conviction for sending death threats to two California reps who support gun control. Even the FBI got involved in this case. &gt; I read the article you linked, and it's interesting that some of the stuff that was linked to this guy (the pipe bomb) was later found to be shit she made up. 

~~Uh, no. Nice try.~~

Just saw your edit.THAT is what's sad? That Germans are afraid of being called Nazis? Okay, then.I bet a lot of people commute in from the surrounding area (technically not part of the town) for work.OMG that's totally it! (It, not IT.)How exactly did this woman slice up her back?Well that kid dies, so I'm pretty sure that's not based on SK's life.OF COURSE the attorney said that. That's *literally* his job.Which is why I pointed out she had wounds on her back. Sure, but that's why I provided details that were specifically regarding this case. The FBI was involved, and the guy had previously been convicted for threatening the lives of two CA state reps who were pro gun control. I'm firmly of the belief that *this* guy really did do the crime he's convicted of.&gt; The selective service doesn't need to end, it's sometimes necessary. But it's bullshit that we both don't sign up

No, it needs to end. It didn't even exist until WWI. Somehow we got through ~150 years without. We'll manage.

&gt;Okay, I guess there isn't a problem in the judicial system as far as race goes either, black people need to stop committing crimes

My point is that, this is *completely* under your control. People don't *accidentally* commit felonies.

&gt;Yep, the patriarchy sure loves screwing over men. What the fuck?

Yeah, it does. Gender stereotypes are why boys can't play with dolls, because they might grow up to be... A dad? Gender stereotypes are why boys get pressured not to wear pink, or to get into dance, or go into nursing, or become a teacher, or become a home decorator or fashion mogul. Gender stereotypes are why all the Easy Bake Ovens came in pink. It took stoner OP that long to read it.Not to mention, homework is supposed to hone your new skills. With reading, spelling, math, all those require practice to master. If you don't ever assign homework (aka, practice), the students will never master it. 

I knew a guy who was pretty smart and coasted through high school. He got into college (which is where I knew him from), and he had no idea why he had to do chemistry homework. It wasn't until the end of the school year that he figured it out: homework is the practice you need to do in order to do well in the class. You're never going to remember how to calculate that titration problem if you never actually ran through the math.It's already 16.Uh, YOU'RE the fucking moron. Are you perhaps the child of twin siblings, because you're just that fucking stupid. 

Obviously you have difficulty with abstract concepts, so I'll just bid you goodnight. Good luck with that low IQ.I really liked the black and white season premier. I did NOT like the weird visual effect they used in tonight's episode. If the writer's can't figure out how to make it obvious when Morgan is raging, then they just flat out suck. The first episode was at least several days because they found the horde, built the walls and planned the "parade" and then it went to shit. Remember, Glenn had gotten shot by Nick at the end of last season, but he's was apparently healed up at the start of this season. Weren't they on a lake? And they were on a rocky outcropping.I agree that the *way* that came about was dumb. However, it's classic Hero's Journey stuff. The mentor must die so that the Hero can continue on his path.Hey, that's just a picture of Melissa McBride next to another picture of Melissa McBride!!Yes. It's a really great episode!So, uh, your post is why I figured out it *didn't* say titties.I disagree that it was 300. Both Deadwood and Rome were full of extreme violence and sex. Both came out before 300, and neither of them are fantasy. But they ARE on HBO, just like Game of Thrones.&gt; I really don't think that what made the books worth reading had anything to do with "the tyranny of religion." That message was almost more of an afterthought if you ask me. 

Uh, no, that was a massive theme of the book. From the Authority to the Angels to the Eve prophecy to Mary to the Magisterium to Metatron. It's *stuffed* with religious symbolism.Yet GOT is fantasy and Last Kingdom is historical fiction. &gt; The quality is kind of cheesy but the best Arthurian/Merlin movie was the made for TV Merlin(Sam Neil plays Merlin). 

OMG no. Excalibur. Go watch it right now!I would love it if the BBC did a 7 year, 6 episode-per-year adaptation of Harry Potter.It would have required a shit ton of money and time to animate.Actually, someone else said it was heroin. :(What are the odds that any given female beat the shit out of herself? Very, very, very slim. Therefore, "I'm pretty sure the woman didn't beat the shit out of herself"No, but if you're the "right" height, you can get elbowed in them.I'm sorry, did you *actually* think I'd continue this conversation with you after you started your prior post with, "Dude you're a fucking moron?"

You ARE a moron. Cops (theoretically) only get to hit people who are doing something dangerous and need to be brought under control, and all other methods have failed. 

And again, we don't use corporal punishment in our prison system. We don't lash murderers, and we don't cane rapists. Why is it okay to spank a little child when we don't even do that to the worst of our society?Good lord, that woman needs to watch some Archer.Yeah, you should totally rate an entire restaurant chain based on one data point.

No, Chipotle isn't authentic. It *is* tasty, and way better for you than Taco Bell.The problem isn't Chipotle, the problem is that the food comes to them already contaminated. Just like all those bags of read to eat salad in recent years. It's not the packager, it's the farmer.Not if you live someplace that doesn't have taquerias at every corner.If it means their employees get paid better (I have no idea if it's True) and their food is better, it's worth it.Riiiight, because this never happens to non-organic products. Except, you know, all the fucking time.Why anybody would choose *any* chain "Mexican" restaurant over any one of the hundred local taquerias in SoCal is beyond me. Unfortunately, I live in Seattle now, and the "Mexican" food here just tastes like disappointment.I'm wondering if it's going to turn out that the guy was just in a regular relationship with the daughter, who happened to have a very supportive mom. And the guy went a little cuckoo.This is the unintended consequence of the rise of the internet. It used to be you could only get TV shows on TV. Now you have to buy from multiple sources. And even though I love Star Trek, I'm not going to fork out $6/month to watch it on my monitor.I don't think the people who want to fuck 12-year-olds care about whether or not the child is there willingly.You've gotten a lot of flack, but I see what you're saying. Because prostitution is illegal outside NV, it's much more likely that prostitutes in those other states are victims of forced prostitution.Maybe Milwaukee just has a lot of Catholics. Did you ever think of that, you bigot?I jumped to that conclusion because you said, "I recently got a burrito at Chipotle and it was mediocre and room temperature at best." You didn't say, "Every time I eat at Chipotle" or anything else that would indicate this wasn't a one-time occurrence. No, but I also don't get to sleep on my stomach.Sigh. My husband works in video games. Therefore, Seattle.I am, too. We're working on returning to San Diego, but it'll be a few years before we can make that happen.&gt; Just like when Obama said that Islam is a religion of peace

[That was Bush.](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Religion_of_Peace)Family leave is only for the wealthier class that can afford to take that time off work.

Edit: Does no one have a functioning sarcasm detector???"I'm not a racist, but I *am* massive asshole. So I got that going for me, which is nice."

Edit: I'm not going to bother responding to the asshole/racist-apologist who commented below. Reddit seems to have taken care of it, already stating what I would have stated myself.Because complete communism is the only counterpoint to complete capitalism. DERP.For me it was the moment when Moregan asks if Eastman let Creighton Dallas Surname starve to death. Eastman's face falls and turns ot extreme grief and sadness. And I knew in that moment that yes, yes he had let Creighton Dallas Surname starve to death in that cage. And I didn't blame at all for having done so.CATCH A GUUUUN! Hewhgh! Never doing that again!As does even incomplete communism.The guy was *literally* proven guilty in a court of law.The guy was proven to be guilty in a court of law 20 years ago. Not to mention the FBI investigated this attack for over a year. It's not like the FBI is going to *actually* pull a Gone Girl and just say, "Hey she was raped! We don't need any corroborating evidence!" And not to mention Steiner was previously convicted for sending death threats to two CA legislators who were pro gun control. So the guy has a history of threatening violence against government officials, and he's pretty cuckoo since he was involved in that anti-tax "church" group in the first place. The guy's guilty.Wasn't she military? We already saw that Carol in S1.I rewatching S4 right now and it's fucking awesome! Just got through Tyrese and girls reuniting with Carol. Soon, it'll be time for Lizzie to look at the flowers.Yep, S2 is really good. S3 can suck my husband's dick, but S2 doesn't deserve all the hate it gets here. I'm now watching S4 again, and just finished the episode where Tyrese and girls meet up with Carol again. 4b is such good television. And I'd forgotten just how angry Carl was at Rick. Those two guys did a great job!&gt; She made their confrontation and the death of one of them inevitable.

Not really. Shane was lost the moment he decided to shoot Otis. He didn't even have the decency to actually kill him. The confrontation between Shane and RIck was inevitable. We see it in S1 when Shane sights in on Rick with his gun, and Dale sees it. Lori and Dale are absolutely 100% correct about Shane. That makes their bitching much more palatable, and you find yourself rooting for them to somehow win this time around (which of course is impossible because duh). And Lori only approached Shane at the end to make up with him because Dale died, and she was trying to live up to Dale's vision of how to treat other people. She did it in Dale's memory. It's not her fault that Shane went off his fucking rocker and decided that meant Lori loved him after all. And honestly, he tried to rape Lori. The fact that she extended that olive branch to ~~her~~ him is amazing. (And the fact that he did try to rape her just tells me that he wasn't actually in love with her. In lust, but not in love.)I think they put it there because Morgan is going to play a big part in the next episode. And his actions in the next episode wouldn't make any sense at all to us if we hadn't gotten his backstory this week.We wait 20 minutes so we can fastforward.&gt; Seriously though, season 2 is heavily underrated/under-appreciated

Absolutely agree with you on that.

&gt;I also think season 4 is overrated. 

You are dead to me! 

Just kidding. I'm actually watching S4 again, and I'm about 2/3 through it. It's been a fucking awesome ride. Even though I know everything that happens, it's been amazing.When someone complains about TWD on Facebook, you unfriend them. It's what you do.Darryl's a pretty gross guy, though. I think he's bathed twice since the fall of the prison.I'm totally not shitting you: I think your job would be awesome fun!I actually rock at self checkout. It helps that I always know exactly what produce I have, so I don't need to flip through dozens of pages looking for the picture of the pepper I have. (We really like peppers.)I'm smart but I always struggled in math. It wasn't until I was in my 20s that math clicked for me, and it's because I'm like you. I just couldn't learn the way we were taught in the 80s. I'm actually back in college at 40, and math is a fucking breeze now. I'm just going to come out and say it: Pooping. It's stupid that we leave so much matter behind. Also, it's kind of gross that 30% of our fecal mass is bacteria.&gt; but I like pale skin even more, especially when it's paired with dark hair.

That is absolutely my "type".I'm a 40-year-old married woman who loves to give her husband head. I'm not old enough for that video.Uh, if that were True then nature is telling virgin girls to never, ever have vaginal sex ever.Same here."usually sexy"I have zero interest in giving hand jobs. I'm also terrible at them, because I don't have a dick and I don't like giving hand jobs.I am friends with a guy who has never cum from only a blowjob. He can cum if he's had sex earlier in that encounter, but not before.I'm a woman, and it's not a thing for me, either. Pretty much all of my body can be an erogenous zone, but my nipples have never really done anything for me in that regard.&gt; Post civil war the US was Ayn Rand's wet dream, no regulations, no nothing. 

Pre CW was also Ayn Rand's wet dream. I mean, we allowed slavery. It doesn't get more free market than that. It's not just LA. San Diego used to have a really robust street car system. It still has pretty good public transit, but nothing like what it was 85 years ago.I think the most likely conspiracy is that Bush let it happen so he could invade Iraq. He didn't even mention Al Qaeda in his Jan 2002 SOTU speech, but he did mention Iraq and Saddam Hussein.That's exactly what popped into my head. Even How I Met Your Mother knows how that song is!Really, though. You don't get much more free market than allowing people to own other people.&gt; better yet, curb the sarcasm. It really is unbecoming of serious conversation.

Oh, boo fucking hoo.Yeah, I hated Still. Most of that is I don't actually like Beth's character, and I don't think Emily Kinney does a good job acting. The narration she does for her first episode with Darryl after the loss of the prison (I think it's Inmates) she says "runnin and survivin" but she doesn't say it the way people who leave off the G say it. People tend to say, "runn'n'" whereas she clearly says "run in". I'm so not sad Beth is gone, because she was pretty fucking useless. Even Carl at his most annoying was more useful than Beth ever was.I thought the same thing! It's like a reverse Batman signal. Instead of calling Batman to help, you just tell everyone else you're an asshole.&gt; She seems to be mostly very hostile to Shane in season 2.

Of course she's hostile to Shane. He tried to rape her.When I first wrote the post I couldn't remember anything but the Dallas, so I wrote Channing Dallas Tatum. And then I remembered the Creighton right before posting it.Joy: the feeling you get when you terrorize your black neighbor *children*.Based on the rules of this subreddit, you're supposed to just copy and paste the article's headline. You're not supposed to editorialize it.I think it's a pretty big deal. The artist was using that image to promote his tattoo parlor. Then the restaurant came in and used it to promote themselves. I'm guessing that the restaurant is more well known than the tattoo parlor (the consumer base for a restaurant is going to be larger), so now people who see the image on his tattoo parlor might think he stole it from the restaurant. And the worst is the guy who actually has the tattoo. Can you imagine if you got a tattoo and then a few years later a popular local restaurant stole that image, and now you look like a schmuck for having a tattoo of a restaurant's promotional image?&gt;  I am willing to suspend my disbelief for Jurassic Park

I can do it with Jurassic Park, but not Jurassic World. The "science" in that movie was just too stupid and unreal. But, JW isn't nearly as a good a movie as JP, on every level. Well, I mean, it has 100% more Chris Pratt, but you know what I mean.And I feel exactly the opposite way. I tried e3 times over 15 years to read the first book, and I couldn't get more than a few pages in. But I managed to read the first three books this summer, because I already cared about all the characters because of the show.If you wouldn't want to meet those characters in real life, why would you want to meet them in a book, where you'd have to spend hours and hours with them?My husband and I watched the first two episodes of Mad Men. Every single character on that show is an asshole. We decided we had better things to do with our free time than hang out with fictional assholes. We have enough of that in real life. That being said, we acknowledge that the writing, acting, and direction were great, artistically speaking. But that's not enough for us to suffer through all the asshole characters.&gt; One likes to scream out his thoughts in the middle of the theater

Well, he's kind of dick...

&gt;when watching scenes where the killer bursts in on a half naked woman and she is grabbing clothes. "We've all seen your boobs, honey. Put on shoes instead of a shirt!" 

But that's both funny and practical advice!&gt; realism in fantasy movies

I don't want *realism* in fantasy movies. However, the film/show should follow all the rules in its own universe. The best example I have of a show breaking the rules of their own universe is Torchwood: Miracle Day. The entire series, over and over again, Jack says his immortality has absolutely nothing to do with his blood. They've even demonstrated that through his flashbacks to when he was being tortured in the 19-teens. And then at the very end of the show, Jack gives Mekhi Phifer a blood transfusion and then Mekhi Phifer's character is suddenly immortal. No. No no no no NO! You just spent 10 hours telling us that's not how it works, and then you make it so that's how it works.The movie is very different from the book, though. I can understand King hating the movie because the changes made in the film completely undermine what King was going for with the book. The movie is a great fucking movie, but it's a terrible **adaptation** of The Shining.I totally agree. My best example is Gme of Thrones. I find the books to be slightly boring. It took me 4 attempts over 15 years to read the first book, and I only managed it this year because the TV show made me care about the characters. I feel that GOT is better than the books, because although GRRM is a great story engineer and world builder, he's not a great writer. The TV series is so good that it's allowed me to enjoy the books.

And the flip side of that is Harry Potter. The movies left out SO MUCH from the books that are very important. And I'm not even talking about who made the Marauder's Map (although I love that backstory). I'm talking about how Harry's death at the end of 7 conferred to all of his loved ones the same protection his mother's death 16 years earlier had conferred onto him. Harry even explicitly tells Voldy "I've done what my mother did. They're protected from you. Haven't you noticed how none of the spells you put on them are binding? You can't torture them. You can't touch them." That is a HUGE plot point that the movie failed to include. It's the entire reason why Harry needed to die that night in the forest at Voldemort's hand.&gt; And when audiences try to criticize these films, they literally always say "It had no story.", which is just the silliest thing to say. 

The Star Wars prequels had little to no story, and that was one of their major flaws. The originals all had great stories.You're not alone. I have several friends in my circle who also can't stand Seinfeld and don't understand the following the show has. And I should clarify that I also feel the same way. When the entire premise of a movie/show is based on shitty science, it's a valid criticism. For example, the Doctor Who episode Kill the Moon is about how the moon is an egg getting ready to hatch. It creates havoc on earth because somehow it's gaining mass. Except, eggs don't gain mass as they gestate. They get all the nutrients for growth from the yolk. The egg is essentially a closed system, so it should maintain the same mass as it develops. And let's not forget the dog-sized *prokaryotic* spiders on said moon egg. 

Bad bad science makes for bad bad shows/movies.My husband and I actually though the goat was a trap. For either walkers or people.I also feel like Rick does a lot of the things he does so that the people he loves won't have to. He's able to carry the burden of biting out a guy's throat because the alternative is his son carrying the burden of having been raped.

Edit: Also, in that episode where Lori dies and Rick is staring at Carl, Rick is devastated because he knows what Carl had to do. Regardless of how Rick felt about Lori leading up to her death, he knows that Carl is going to be fucked up over losing his mom and then having to shoot her in the head. And that thought devastates him.I totally agree.I'm sure the man wouldn't have stopped at just raping Carl *if it was up to him.*Sorry, but I don't want to hang out with assholes. I have too many other things I can be doing with people are *aren't* assholes.Should we be judging any social movement on how high school girls (or boys) behave?I don't know. Is that what you do with black people, Mr. Last Rhodesian 14-88? Just them individual based on their actions and not a whole based on their skin color?Do you not know how to use the internet? Do you not know that you have complete control over which websites you visit?I have one friend who is homeschooling her kids becuse her second oldest is just autistic enough that he really struggles in a school environment. But he does very well at home, and he's doing great. He's even in ROTC and Boy Scouts. So, they're not homeschooling for religious purposes, and their kids are smart and well educated. They're doing it the right way. 

On the other hand, one of my Girl Scouts is also homeschooled for non-religious reasons, and despite being 10 she still can't read. She can barely write. Her parents are literally retarding her success in life. And I wonder at what point do I need to call someone? I've been worried about her for years, but she still hasn't learned to read. And her parents say "She'll learn when she wants to." I can't imagine being 10 and being okay with not knowing how to read. I literally couldn't wait to learn how to read, and I started teaching myself in Kindergarten.Nope. I used to work on collections, and there was no way to call in to any employees. Management had phones, but the grunts just logged into a dialer system. Now my old company doesn't even do that. It's all point and click on their computers. Yeah, that's actually harassment and is illegal (although sometimes difficult to stop). There's nothing wrong with a lender calling to collect a debt from a delinquent borrower. The Fair Debt Collections Practices Act restricts how often a lender can call a debtor. If you're getting "harassed constantly" you need to report that to the Consumer Finance Protection Bureau. You can get up to $1500 per harassing call from the lender.We just came out of the worst recession since the Great Depression, and you blame the students and not the shit job market. Good job. WA state has a Running Start program. High school juniors/seniors can attend a local community college (tuition and fees covered, but not books) and obtain both their HS diploma and an AS/AA degree. That kills two birds with one stone, gets kids into college 2 years sooner, and does it for free. It also lets them decide if college is for them or not. I knew a girl who went off to UW at 17.5 years old as a college sophomore (missed the cut off to jr by 2 classes). She wants to be surgeon, and I have no doubt she'll make it. She's driven, super smart, and determined to do this. And she'll do it 2 years earlier than everyone else.At the very least, it's pretty clear those "Christians" aren't doing a good job emulating Christ. These people are assholes.Wow. [Here's your sign.](http://ywmovement.org/wp-content/uploads/2015/02/heres-your-sign.jpg)People aren't steaming assholes. We're just not sure what the signs on a web profile are that you're deaf if you don't actually come out and say, "I'm deaf." And if I were you, I'd put that right out there because it would keep assholes from wasting your time. Anyone not willing to date someone because their deaf is a fucking asshole. And that being said, I kind of understand why that date was mad at you. I"m sure your deafness isn't your defining feature, but it's still part of who you are, and you apparently didn't mention it on your profile. DO YOU SMELL TOAST???

(yes, I know that's a stroke)My dad died from pancreatic cancer several years ago. Actually, he had really bad ascitis and it prevented the blood from flowing out of his head and back down into his abdomen. The veins in his head exploded in the 10 seconds it took my mom to walk from the car, to her keys, and back to the car. He was dead when she got back. 

It absolutely sucks that my dad died, and that my mom had to see that. But you know what's worse? Watching him do the slow decline of terminal cancer, finally looking like a Holocaust victim. I know, because the same time my dad was losing his life to cancer, my father-in-law was losing his own fight. And he did the slow decline, and he looked nothing at all like the bright, vibrant man we'd all known and loved. So as awful as my dad's "gotcha" death was, it's a mercy compared to the one he could have gotten.If SW would phase out their orca population (through natural attrition and no reproduction), we'd all see them in a much more positive light. Sea World does sea rescues all the fucking time. They do a lot of good. But right now, it's overshadowed by the bad they do.That's not what we're talking about though. We're talking about legitimate debt collection.So you're a child. Got it.You have a weird definition of "[sparkling clean](https://38.media.tumblr.com/19abe7dc2e3b76ad808fe6f1d1359bd4/tumblr_nok8vfojGs1sz63g0o2_250.gif)."I wasn't fooled at all when this aired, but it totally fooled me this time because I had no context.Yeah, that's probably it.Am I the only one who hears "Caurrl" and not "Coral?" Because I keep seeing this stupid joke, and it doesn't even make any sense.Right, because being Asian is more important than being the same gender as the character.It is if it's a guy accusing a rape victim of making the whole thing up. Because sometimes Reddit is a cesspool of misogyny and shit.And he's been convicted of rape. Maybe she lied about death threats so her rapist wouldn't get out on parole so early?Because if you don't subsidize him up front so he and his family get insurance, you'll "subsidize" him later on when he goes to the emergency room and then never pays. 

Also, we're all in this together. Don't be so fucking selfish.The Pathfinder MMO by Goblinworks. I know it was a pipe dream, but I wanted to believe!I'm pretty sure the woman didn't beat the shit out of herself, cut herself on her neck and **back**, and then shove a gun up her ass.Wow. YOu're pretty frothy enraged about a woman who was raped lying about her rapist 17 years after the fact. I mean, the guy shoved his gun up her ass. But go ahead, tell me how he's the real victim here.My cousin's stepdad (now former stepdad, thank the gods) used her college fund for his own bachelor's degree. He's now homeless and has been unemployed for well over 6 years. (My aunt got tired of working 60+ hours/week to support his unemployed ass. So instead of getting a job, he's living in a VA home because it's free.)Why is it okay to spank a child but it's not okay to spank an adult (without their permission)? Spanking shouldn't be legal. Adults don't get to hit other adults, so why is okay for adults to hit children?And I'm 5% sure that was a reference to the latest season of The Walking Dead. Porch dick, I'm lookin' at you.&gt; Why does "my body my choice" only apply to women?

It doesn't. Jackass.And I have a friend who didn't give a rat's ass about corporal punishment. One time when he was 15 he got completely hammered on both drugs and alcohol. His parents caught him, and his dad pulled own his pants beat the shit out of him with a belt. Josh just laughed and laughed. (I heard this story from his sister, who was actually really traumatized by the event.)I agree. You can't spank an adult; that's assault. Why should it be okay to spank your kid?I think he'd recently been really sick in that photo.Nah, he's too whacked up on heroin.I don't think you've read *any* Stephen King novels.Zach Galifianakis. That man has crazy eyes.You don't think the victims should get a say in when their abusers are released?I guess I missed that alien invasion in Maine. Or Captain Trips. Or motherfucking IT.Heels fucking suck. That's a negative aspect of being female.&gt; Not having to worry about balls getting in the way all the time.

No, but we have tits, and they get in the way all the damn time.Say goodbye to ever sleeping on your stomach again.That scares most women, too.Well, as a guy you cane equalize the playing field by never committing any crimes.The odds of a draft being called are minuscule. (The selective service needs to end, but that doesn't change the fact that the odds of a draft being called are minuscule.)

This only affects you if you're the kind of person who commits crimes.

For some reason, society thinks men suck at raising kids. I guess that's that old "Patriarchy" feminists bitch about all the time. it turns out, gender roles can really suck.I think she meant in movies.Yeah, but there's that whole period thing. That's funny because every guy I ever asked out turned me down. :( I had a dry 7 years before I met my husband.The details of my anatomy and physiology class.&gt; Oh no, Reddit upvoted a post about **a man spending 20 years in jail because of a False accusation**.

There is absolutely zero evidence this guy didn't rape that woman. In fact, there's plenty of evidence he did. You're what's wrong with Reddit.Employees on a dialer can't get incoming calls. Their phones aren't set up for that.If your kid truly can't be controlled without spanking, then that kid needs some counseling. 

And incarcerating criminals would be like sending a child to their room with no tv or books or video games. It's not like spanking them. We don't cane or lash our criminals, because it's inhumane.Fuck yes, it is! Where's your proof that she lied him into prison?

Here's [an article](http://articles.latimes.com/1995-06-27/news/mn-17748_1_group-members) about the attack back when it happened.Except this guy *wasn't* Falsely accused of rape. This woman was beaten, slashed with a knife on her neck and her back, had an empty gun forced against her head and the guy pulled the trigger multiple times, and then he shoved the gun up her ass.You're not the defender. You're the dude who said he's innocent. Where's your proof that he's innocent?

The guy was convicted of his crime. There's no doubt she was actually attacked. And Steiner was previously convicted for making death threats against two California state representatives who support gun control. You're rushing to defend a guy who's already got a history with this kind of shit and was legitimately convicted for his crime, solely because it suits your agenda.There is zero evidence this woman lied about being attacked. And Roger Steiner had a previous conviction for sending death threats to two California reps who support gun control. Even the FBI got involved in this case. &gt; I read the article you linked, and it's interesting that some of the stuff that was linked to this guy (the pipe bomb) was later found to be shit she made up. 

~~Uh, no. Nice try.~~

Just saw your edit.THAT is what's sad? That Germans are afraid of being called Nazis? Okay, then.I bet a lot of people commute in from the surrounding area (technically not part of the town) for work.OMG that's totally it! (It, not IT.)How exactly did this woman slice up her back?Well that kid dies, so I'm pretty sure that's not based on SK's life.OF COURSE the attorney said that. That's *literally* his job.Which is why I pointed out she had wounds on her back. Sure, but that's why I provided details that were specifically regarding this case. The FBI was involved, and the guy had previously been convicted for threatening the lives of two CA state reps who were pro gun control. I'm firmly of the belief that *this* guy really did do the crime he's convicted of.&gt; The selective service doesn't need to end, it's sometimes necessary. But it's bullshit that we both don't sign up

No, it needs to end. It didn't even exist until WWI. Somehow we got through ~150 years without. We'll manage.

&gt;Okay, I guess there isn't a problem in the judicial system as far as race goes either, black people need to stop committing crimes

My point is that, this is *completely* under your control. People don't *accidentally* commit felonies.

&gt;Yep, the patriarchy sure loves screwing over men. What the fuck?

Yeah, it does. Gender stereotypes are why boys can't play with dolls, because they might grow up to be... A dad? Gender stereotypes are why boys get pressured not to wear pink, or to get into dance, or go into nursing, or become a teacher, or become a home decorator or fashion mogul. Gender stereotypes are why all the Easy Bake Ovens came in pink. It took stoner OP that long to read it.Not to mention, homework is supposed to hone your new skills. With reading, spelling, math, all those require practice to master. If you don't ever assign homework (aka, practice), the students will never master it. 

I knew a guy who was pretty smart and coasted through high school. He got into college (which is where I knew him from), and he had no idea why he had to do chemistry homework. It wasn't until the end of the school year that he figured it out: homework is the practice you need to do in order to do well in the class. You're never going to remember how to calculate that titration problem if you never actually ran through the math.It's already 16.Uh, YOU'RE the fucking moron. Are you perhaps the child of twin siblings, because you're just that fucking stupid. 

Obviously you have difficulty with abstract concepts, so I'll just bid you goodnight. Good luck with that low IQ.I really liked the black and white season premier. I did NOT like the weird visual effect they used in tonight's episode. If the writer's can't figure out how to make it obvious when Morgan is raging, then they just flat out suck. The first episode was at least several days because they found the horde, built the walls and planned the "parade" and then it went to shit. Remember, Glenn had gotten shot by Nick at the end of last season, but he's was apparently healed up at the start of this season. Weren't they on a lake? And they were on a rocky outcropping.I agree that the *way* that came about was dumb. However, it's classic Hero's Journey stuff. The mentor must die so that the Hero can continue on his path.Hey, that's just a picture of Melissa McBride next to another picture of Melissa McBride!!Yes. It's a really great episode!So, uh, your post is why I figured out it *didn't* say titties.I disagree that it was 300. Both Deadwood and Rome were full of extreme violence and sex. Both came out before 300, and neither of them are fantasy. But they ARE on HBO, just like Game of Thrones.&gt; I really don't think that what made the books worth reading had anything to do with "the tyranny of religion." That message was almost more of an afterthought if you ask me. 

Uh, no, that was a massive theme of the book. From the Authority to the Angels to the Eve prophecy to Mary to the Magisterium to Metatron. It's *stuffed* with religious symbolism.Yet GOT is fantasy and Last Kingdom is historical fiction. &gt; The quality is kind of cheesy but the best Arthurian/Merlin movie was the made for TV Merlin(Sam Neil plays Merlin). 

OMG no. Excalibur. Go watch it right now!I would love it if the BBC did a 7 year, 6 episode-per-year adaptation of Harry Potter.It would have required a shit ton of money and time to animate.Actually, someone else said it was heroin. :(What are the odds that any given female beat the shit out of herself? Very, very, very slim. Therefore, "I'm pretty sure the woman didn't beat the shit out of herself"No, but if you're the "right" height, you can get elbowed in them.I'm sorry, did you *actually* think I'd continue this conversation with you after you started your prior post with, "Dude you're a fucking moron?"

You ARE a moron. Cops (theoretically) only get to hit people who are doing something dangerous and need to be brought under control, and all other methods have failed. 

And again, we don't use corporal punishment in our prison system. We don't lash murderers, and we don't cane rapists. Why is it okay to spank a little child when we don't even do that to the worst of our society?Good lord, that woman needs to watch some Archer.Yeah, you should totally rate an entire restaurant chain based on one data point.

No, Chipotle isn't authentic. It *is* tasty, and way better for you than Taco Bell.The problem isn't Chipotle, the problem is that the food comes to them already contaminated. Just like all those bags of read to eat salad in recent years. It's not the packager, it's the farmer.Not if you live someplace that doesn't have taquerias at every corner.If it means their employees get paid better (I have no idea if it's True) and their food is better, it's worth it.Riiiight, because this never happens to non-organic products. Except, you know, all the fucking time.Why anybody would choose *any* chain "Mexican" restaurant over any one of the hundred local taquerias in SoCal is beyond me. Unfortunately, I live in Seattle now, and the "Mexican" food here just tastes like disappointment.I'm wondering if it's going to turn out that the guy was just in a regular relationship with the daughter, who happened to have a very supportive mom. And the guy went a little cuckoo.This is the unintended consequence of the rise of the internet. It used to be you could only get TV shows on TV. Now you have to buy from multiple sources. And even though I love Star Trek, I'm not going to fork out $6/month to watch it on my monitor.I don't think the people who want to fuck 12-year-olds care about whether or not the child is there willingly.You've gotten a lot of flack, but I see what you're saying. Because prostitution is illegal outside NV, it's much more likely that prostitutes in those other states are victims of forced prostitution.Maybe Milwaukee just has a lot of Catholics. Did you ever think of that, you bigot?I jumped to that conclusion because you said, "I recently got a burrito at Chipotle and it was mediocre and room temperature at best." You didn't say, "Every time I eat at Chipotle" or anything else that would indicate this wasn't a one-time occurrence. No, but I also don't get to sleep on my stomach.Sigh. My husband works in video games. Therefore, Seattle.I am, too. We're working on returning to San Diego, but it'll be a few years before we can make that happen.&gt; Just like when Obama said that Islam is a religion of peace

[That was Bush.](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Religion_of_Peace)Family leave is only for the wealthier class that can afford to take that time off work.

Edit: Does no one have a functioning sarcasm detector???"I'm not a racist, but I *am* massive asshole. So I got that going for me, which is nice."

Edit: I'm not going to bother responding to the asshole/racist-apologist who commented below. Reddit seems to have taken care of it, already stating what I would have stated myself.Because complete communism is the only counterpoint to complete capitalism. DERP.For me it was the moment when Moregan asks if Eastman let Creighton Dallas Surname starve to death. Eastman's face falls and turns ot extreme grief and sadness. And I knew in that moment that yes, yes he had let Creighton Dallas Surname starve to death in that cage. And I didn't blame at all for having done so.CATCH A GUUUUN! Hewhgh! Never doing that again!As does even incomplete communism.The guy was *literally* proven guilty in a court of law.The guy was proven to be guilty in a court of law 20 years ago. Not to mention the FBI investigated this attack for over a year. It's not like the FBI is going to *actually* pull a Gone Girl and just say, "Hey she was raped! We don't need any corroborating evidence!" And not to mention Steiner was previously convicted for sending death threats to two CA legislators who were pro gun control. So the guy has a history of threatening violence against government officials, and he's pretty cuckoo since he was involved in that anti-tax "church" group in the first place. The guy's guilty.Wasn't she military? We already saw that Carol in S1.I rewatching S4 right now and it's fucking awesome! Just got through Tyrese and girls reuniting with Carol. Soon, it'll be time for Lizzie to look at the flowers.Yep, S2 is really good. S3 can suck my husband's dick, but S2 doesn't deserve all the hate it gets here. I'm now watching S4 again, and just finished the episode where Tyrese and girls meet up with Carol again. 4b is such good television. And I'd forgotten just how angry Carl was at Rick. Those two guys did a great job!&gt; She made their confrontation and the death of one of them inevitable.

Not really. Shane was lost the moment he decided to shoot Otis. He didn't even have the decency to actually kill him. The confrontation between Shane and RIck was inevitable. We see it in S1 when Shane sights in on Rick with his gun, and Dale sees it. Lori and Dale are absolutely 100% correct about Shane. That makes their bitching much more palatable, and you find yourself rooting for them to somehow win this time around (which of course is impossible because duh). And Lori only approached Shane at the end to make up with him because Dale died, and she was trying to live up to Dale's vision of how to treat other people. She did it in Dale's memory. It's not her fault that Shane went off his fucking rocker and decided that meant Lori loved him after all. And honestly, he tried to rape Lori. The fact that she extended that olive branch to ~~her~~ him is amazing. (And the fact that he did try to rape her just tells me that he wasn't actually in love with her. In lust, but not in love.)I think they put it there because Morgan is going to play a big part in the next episode. And his actions in the next episode wouldn't make any sense at all to us if we hadn't gotten his backstory this week.We wait 20 minutes so we can fastforward.&gt; Seriously though, season 2 is heavily underrated/under-appreciated

Absolutely agree with you on that.

&gt;I also think season 4 is overrated. 

You are dead to me! 

Just kidding. I'm actually watching S4 again, and I'm about 2/3 through it. It's been a fucking awesome ride. Even though I know everything that happens, it's been amazing.When someone complains about TWD on Facebook, you unfriend them. It's what you do.Darryl's a pretty gross guy, though. I think he's bathed twice since the fall of the prison.I'm totally not shitting you: I think your job would be awesome fun!I actually rock at self checkout. It helps that I always know exactly what produce I have, so I don't need to flip through dozens of pages looking for the picture of the pepper I have. (We really like peppers.)I'm smart but I always struggled in math. It wasn't until I was in my 20s that math clicked for me, and it's because I'm like you. I just couldn't learn the way we were taught in the 80s. I'm actually back in college at 40, and math is a fucking breeze now. I'm just going to come out and say it: Pooping. It's stupid that we leave so much matter behind. Also, it's kind of gross that 30% of our fecal mass is bacteria.&gt; but I like pale skin even more, especially when it's paired with dark hair.

That is absolutely my "type".I'm a 40-year-old married woman who loves to give her husband head. I'm not old enough for that video.Uh, if that were True then nature is telling virgin girls to never, ever have vaginal sex ever.Same here."usually sexy"I have zero interest in giving hand jobs. I'm also terrible at them, because I don't have a dick and I don't like giving hand jobs.I am friends with a guy who has never cum from only a blowjob. He can cum if he's had sex earlier in that encounter, but not before.I'm a woman, and it's not a thing for me, either. Pretty much all of my body can be an erogenous zone, but my nipples have never really done anything for me in that regard.&gt; Post civil war the US was Ayn Rand's wet dream, no regulations, no nothing. 

Pre CW was also Ayn Rand's wet dream. I mean, we allowed slavery. It doesn't get more free market than that. It's not just LA. San Diego used to have a really robust street car system. It still has pretty good public transit, but nothing like what it was 85 years ago.I think the most likely conspiracy is that Bush let it happen so he could invade Iraq. He didn't even mention Al Qaeda in his Jan 2002 SOTU speech, but he did mention Iraq and Saddam Hussein.That's exactly what popped into my head. Even How I Met Your Mother knows how that song is!Really, though. You don't get much more free market than allowing people to own other people.&gt; better yet, curb the sarcasm. It really is unbecoming of serious conversation.

Oh, boo fucking hoo.Yeah, I hated Still. Most of that is I don't actually like Beth's character, and I don't think Emily Kinney does a good job acting. The narration she does for her first episode with Darryl after the loss of the prison (I think it's Inmates) she says "runnin and survivin" but she doesn't say it the way people who leave off the G say it. People tend to say, "runn'n'" whereas she clearly says "run in". I'm so not sad Beth is gone, because she was pretty fucking useless. Even Carl at his most annoying was more useful than Beth ever was.I thought the same thing! It's like a reverse Batman signal. Instead of calling Batman to help, you just tell everyone else you're an asshole.&gt; She seems to be mostly very hostile to Shane in season 2.

Of course she's hostile to Shane. He tried to rape her.When I first wrote the post I couldn't remember anything but the Dallas, so I wrote Channing Dallas Tatum. And then I remembered the Creighton right before posting it.Joy: the feeling you get when you terrorize your black neighbor *children*.Based on the rules of this subreddit, you're supposed to just copy and paste the article's headline. You're not supposed to editorialize it.I think it's a pretty big deal. The artist was using that image to promote his tattoo parlor. Then the restaurant came in and used it to promote themselves. I'm guessing that the restaurant is more well known than the tattoo parlor (the consumer base for a restaurant is going to be larger), so now people who see the image on his tattoo parlor might think he stole it from the restaurant. And the worst is the guy who actually has the tattoo. Can you imagine if you got a tattoo and then a few years later a popular local restaurant stole that image, and now you look like a schmuck for having a tattoo of a restaurant's promotional image?&gt;  I am willing to suspend my disbelief for Jurassic Park

I can do it with Jurassic Park, but not Jurassic World. The "science" in that movie was just too stupid and unreal. But, JW isn't nearly as a good a movie as JP, on every level. Well, I mean, it has 100% more Chris Pratt, but you know what I mean.And I feel exactly the opposite way. I tried e3 times over 15 years to read the first book, and I couldn't get more than a few pages in. But I managed to read the first three books this summer, because I already cared about all the characters because of the show.If you wouldn't want to meet those characters in real life, why would you want to meet them in a book, where you'd have to spend hours and hours with them?My husband and I watched the first two episodes of Mad Men. Every single character on that show is an asshole. We decided we had better things to do with our free time than hang out with fictional assholes. We have enough of that in real life. That being said, we acknowledge that the writing, acting, and direction were great, artistically speaking. But that's not enough for us to suffer through all the asshole characters.&gt; One likes to scream out his thoughts in the middle of the theater

Well, he's kind of dick...

&gt;when watching scenes where the killer bursts in on a half naked woman and she is grabbing clothes. "We've all seen your boobs, honey. Put on shoes instead of a shirt!" 

But that's both funny and practical advice!&gt; realism in fantasy movies

I don't want *realism* in fantasy movies. However, the film/show should follow all the rules in its own universe. The best example I have of a show breaking the rules of their own universe is Torchwood: Miracle Day. The entire series, over and over again, Jack says his immortality has absolutely nothing to do with his blood. They've even demonstrated that through his flashbacks to when he was being tortured in the 19-teens. And then at the very end of the show, Jack gives Mekhi Phifer a blood transfusion and then Mekhi Phifer's character is suddenly immortal. No. No no no no NO! You just spent 10 hours telling us that's not how it works, and then you make it so that's how it works.The movie is very different from the book, though. I can understand King hating the movie because the changes made in the film completely undermine what King was going for with the book. The movie is a great fucking movie, but it's a terrible **adaptation** of The Shining.I totally agree. My best example is Gme of Thrones. I find the books to be slightly boring. It took me 4 attempts over 15 years to read the first book, and I only managed it this year because the TV show made me care about the characters. I feel that GOT is better than the books, because although GRRM is a great story engineer and world builder, he's not a great writer. The TV series is so good that it's allowed me to enjoy the books.

And the flip side of that is Harry Potter. The movies left out SO MUCH from the books that are very important. And I'm not even talking about who made the Marauder's Map (although I love that backstory). I'm talking about how Harry's death at the end of 7 conferred to all of his loved ones the same protection his mother's death 16 years earlier had conferred onto him. Harry even explicitly tells Voldy "I've done what my mother did. They're protected from you. Haven't you noticed how none of the spells you put on them are binding? You can't torture them. You can't touch them." That is a HUGE plot point that the movie failed to include. It's the entire reason why Harry needed to die that night in the forest at Voldemort's hand.&gt; And when audiences try to criticize these films, they literally always say "It had no story.", which is just the silliest thing to say. 

The Star Wars prequels had little to no story, and that was one of their major flaws. The originals all had great stories.You're not alone. I have several friends in my circle who also can't stand Seinfeld and don't understand the following the show has. And I should clarify that I also feel the same way. When the entire premise of a movie/show is based on shitty science, it's a valid criticism. For example, the Doctor Who episode Kill the Moon is about how the moon is an egg getting ready to hatch. It creates havoc on earth because somehow it's gaining mass. Except, eggs don't gain mass as they gestate. They get all the nutrients for growth from the yolk. The egg is essentially a closed system, so it should maintain the same mass as it develops. And let's not forget the dog-sized *prokaryotic* spiders on said moon egg. 

Bad bad science makes for bad bad shows/movies.My husband and I actually though the goat was a trap. For either walkers or people.I also feel like Rick does a lot of the things he does so that the people he loves won't have to. He's able to carry the burden of biting out a guy's throat because the alternative is his son carrying the burden of having been raped.

Edit: Also, in that episode where Lori dies and Rick is staring at Carl, Rick is devastated because he knows what Carl had to do. Regardless of how Rick felt about Lori leading up to her death, he knows that Carl is going to be fucked up over losing his mom and then having to shoot her in the head. And that thought devastates him.I totally agree.I'm sure the man wouldn't have stopped at just raping Carl *if it was up to him.*Sorry, but I don't want to hang out with assholes. I have too many other things I can be doing with people are *aren't* assholes.I really hate the stupid Coral joke. Rick doesn't cay Coral. He says Cawrrrrl.Shane tried to rape Lori. 

Lori died giving birth. *That's* a great lesson to send your kid. 

Carl shot his own mom in the head so she wouldn't turn. 

The Gov sexually assaulted Maggie. 

The Claimer tried to rape Carl.

Rick bit out that Claimer's throat. 

The Terminite women were all raped by the Butchers. Multiple times. Sure, it's just implied, but would YOU want to explain to a 9-year-old why those women keep getting taken?

The Terminites ate Bob's leg. In front of Bob. 

And that's ignoring all the gore. Just scenes of a disturbing nature.His name IS Carl. Coral just a stupid joke people make for some fucking stupid reason.&gt; The pussification of society is real these days. 

That's hilarious, because 20 years ago, this show would have been way too violent for non-premiere cable TV.He's not making the decision for you, he's just judging you because of it. We all are.So, I'm looking at that link, and I'm not seeing any references to Eastman.You joke, but that's a classic part of the Hero's Journey. The Mentor must die so the protagonist can become the Hero. It's why Obiwan died. It's why Qui-Gon died. It's why Yoda died. Gee, it's almost like George Lucas read The Hero With a Thousand Faces.Sigh. Rick doesn't say Coral. I think Gimple has done an amazing job. But I agree that the villains before Gimple were still awesome.Might as well just post a picture of some feta, because both are unlikely to be found. 

What a crap post this is.You're forgetting all the people who've gotten eaten.Is this entire season going to take place on the same day? That would be pretty fucking amazing!It's an old STUPID joke because Rick says Cawrrrrl. Not Coral.Not really. It makes sense that the mentor dies. Why would the inexperienced, less skilled rookie take on the great fight when the highly skilled, very experienced mentor is *right there*?Shit, I totally forgot about the whole Lizzie arc! That's some really disturbing shit, and I wouldn't want a little kid getting exposed to that, either. As you said, the gore is bad enough by itself, but then you add in all the evil shit people do, and that just makes it completely inappropriate for children.That's the same bullshit tactic used to get Prop 8 passed in CA. The pro-Prop 8 groups ran a bunch of ads that said, "Your kids will learn about homosexuality in schools, against your wishes!!!!" Of course, there was nothing at all in the bill about teaching kids about homosexuality in schools.&gt; A year or two later a guy transferred to our class and he wasn't cool with it, so we got him to change in the bathroom instead of the trans guy, seems more fair to me as he was the one with a problem.

That's... That's actually the way to do this. The people who have a problem are the ones who should have to change. They need accommodations, so they should just go ahead and accommodate themselves. The rest of us can just get on with our lives.In my 20s, one of my male friends came out. So, being a good female friend, I accompanied him a few times to a variety of gay clubs while he was getting comfortable with his sexuality. The first time I had to use the bathroom (after a couple of fruity drinks), I was stunned to find it filled with guys. And then I realized, this is a male gay club. Why *wouldn't* the patrons all just use whatever bathroom they wanted? I'm one of probably 3 women in the entire place. Yeah, it was a little weird to pee in a stall in a bathroom with 10 guys in it, but the music/bass covered any awkward sounds. But bathroom doors are magic! They lock out perverts of the wrong gender ALWAYS!So, it sucks that your family has cut YOU off from them. But, you still did the right thing. 

Long story: I am friends with a trio of siblings. Their maternal grandfather molested all of his children (my friends' mom and her two siblings, so my friends' aunt and uncle). For some fucked up reason, my friends' mom didn't cut her father out of the familial equation even when she had kids, and he molested at least one of my friends. We suspect a second because she's got massive issues and is very freaked out by male anatomy and male sexuality. She's what I consider "male heterophobic." When we were in our teens and had no idea that her grandfather was a pedophile, we used to freak our friend out by saying male sexual terms. "Erection! Ejaculation!" stuff like that. She'd *freak out* and we thought it was funny. (Yes, we were assholes, but we had no idea the grandfather had molested his kids for basically their entire childhoods, and were teenagers. Teenagers aren't the best at empathizing. Once we learned about the family's history, we stopped that shit because we knew it wasn't funny.) In our 20s, that female friend started cutting and displaying other disturbed psychology issues. She got into counseling, and she's doing much better now that it's been a couple more decades. She's also a lesbian, but because her family is fundie Christian, she believes she's going to hell. Her story is a tragic story, and I am very sad about it, but I can't convince her to love herself. So, she's doing better, but she's still fucked up. And I suspect all of that happened because her grandfather molested her. She also wet the bed until she was way too old to be wetting the bed. So, all signs point to something awful happening to her in her childhood, and seeing as how her grandfather was a child rapist *who also molested her brother at least once*, I'm going out on a limb and saying he molested her. She's also the oldest, so I'm sure she got the brunt of his "affections."

So, yeah, it sucks that your kids won't know their extended family. But they also won't be getting molested for years by their step-grandfather, and that's a big WIN to me. And frankly, any people who would cut off the victim in this kind of situation is an asshole, and life is too short for assholes.And the point is that *child molestation is a sin*. The leadership of his church shouldn't be asking for leniency. They should be at the head of line demanding justice for his victim.&gt; \u201cI could go on and on,\u201d she wrote, \u201cbut would just be repeating that he is a good man!\u201d

No. Rapists aren't good people. *Child* rapists are full on evil.It's not abusing math, it just talked about the results of a survey.I know more white people than I know black people (just a numbers game), so I know more victims of white on white crime than I do black on black crime.New point? That was the *original* point, I'm just reiterating it. "If people don't want religion to be blamed, maybe they shouldn't use religion to defend child molesters?" If people don't want religion to be blamed, then religious leaders shouldn't defending the child molester. They should be aiding the victim and condemning the molester.

Zero goalposts have been moved. You're just very much losing your pathetic argument.Mr. Miyagi needed to live so he could defeat his own arch enemy: Sensei John Kreese!&gt; The victim was a **Pheonix**, Arizona bartender at one of his favorite hangout spots.

Really? Really?
&gt; Open carry has been around much longer than the NRA my friend.

Did you know that, in the Wild Wild West, people had to drop their sidearms off at the sheriff before entering town? Please provide a citation that shows Harry Reid obstructing Bush appointments to the extent that the GOP has blocked Obama appointments.And right now isn't one of those times.&gt; Ezra Miller

Oh, he's the guy playing the Flash instead of the actor currently *killing it* on TV as the Flash. Not that that's Ezra's fault. But yeah, I'm bitter.I actually want the BBC (or even a US pay cable channel) to do a Harry Potter series. 7 seasons, 6-10 episodes per season depending on the source book. Let the kids grow up with the filming but allow the run time to be long enough that we get all the stuff they left out of the movies. I realize that's a joke, but many of the actors in this movie are American. Like, you know, Ron fucking Perlman.I think it was more "Just no Americans." One of the early ideas was to cast Macauley Culkin as Harry and have Spielberg direct it. Rowling heard about that, and squashed it. Because seriously, fuck that.&gt; He looks like he could be the 13th Doctor. Even the wand almost looks like a sonic screwdriver.

I'm going to be brave and say this out loud: I think both Dan Radcliffe and Rupert Grint could *totally* pull off the Doctor. Tom Felton is a great actor, but I think he's a little "too cool" to manage it. Unless they went with a dapper sort of Doctor.I totally disagree. Harry Potter is huge, and people will be excited to see more of that universe. The Hobbit movies suck compared to LOTR, but they still made shit tons of money.Are you kidding? This movie is going to rake in the fucking dollars. Holy fuuuuuuuuck that's amazing!&gt; the original point was they were using religion to defend him.

They ARE using religion to defend him. They are using his church participation as proof that he's innocent and deserves leniency. 

&gt;New Market Church trustee Gene Blankenship wrote that \u201cOnly God, Darren and (the victim) know what truly happened. I feel Darren may have admitted to things he did not do after hours of interrogation and all the pressure to admit guilt.\u201d

&gt;Paden\u2019s great-aunt, Dixie Wilson, talked of her great-nephew\u2019s service as a junior deacon at the local New Market Christian Church. \u201cI could go on and on,\u201d she wrote, \u201cbut would just be repeating that he is a good man!\u201d In a telephone interview, Wilson asserted, \u201cMy opinion is, most people don\u2019t believe it happened. \u201cAre you for a child molester? Absolutely not,\u201d said Wilson, 82. \u201cBut I don\u2019t think we\u2019re talking about a child molester."Why not? The Hobbit trilogy sucked and it made almost $3 billion. All this movie has to do is not suck and it'll do the same, if not better.Which is funny because the group felt Lori's death much more strongly than they felt T-Dog's.Well it's kind of moot regardless.It's cool, I have a few hours before I need to head into work. And then I can check back after, too. And then again tomorrow morning.Jesus Christ, you are just as willful as the people who say this guy's innocent. Despite multiple people presenting you evidence, you refuse to believe them. 

Have a nice life, Forrest.&gt; I'm in 100 percent agreement. Another thing to support this, is that Glenn is basically Master Chief. He is strong, fast, and brave, but he has one thing the others don't: luck.

I completely disagree with that. Everyone who's still alive at this point in the zombie apocalypse is alive because they're lucky. (Or maybe unlucky?)I think the fact that the scene was shot to be intentionally ambiguous means he's not dead. For example, there are two deaths at the end of that last season of Game of Thrones, which I won't spoil by naming. However, one was filmed and it's obvious this person was stabbed numerous times, and since there's no MASH unit nearby, this person is going to die. On the other hand, another character is "killed" off screen. You see the "killer" raise their blade and start the swing, but then it cuts away and you don't see the conclusion. We don't know what's happened to either character at this point, but why cut away if that person is actually now dead? It's not like HBO is hesitant to film gory scenes.

In Glenn's case, it's pretty clear the walkers are eating Nick's guts. The show worked so hard to make Glenn and Nick's clothes match almost perfectly, including a continuity error where Glenn's shirt gets unbuttoned in between cuts.

And that being said, based on Glenn's and Maggie's behavior in 4b, it's realistic for Maggie to search for Glenn. And if he's dead, it would be heartbreakingly realistic if Maggie found no evidence as to his fate. He's just gone. And she'll never know what happened. Of course, that doesn't mean we won't feel his absence.Joshua is actually the Anglicized version of Yeshua, which is Jesus's actual name. Essentially, if anyone gets their knickers in a twist, they're fucking stupid."It's for you."There are so many, how do I choose??

I will say the one that makes me tear up every time is Rick and Carl finding Judith's bloody carseat. Rick starts blubbering and loses it, and Carl redirects his grief at a nearby walker and then loses it himself. Both guys did a great job in that scene. Fuck, I just watched it again right now and I'm all teary. 58 seconds to make me cry.IIRC, they actually tried to make a moat around the prison, but it kept filling with water and collapsing. So they had to nix that from the script.Only if Carl is armed. He's not the best at melee combat.Oh, look, you didn't actually fulfill my request. I'll do it for you. 

[This image](http://www.motherjones.com/files/filibuster-dead-02_0.jpg) is 2 years old, and the GOP had at that point already blocked more than twice the number of nominees for Obama as the Democrats did to Bush *for his entire 8 years*.

Also, FTFA: "The Senate has confirmed just nine judges nominated by President Obama so far this year. **It's the slowest pace of confirmations in more than half a century, on track to match the 11 confirmations in 1960**."That's True, especially since Ron can't raise his left arm over his shoulder.

And that being said, Ron actually reminds me of Teddy from Stand By Me. It's really sad that in America, this is something "rich people of Reddit do"I have long hair. Every day I had to spend 15 minutes cutting my hair out of the roller bar. It completely negated the entire point of having a Roomba. I'd rather just vacuum every day for 15 minutes. And for some reason regular vacuums don't have this problem as frequently, and I only have to do it about once a year. One time I forgot to clean out the Roomba (I forgot once, one day) and my hair made the part where the roller snaps in melt due to friction. I called Roomba and they sent me a whole new one for free. Then I turned around and sold it (the replacement) on Craig's List for $100.On the other hand, if you have plenty of money but not enough time, spend money on things that take up your time. Like, do a Super Suppers or Dream Dinners thing, where you go for 2 hours on a weekend and prep all your dinnersfor the month for ~$200. It's more expensive, but you get it all done up front and in 2 hours. 

Essentially, think to yourself, "This costs me X amount of money and X amount of time" and if that money value is less per hour than you make at your job, then consider going that route. 

And again, obviously this is only applicable if you have money but not time. 

Edit: Removed a very important zero.Near my husband's 11th birthday, one of his aunts gave birth. That meant everyone forgot my husband's birthday, so at the last minute the family members individually went out and all got him packages of socks. He says it would have been better if they'd just not gotten him anything at all. He's now over 50, and he still talks about that shitty birthday.When I was a kid, my dad had a .22 rifle that I didn't kow he had until I was a teenager. So, it wasn't at hand at all since we kids didn't even know about it. 

Now that I'm an adult, I have zero guns and am not at all interested in them. One brother also has no interest in guns, but the other one lives in a small town in Missouri now, and guns are now part of his life and his culture. He also hunts. He didn't have one for protection at all, just for hunting (and I'm not even sure what he has aside from some sort of rifle). You didn't answer my request. I asked for a citation showing that Bush nominees were blocked to the same extant as Obama's.Oh shit, that's supposed to say two HUNDRED.Right?!?Well, of course Glenn did that. That's the kind of guy Glenn is.Uh, that's kind of my point. &gt; I don't think there has even been five "character development" episodes. Maybe three?

Are you kidding? Every episode in 4b is character development.Gimli could do it.And if 1366 does pass, it'll make it almost impossible to raise taxes in WA. (See: California's budget crises of the 2000s) So it sounds like those "wealthiest" Washingtonians who voted against 1366 are okay with their taxes going up, even though it'll hurt them the most.I hate Tim Eyman, but I agree with you on that.I think we call those men Republicans."I hate taxes! Why is traffic so bad lately?"

Gee, you myopic idiot, maybe it's because you voted to cut the public transit budget.Individually, one vote won't matter. Collectively, they sure as hell do. We had less than 30% voter turnout this time. The wall is fucking disgusting and I can't believe people promote this.To be fair, CA has much longer on ramps than WA, especially in the Seattle metro area. It takes less skill to get on the freeway in CA than it does in Seattle.My husband brings in about $70k. I'm a student who works very part time on campus, so my income basically pays for my school expenses. Our budget is tight because our rent has gone up ~10% every year for the last 3 years. We even downgraded our apartment a few years ago, but we're now currently paying $200 *more* for the 2 bedroom place than we were paying for the 3 bedroom place in the exact same apartment complex 4 years ago. We live in Fairwood, east of Renton, and pay $1458/month for our 2 br/2ba apartment in a sketchier neighborhood. We have one 10-year-old car with no car payment. My husband takes public transit to work downtown (paid for by his employer) and I take the car to school and work because it would take me literally 2 hours if I used public transit. We have a budget for disposable income, which includes basically any expenses that aren't regular monthly bills. We're homebodies who love to cook, so we don't have many entertainment expenses, except for when we find a Kickstarter we want (need!) to back for a game or game accessory. Movies are so expensive nowadays that we only go when we just can't wait. We don't have much evening free time because our commutes are so long (his is ~1 hour each way, mine is less), and I have class in the evenings this quarter. While we have iPhones, we always buy the prior generation rather than the most current, and we only upgrade when our phones are too outdated to work properly. I had a 3gs for 4.5 years, and only upgraded because it got so slow, it was the most expensive dumb phone on the planet, only useful for texts and phone calls. 

That being said, we're able to go visit family/friends once a year, especially since we can just stay at their houses thus saving us hotel money. So, money is a little tighter than I'd like, but we still have the financial freedom to live well. We get HBO every season for Game of Thrones, but we then cancel it because it's not worth it otherwise. When money was tighter, we'd skip watching it as it aired and instead save that subscription money and then just buy that series when it came out on BluRay. That being said, when our rent increased last month by $120, we decided to go through our bills to try and make up for it, and we cut down on a few things. So, that's less money flowing into Seattle because of our rent increase.

We moved to Seattle because my husband works in video games, and it seemed the best place for him to get a job. I'd just gotten laid off after 12 years with the same company, and I underestimated how hard it would be to get a job in the economic downturn. And that's why I'm back in school to become a nurse. I can get a job anywhere as a nurse, and make great money at the same time. So, we have a few years of less money than we'd like, but once I start working we'll be doing very well. I don't think I'll ever watch S3 again, it was just that bad. (I've seen S2 three times now, for comparison's sake, and it's my second least favorite season. But it doesn't suck the way S3 does.) So, I choose to follow your example re:Andrea. From now on, I'm gong to remember her and her vibrator.So, she's Carol from Earth 2?Because it's really fucking disgusting, and not something the characters would jump to do at every opportunity. Especially since bathing is a rare treat.I lived in South Riding in Chantilly (Loudoun County), and there's a quarry less than a mile from my old house. It's called [Chantilly Crushed Stone, and it's right off the 50 on Tanner Lane](https://www.google.com/maps/@38.9232026,-77.4981335,1599m/data=!3m1!1e3). It makes sense that people would be in the cities, though. Too many damn walkers.Man, I grew up in San Diego (so, close to Hollywood), and I *still* think it's cool when stuff is filmed there! I think he could do a great job. He was on Sarah Conner and also Life, both as bad guys (kinda). Eh, in reality, pathogens require a living host to function, especially viruses. Viruses aren't alive, they're just bits of genome that hijack the host's cellular functions. That means it can't be a virus, since once the host dies the viruses have no functionality and therefore no ability to take over the cerebellum. It could be bacterial, but the host wouldn't die and then be resurrected, the bacteria would just take over. Same goes for a parasite. And there are examples of parasites (and bacteria) taking over their hosts and making them do shit that both harms the host and leads to the spread of the parasite. However, once the host is dead, the host is dead. That's part of why so many modern zombie stories use a pathogen that keeps the host alive, so the zombies are living infected people and not dead people walking. It's more scientifically accurate.

TL;DR: The entire basic premise of TWD walkers is unrealistic. Just go with it.I don't konw about rural WA so much, but the on ramps in the Seattle area are definitely shorter than the ones in urban CA. There are several here that are both on ramps and off ramps, and they're like 75 feet so you get a big clump of people fighting to get in and out of that lane in that short distance. It's fucking retarded.Last Christmas break, I blew through S1 and S2 in a week. Sure, it's only 16 episodes, but still. A week. Then I hit S3, and it took me 3 weeks to get through that season alone. 

Fast-forward to last week, and I've watched through Claimed (episode 4.11) in 7 days. It'd be more, but there are so many great shows on right now that I can't let those pile up or my TiVo will run out of space. 4 has been *amazing*, and this is my second time through, and it's just as engaging as the first time I watched it.&gt; It just makes me mad how in the first couple seasons it took some intense head bashing to get one down, and now its just a quick knife into the skull and makes it seem so easy. 

Actually, that IS scientifically plausible. The zombies have poor nutrition, so their bodies are leeching Ca^^2+ from their bones, making their bones (including the skull) weak. It also explains why whacking them in the leg makes the fall over now. 

&gt;Even a scratch was deadly, and yet they just grab and shove them around not caring about being scratched. 

I don't think scratches were ever deadly, just bites. And only because the infection kills quickly. 

&gt;It's kind of annoying how they are no longer a threat anymore unless in completely overwhelming hoards. 

Nah, I'm cool with that. They never were that hard to kill, it's just that most folks didn't know you had to go for the head. Even Tara didn't know that, 16 months into the zombie apocalypse. Once they figured it out, it's simple and effective. Walkers are slow, stupid, clumsy, and only dangerous if they can bite you.S2 is the farm season, and it actually holds up really well in later viewings. Especially since Dale and Lori were right about Shane, and that makes their whining bearable. Hell, it makes me root for them. 

S3 is the Woodbury bullshit with Andrea. The prison parts are great, but everything having to do with Andrea is fucking awful.The ballots remaining to be counted should be included in that 39%. I was actually just referencing King County, not Seattle proper. I even googled it to be sure. 

But 38% is still pathetically low.I think those would look great! There's absolutely nothing wrong with blue and ivory house exteriors. It's actually kind of classy IMO.&gt; I'll still hate Lori cause I knew Shane was evil anyways.

Of course Lori knew Shane was evil. He tried to rape her at the CDC. If you love someone, you don't rape them.

&gt;I actually liked Shane.

Shane's an asshole and a murderer and would-be rapist. Fuck him. I'm glad he's dead.&gt; Also, great /u/

Thanks! :DThat's True, but that's no reason to hate Lori. You're supposed to hate the bad guy, even if you love hating him.They still will, but at least they will also remember the outpouring of support from the community, and in particular that trooper.&gt; A typical election turnout is 25-35%.

A typical *non-presidential* turnout is 25-35%. And that's pathetic. And if anything that means voters have MORE say since hardly anyone votes.That is actually how my husband and I feel.I just watched the Gov in S4, and I think they do a great job with him. I actually really like David Morissey, and I like him as the Gov. But S3 is still impossible to get through with the Woodbury stuff.True Story: They filmed the exterior of my dad's work (Southwest Marine) in the the scene where the ship docks in San Diego. Yes, he was super excited, even though it literally had no effect on their work day, and they didn't even know exactly when it happened. (It was footage from San Diego Bay, so it's not like the film crew needed access to their site.)&gt; The public is never going to be as interested as you want them to be

Are you sure? Because historically, our voter participation rate has been much higher than 39%.What fucking hypocrites. And exactly stories like these that make me choose to not visit retail establishments on holidays. I think it really sucks that retail employees have to work holidays, so I give my input in the form of not shopping on holidays.As I once told my brother, who is a young earth creationist and is angry that I'm an atheist, "I'm an atheist, and yet I've managed to not commit a single felony my entire life, all without the threat of damnation hanging over my head."Shane explicitly told her Rick was dead. She had no reason to assume he was lying. Chandler Riggs be like, "Why Laurie Holden be shootin' me in the knee?"[BURN!](http://vignette4.wikia.nocookie.net/walkingdead/images/8/88/Kelso-BURN.jpg/revision/latest?cb=20140823000451)I don't miss the Gov (because David Morrissey did his job so well that I cheered when Michonne stabbed him through), but yeah, DM is awesome.At least his finger gun is at an odd angle.Why does he look like a fucking Three Musketeer?The water IS dumb. Water is the most abundant compound in the universe. Nothing could live and have that kind of reaction to water, because water is so damn ubiquitous in our universe.I am aware of watergenic urticaria. It's not the *normal* condition for humans. An entire species of people who can die from exposure to the most common compound in the universe is *fucking retarded.*That's fucking retarded. That's also not how you bless water.It's a movie. It's okay to not want to spend 27 minutes discussing the finer points of a movie that has a massive plot hole.You're not supposed to do anything to the title. You're supposed to copy it directly from the article.No, Mormonism is way too big at this point to be considered a cult. Unless you think Methodism is a cult, too?I'm not the guy you were originally talking to. I just agree with him.LDS is the 4th largest Christian denomination in the United States, with 6.3 million members. 

Just so you know, sociologists define a cult in part by how many people follow it. The population must be tiny. Mormonism is fucking huge.No, he didn't. The title from the article reads, "Mormon Church makes same-sex couples apostates, excludes children from blessings and baptism."Nope, they're definitely aliens. Yes, it is. They are followers of Jesus Christ. 

Edit; Getting downvoted by idiots because what I'm saying goes against their feels. Suck it up, you babies. Netanyahu didn't meet with Obama earlier this year, he met with the Republicans in Congress. *They're* your Huckleberry. &gt;\u201cAs you may know, I was fired by American Apparel, the company I founded in Montreal over three decades ago, with no severance or otherwise,\u201d Charney said in a letter dated Wednesday to the judge presiding over the case. \u201cAll of my shareholder interests have been wiped out, and I have depleted my savings on defending my life\u2019s work and legal rights.\u201d

So, basically he's being treated like any other American worker, and he's angry about it? Hunh.Sorry, bud, Mormons are considered Christians by everyone that matters.Well, I've actually studied religion in university, and I feel pretty confident that Mormons are considered a denomination of Christianity by scholars.No worries.It's really not. One of the defining features of a cult is that it has a small number of followers. There are over 15 million Mormons worldwide. At this point, it's just a different denomination of Christianity. 

If you have a problem with what I just said, that's on you. But social scientists and scholars have a set definition for what a cult, and Mormonism doesn't fit into that definition.Why the fuck is Boba Fett on that? He's barely in the series at all. I just don't understand why everyone loves him.I agree completely. I've never understood the fascination with Boba Fett. The guy died, and not even in a great way. Unbreakable is a brilliant superhero origin story. I love that movie. 

Fun fact: The kid who played Bruce's son in Unbreakable is now on Marvel's Agents of S.H.I.E.L.D., although not as a superhero.I think we're all just disappointed by him. He had such promise, and yet he managed to give us both The Happening and The Last Airbender.Don't get me started on how fucking retarded the sarlacc is. 

Too late, you got me started. Humans don't live for 1000 years, so they can't be digested alive for a thousand years.That's pretty fucked up. :(I used to work at Blockbuster in my youth. One of my customers was a middle aged mentally-disabled guy named Mike. Mike had a terrible scar across the bridge of his nose, creeping up to very near one of his eyes. Mike didn't *look* like he should have been mentally disabled, and he didn't speak strangely. He just had a child's mind. I always wondered if he was like that because of some terrible accident that also gave him that scar. Seriously, what the fuck was that bullshit?I hate every character on that show.His was the only character in that season that I actually liked.&gt; all the characters are such caricatures

You hit the nail on the head. 

Penny is a pretty but dumb girl from the Midwest who moved to LA to become an actress and is instead a waitress. 

Sheldon is an apsie nerd with an ego that matches his IQ who find it impossible to socialize with non-nerds (and who non-nerds find it imposible to socialize with).

Raj is the Indian import who is so nerdy he *literally* can't talk to women.

Harold is the negatively stereotypical Jewish guy who lives in his overbearing Jewish mom's house even though he's an adult. He is so socially awkward that he doesn't realize he's socially awkward. Also, does he have his clothes custom made? Because you can't buy shit like that off the rack.

Leonard is the guy we're supposed to identify with. He's smart but decent looking, awkward but in a charming way, friendly with both nerds and non-nerds, is still nerdy but yet also becomes exasperated by his nerdier friends. That is one of the best comedy episodes in TV history. "No, Ted! I *literally* mean literally!!!!!"

*sounds of shattering glass*Ben Stiller usually does that awkward embarrassing sort of comedy. I hate that sort of comedy. 

He's got a few not like that (Tropic Thunder, Dodgeball, The Watch), and I really love those ones.It's actually really great. And Will Ferrell doesn't do his normal thing in it.My username is for you.That's too deep for Falling Skies.No, Shane was already thinking about murdering Rick right after he came back. Remember, in the fifth episode Dale sees Shane pointing his gun at Rick's back? And then in the next episode Shane tried to rape Lori. 

Shane has already gone off the deep end by the end of S1, and he continues his decline when he murders Otis. Lori and Dale were 100% right about Shane being bonkers.Shane was already thinking about killing Rick in S1. In episode 5, Dale sees Shane point his gun at Rick's back. In the next episode, he tries to rape Lori because he "loves her." Except when you love someone, you don't try to rape them.

&gt;When he was putting the planks no the windmill to set up a sniper perch she called him down and apologized and thanked Shane for everything he did for them. 

She did that because Dale had just died, and Dale was always the peacekeeper of the group. She was trying to make peace with Shane in order to keep the group together. She literally did it in Dale's memory. Shane had already descended too far into darkness and didn't see that as an olive branch, he saw it was a wedding proposal. Because he was nuts.

No one is to blame for Shane's actions except Shane himself.&gt; The "good" and "genuine" side of the Governor was 100% lies told to have Andrea be on his side.

Agreed the Gov was a master manipulator. We know this because he fucking did a second time in 4a. He got his entire group killed aside from Tara, and he got a huge number of Rick's group killed, and he ruined the prison. For nothing. I didn't mind Andrea in S2. She was doing what she thought best, and trying to help the group in the ways she was most skilled. Frankly, as a woman myself, I totally understand her desire to not let society decline back into historical gender roles. Andrea is smart as fuck and very physically capable. She's wasted washing dishes and doing laundry. 

S3 is another story. She just can'tg believe the Gov is l ying to her, despite *literally everyone else she knows telling her he is.* I get that that's how real life is. My own brother let his wife cut him off from his entire family because she wanted him all to herself, and he didn't realize it was going on until years later, despite us telling up front that she was doing exactly that. But that doesn't make her an empathetic character. It makes her weak, and I think we all saw in S2 that she's NOT weak. And I didn't like that change. It felt wrong and against her nature. &gt; From having Beth almost kill herself

Oh, yeah, I'd forgotten about that bit of fuckery.&gt; it's super suspicious that she hooked up with her husband's best friend barely a month after he "died"

People react to grief in weird ways. Also, the world almost literally ended for everyone. I think it makes sense she'd seek comfort in the arms of one of her oldest friends. Also, she only thought Rick was dead because Shane told her as much. 

&gt;after she was the one who gave Shane all of these mixed signals

She never gave Shane ANY mixed signals. The only signal she was projecting to him after Rick back back was, "I'm with Rick. You need to go away." The only reason she approached him on the farm at the end of S2 was because Dale had just died and she was trying to emulate him keeping the peace. She extended an olive branch to Shane in memory of Dale.&gt;  We may just have different interpretations of it but I didn't see that as emulating Dale at all. 

Ini the episode Better Angels, it starts with Rick's eulogy to Dale. The main theme of that eulogy is that the group is broken (as expressed by Dale in the prior episode), and the best way to honor Dale's memory is to unbreak the group. And then shortly after is when Lori goes to Shane to make amends.&gt; She very specifically sought to learn those skills; she didn't already possess them.

That's True, but then she ended up being really good at it. And I think she knew she would be. 

&gt;You're right that the shift she had in S3 felt wrong. She was so desparate to believe the Governor that she walked around with blinders on. That's not the same woman we saw in S2, but then I guess we saw her go one way and Carol go the opposite. I was just glad to see show Andrea gone.

I agree completely.Not to the extent they do in Seattle.&gt; She was the root cause of everything bad that happened throughout the season, 

No, **Shane** was the root cause of everything bad that happened throughout the season.No, she didn't. Shane betrayed HER, and Rick. Shane told her Rick was dead. Betrayal #1. Then he tried to rape her in the CDC after she told him in no uncertain terms that her relationship with him was over, and that she and Carl were *Rick's* family. Betrayal #2. Then Shane attempts to murder Rick. Betrayal #3. Lori and Shane wanted nothing more than for their relationships to go back to how it was before. It's not Lori's fault Shane went off the deep end. And no, he didn't love her. You don't rape someone you love. What?? No, she talked to Shane during that episode to make peace because she was trying to unbreak the group in honor of Dale's memory. RIck gave that amazing eulogy to Dale and said, "Dale said our group was broken. He was right. The way we honor Dale is to *un*break it." That's what Lori was doing. She was extending Shane an olive branch, and he as usual misinterpreted it as something completely different. It's not *Lori's* fault that Shane was crazy and decided to kill Rick. 

Shane is the only one responsible for Shane's shitty decisions. Both Lori and Dale were right about Shane being dangerous. &gt; I mean, we all remember that Shane almost raped her, right? 

Apparently a lot of people don't remember that. or think that he did it because he loved her. 

I really don't understand the hate everyone has for Lori. Shane was totally fucking bug nuts by the end of S2, and it's not because of Lori.&gt; The fault is ultimately brought on Lori because she's too afraid to decide between the two and make a clear statement.

What? No, she's *absolutely* chooses Rick. She makes that clear to Shane over and over again. I really don't understand why people think she gave Shane mixed signals. *Every* signal after Rick came back was screaming loud and clear I AM RICK'S WIFE. CARL IS RICK'S SON. FUCK OFF, SHANE.She only did that one time, right after Dale died. From the moment Rick showed up to the moment Dale died, she was all about distancing herself and Carl from Shane. She only extended that olive branch to Shane to honor Dale's memory. In Rick's eulogy to Dale, Rick reminds the group that Dale said the group was broken, and the way to honor Dale's memory is to unbreak the group. So Lori tried to unbreak the group, and Shane took that as, "Hey, I should totally murder Rick."

There was no waffling back and forth on Lori's part. The *second* Rick was back, Lori was done with Shane. And that sucks for Shane, but in Lori's eyes, Shane is the one who *lied* to her and said that Rick was dead.And that's proof that Shane was fucked beyond repair. The confrontation between him and Rick was inevitable by then.I just watched the two episodes around Dale's death because I was trying to refresh myself on the circumstances of Lori's convo with Shane, and damn, I miss Hershel. I watched the scene where Hershel gives Glenn the pocket watch, and I teared up big time. *sniff*But Shane's a badass! You, know, except for the fact that he totally isn't.

Shane was probably right about how to handle Randall. But that's only because the world was filled with Shanes and not Ricks. Shane is right because the world is just as fucked up as he is.Because *there's no way* the would-be rapist is at fault in that situation. It's gotta be the woman. *How dare she* end their relationship after she finds out her husband is still alive after all, even though the would-be rapist told her he was dead!&gt; He knew she purposefully pitted them (Rick and Shane) against each other so that **she wouldn't have to choose between them.**

But she chose Rick. Over and over and over again. She made it excessively clear to Shane that her relationship with him was over now that Rick was back. End of story. It was *Shane* who couldn't end it.

And honestly, I don't blame Lori for telling Rick to watch out for Shane. Shane tried to rape Lori. I'd sure as fuck make sure my husband knew to keep his eye on a guy like that, best friend or no.&gt; Lori's advocating a woman's place as one to make sure the men have a comfy home to return to and Andrea's overexcessive NO GIVE ME A GUN SO I CAN SHOOT THINGS LIKE A MAN PLS felt like such a ham-fisted attempt at addressing the roles of women in this world...

As a woman who fucking *hates* washing dishes, I totally get that whole subplot of Andreas. I don't blame her one bit.&gt; I remember one episode she is saying Shane has to go, to which Rick doesn't overly react, then the next ep she apologies to Shane and hopes they can work things out. 

In between those two events, Dale died. Rick's eulogy for Dale said "Dale says our group is broken, and he's right. The way we can honor Dale's memory is to unbreak it." That's why Lori went to make amends with Shane. She was trying to unbreak the group. Unfortunately for her, Shane was totally nuts by then and he interpreted that to mean, "Hey, I should totally kill Rick."Don't blame Lori for Shane's shitty decision. Andrea comes off as incredibly hostile and angry all S2. To everyone. I don't know if that's the writers' faults, or Laurie Holden's. Just his slow way of talking, like every word is carefully considered before speaking. I want that guy as my grandpa!No, Shane fucked it up. He told her Rick was dead. The moment she knew Rick was alive, she ended it with Shane. This is on Shane, not Lori.Shane wasn't a leader. He *thought* he was a leader, but he wasn't. The result is he would have failed to keep folks safe, and any other *True* leader entering the group would have superseded Shane's authority and forced Shane to murder that new leader, or at least try to kill said new leader and fail, getting himself killed. 

Shane was a great "villain" for S2. But 20 months later, he's baby food compared to Terminus, the Governor, the Claimers, and the Wolves.Considering all the dark shit they've done on the show, like a 10-year-old murdering her 8-year-old sister and an adult male attempting to rape a 12-year-old boy, I don't think killing a baby is particularly controversial.I think they're including Judith to show the difficulties of raising an infant in the zombie apocalypse.I'm just assuming that most folks have lost their specs. I wear glasses, and I have 3 pairs that are my actual prescription. I sure as shit wouldn't grab all 3 of them if I had to flee my house. Which means all it takes is one accident and suddenly I no longer have glasses. That being said, I'm far sighted, so I'd be alright. I don't need to see the creepy crawly details of a walker's face as I stab it in the cerebellum.I don't think Shane thought he was lying when he told her Rick was dead. I think Shane started off with good intentions. It's just, when Rick came back and Lori dumped him, he went crazy. I feel bad for that, but then he aimed his gun at Rick's back, and then he tried to rape Lori, and then he tried to murder Rick, and any empathy I have for him goes right out the window. I don't know if you're right or not, but the way you phrased that tickled my funnybone, so have an upvote!Yes. Yes, we can.Shane aimed a gun at Rick's back in S1E5.

Shane tried to rape Lori at the CDC.

Shane murdered Otis.

Shane tried to murder Rick. 

Shane is the cause of all of Shane's problems. He's the cause of all the group's problems in S2.&gt; Lori sure didn't need much time to morn her lost husband. 

Everyone responds to grief in different ways. Also, the world had ended for everyone. They lost their homes, their families, everything. I don't see anything wrong with turning to an old friend for comfort in a time like that. 

&gt;And a real friend would have waited. Shane was a horn-dog and later tried to kill his "friend". No excuse.

Sure, but again, everyone handles grief differently. Shane lost his best friend since high school. The only other person he knew who even had a clue how that felt was Lori. 

it sucks for Shane how it worked out, and I don't blame either of them for doing it. But Shane went off his rocker after Lori broke it off. He was never the same after.Lori didn't it anyone against the other. All she did was break off her relationship with Shane, who couldn't handle it. It was Shane who fucked things up. I don't blame either of them for seeking comfort in each other's arms. But I do blame Shane for how he dealt with the aftermath. If he *truly* loved Lori he wouldn't have a) tried to rape her at the CDC; and b) tried to murder her husband. Lori wasn't perfect, but it was SHANE's bad decisions that fucked shit up. You can't blame Lori for Shane making bad decisions. She never lied to him or led him on. The "worst" thing she did to him was try to make amends right after Dale's death, which he misinterpreted as, "I should kill Rick."My point is that LORI wasn't the "[the root cause of everything bad that happened throughout the season](https://www.reddit.com/r/thewalkingdead/comments/3rslrv/show_spoilersin_season_2_was_lori_responsible_for/cwr20yo)" as OP stated. THAT is what I'm refuting. Of course Shane isn't the root cause of all the season's problems. But he IS more to blame for the season's problems than Lori is. I mean, sure, she mellowed out her attitude from, "Seriously, Shane you need to FUCK OFF." to "Hey, thanks, you did save us. But seriously Shane. Fuck off." But how Shane interpreted that as, "So you mean there's a CHANCE??? I should totally kill Rick!" I have no idea. It's really not much of a mixed signal.Shit, even Pope bitched about the Mason plot armor.Nope, he lacks the charisma for that. Shane would always be a leader's right hand man but never the leader himself. Always the bridesmaid and never the bride.

Also, he's not strong enough to make it as a leader. Even if he had a group of followers, he'd just get them killed off.&gt; But then I thought, Lori could have talked to Rick, or anyone else and mentioned the situation with Shane. The fact that after everything those three had been going through, she thought it was a good idea to do it herself, just made me feel like she really was just trying to be the centre of attention and mess with the guys.

It's that old trope of not communicating with your loved ones. It's weak writing (and generally I liked the writing on this show).I agree that he very likely didn't do it with malicious intent. But Lori definitely saw it as a betrayal later when Rick showed up. And I can understand why she'd feel that way. It's a fucked up situation all around. I definitely don't judge either Lori or Shane for their relationship. Their world was ending and they both lost someone they loved dearly. It seems only natural they'd turn to each other for comfort. Did we watch the same show? Because Lori told Shane repeatedly that it's over. She told him, "Even if this baby is yours, it's Rick's." OVER and OVER tried told Shane to pound sand. She NEVER ONCE implied that if Rick wasn't the picture that she'd pick back up with Shane. And once Shane tried to rape her, there was no way she was going back to Shane even if Rick DID die. &gt;  Also it's odd how 'folks' forget that Lori cheated on Rick just a few days after being told he was dead

She didn't cheat on Rick, Shane told her he was dead. I don't judge either Lori or Shane for their behavior while they both thought he was dead. Rick sure didn't blame Lori, and he doesn't give a shit that Judith might not be his kid. I can agree with you on that one.There are dozens of us! DOZENS!Unjustifiably so.A great example of one jerk ruining it for the rest of us. (Reddit is that one jerk, not you.)I don't get it, either. These same people bitch about Skylar from Breaking Bad, completely neglecting the fact that *her husband was turning into a drug kingpin.* If Skylar was being a bitch, maybe it's because she's responding to her husband's duplicitousness?Hey, dick. Again, my point is that the other guy was wrong when he said Lori "was the root cause of everything bad that happened throughout the season." Do try to keep up.Yeah, you only got 2/3 right. Congratulations. You should be really proud.When my dad died, my mom told me, "Losing a spouse is nothing like losing a parent. I knew this was coming [cancer] but even though I've already lost my parents, I was completely unprepared for how it would feel losing my husband." And my parents didn't even have a good relationship. They should have divorced before I was born, but they stay together because of the kids (I'm the youngest). And yet my mom was still absolutely devastated when my dad died.Well she's dead, so...No, not really. That whole, "I'mma kill you, Rick" thing. You know?My husband's started off platinum blond til he was 5, and then turned brown, and now that he's an adult, it's black. 

I have a male friend who was blonde all the way through high school. I looked him up on FB a couple years ago (so~20 years after HS) and he's got very dark brown hair now. He actually looks a lot like Bob Saget now.Yes, lighter colors are recessive. My maternal grandpa was a ginger (and everyone called him Red!), and my paternal grandpa was a blond. My paternal grandmother was Portuguese, so all the light features got obliterated by the dark Portuguese genes; my dad, uncle, and brothers look Mexican. On the other side, Red married a German gal with dark hair and eyes, and their kid (my mom) has very dark brown hair and chocolate eyes. Through the magic of meiosis, I was born a ginger with absolutely no ability to tan, and chocolate brown eyes. I am the ~~black~~ red sheep of the family, and my brother used to tell me I was adopted because he was a dick when we were children.

In short, unless Judith has some distinctive feature of Shane's (my cousins all have their grandmother's nose, and it's so incredibly obvious when they're all together with her), there's no way we can use skin tone or hair or eye color to figure out whose baby she was. Not without knowing more about Rick and Lori's genetic histories.Scientifically, no, it's completely random which genes are selected during meiosis and chromosomal crossing over.It's probably Shane's, but Rick doesn't care. That's his kid. As Lori once told Shane, "Even if it's yours, it's Rick's."Bear McCreary is fucking amazing. I first learned of him from Battlestar Galactica, and that music was fantastic. He does such a great job.&gt; I feel like Bear's music is so integral to the show and it would feel practically incomplete without him.

I agree, and I felt the same way about the music in Battlestar Galactica.The show has really progressed in quality since S4. I'm watching 4 now, and it's really good. And somehow it just keeps getting better. The show's quality definitely has a positive slope starting with S4.That windmill scene happened right after Dale's eulogy. In it, Rick said that Dale though the group was broken, and the way to honor Dale's memory is to NOT be broken. So, Lori tried to unbreak the group and make peace with Shane. Who then decided "Hey, I should kill Rick" because Shane was insane and the confrontation between him and Rick was inevitable by then.

I think Rick was so angry at Lori for the way she reacted to him telling everyone he'd had to kill Shane, and then for Rick not telling everyone that everyone is already infected. But I'm hazy on that one. Why do people post this shit. Congratulations, you have some TWD figures. She *really* freaked out when Rick told her he'd killed Shane. I understand why. It's one thing to consider murder as a hypothetical, and another thing entirely to carry through with it. But I always that twist (Rick hating Lori for getting mad at him for killing Shane) seemed weird. But, I also hate S3, so I don't remember too much from it. Maybe there's more info in that season that I've since forgotten.They DO save seals and whiles. SW does a lot of good. Unfortunately, they also keep orca whales in captivity, which is incredibly inhumane. So, the bad they do negates the good they do. I love Sea World. It's actually hard for me to not go to SW because I love it so much. But I don't go, and I won't go until they no longer have any captive orcas.And yet this entire subreddit hates Lori because she DID try to go fetch Rick herself.&gt; She played both Rick and Shane 

She played neither of them. The *second* she knew Rick was alive, Shane was out. She told Shane over and over again that her relationship with him was done. 

&gt;She had to have fucked Shane and replaced Rick within a month

That is an incredibly harsh statemetn that neither Shane nor Lori deserve. Everyone responds to grief differently. Lori lost her husband and Shane lost his best friend of 20 years, and they sought each other out for comfort. There's *nothing* wrong with that. She wasn't *replacing* Rick.&gt; She played Rick and Shane both. I think was trying to see who was going to win. She would go to one and then the other, and then back again. 

No, she wasn't. The moment Rick returned and she learned he was alive, she kicked Shane to the curb. In fact, if anything she was a little *too* bitchy to Shane about it. She told Shane repeatedly to leave her and Carl alone, and that they were Rick's family, not Shane's. 

&gt;Personally, I think she was using them both, and I don't think she was all that happy it was Rick that won. 

Really? You think she'd have gone back to Shane if Rick **after Shane tried to rape her**? You really don't know women.&gt; &lt;Sigh&gt; After Dale's eulogy, which is all about group unity and staying together, she extends an olive branch to Shane.

DING DING DING! 

In a different "Lori is a fucking bitch" thread here yesterday, people were complaining that Lori gave Shane mixed signals. No, she didn't. The *one* time she extended an olive branch was exactly because you said: She took Rick's eulogy of Dale to heart and decided to try and unbreak the group. 

I really don't get why Reddit hates Lori.If that's True, then why did Lori go back to Rick? Why didn't she take that time to break it off with him, since she was (in your mind) so into Shane?It's like the fifth one. I keep having the same arguments on how Lori's not a bitch for "cheating" on Rick, she and Shane just sought comfort in each other after they thought Rick died. Lori didn't lead Shane on, she told him in no uncertain terms that their relationship was over. Lori wasn't unable to decide between Rick and Shane, she absolutely chose Rick the *second* she learned he was still alive. There's nothing wrong with Lori. Reddit just has a hate hardon for her for some reason. And at the same time they suck the murderer would-be rapist Shane's dick. Yeah, god forbid a Skylar should nag her drug manufacturing husband about all the duplicitous shit he's pulled on her. What a *bitch*.If Rick had killed Shane when Lori told him to, the farm wouldn't have been overrun.The commentary says the intro scene in the van was too confusing because it made it look like Carl was Shane's kid.I thought those were just stories about high school, Shane pranking the principal and running miles back to school during the lunch break.Oh for fuck's sake. 

Shane destroyed their friendship. Shane decided to kill Rick. &gt; Also if the virus 

it can't be a virus because viruses are just bits of genome wrapped in protein. They're not alive, so they must use the host's cellular functions to do anything. If the host dies, the virus is inert.And apparently that was the right call. If Rick had killed Shane that day, the farm wouldn't have been overrun.Noooo, the show can't have complex characters!!I don't any other character in this show who was considered a protagonist did anything at all like what Shane did to Otis.You don't remember Shane trying to rape Lori at the CDC? Or leveling his gun on Rick in the prior episode and Dale seeing him do so?

Shane was sooooooo not a good guy.The only reason Shane was right about the world is because the world is full of Shanes and not Ricks. That's definitely True. Although, I'm with Felicity on that salmon ladder thingie. *fans self*You've never been to Washington, have you? Talk about your fucked up roads...&gt; Our highways are already deathly underfunded as it is.

I hear that about CA, but now that I'm living in Seattle, the roads in CA are dreamy by comparison. 

Edit: Really, guys. WA's roads suck. They got a [D+ rating in 2013](http://www.seattleasce.org/reportcard/2013ReportCardWA.pdf), the most recent year rated. I had to dodge the same pothole on the 405S *in the left lane* for over 5 years. Honestly, the legal drinking age for one beer or one wine at a pub/restaurant should be 16. This will help teach kids that drinking isn't something you do to get shitfaced, puke, and black out. At 18, you can have all you want. But then make the legal driving age 21.I disagree. A lot of kids join the military to get out of terrible home situations, or to pay for college. It's a real ticket out for some people. Source: My grandfather lied about his age and joined the Army at 15 because he was orphaned.What if we raised the driving age to 21? Doesn't that solve a whole host of problems?Growing up in San Diego, everyone under 21 just went to TJ.Doo dee doo dee doo dooWelp, those three boys just ruined their lives. Teenagers, please be careful. You may still be minors, but you *are* old enough to totally ruin your lives.California, Virgina, and Maryland are the three states aside from WA that I've driven in extensively. We moved to Seattle in 2010. I spent the next FIVE YEARS dodging the same large pothole in the LEFT LANE of I-405 S. They finally filled it this summer. There's a section of I-5 S that's so fucked up, the first several times I drove it I thought I had a flat tire. Now I know to just avoid those two (TWO!) rightmost lanes in that area. And then there's the fact that I5 going north into the city are so worn down, each lane is a broad W, with the dips being where billions of tires have worn down the asphalt. It is fucking *ridiculous* here. I live in WA now. It's one of the most anti-tax states in the union, and that's why we have [chronically underfunded our K-12 education](http://www.seattletimes.com/seattle-news/education/supreme-court-orders-100000-per-day-fines-in-mccleary-case/) and also failed to maintain our infrastructure ([our roads and transit rated a D+](http://www.seattleasce.org/reportcard/2013ReportCardWA.pdf)).&gt; she absolutely plays Shane and Rick up against each other

No, she doesn't. From the moment she learns that Rick is alive, she tells Shane repeatedly to fuck off, that she's Rick's wife and that Carl is Rick's son. She never played Shane. If anything, she was a little too harsh on him, but I assume that's because she's angry because she believes he maliciously lied to her about Rick's death in order to get her to sleep with him. (I think Shane was just mistaken, but I believe Lori thinks it was intentional.) I agree that she's really incompetent, but that's really early in the show, and being incompetent isn't an immediate death sentence at that point.My husband and I felt the ending was so implausible, though. There's *no way* the FBI says, "She's obviously a rape victim. We *totally* don't need to review the security footage from the entire house for the last 2 weeks!" I mean, I don't feel particularly GOOD about our justice system, but I don't believe it's THAT incompetent.My husband loves the comic and doesn't really like the movie, but even he thinks that change was a good one.I loved the tv show when it aired, and I was kind of offended that they picked those two guys to be in the movie adaptation. Then I watched it, and yeah, it was a fucking great movie!The husband and I saw in the theater, and we were underwhelmed. Then, we started seeing it pop up on HBO, and for some reason we kept getting caught up in it. I think we watched the movie 3 or 4 times in about 2 weeks, in bits in pieces. Then we bought it on BR and watched it another time, plus all the extras. 

TL/DR: the movie really grew on us on subsequent viewings, and now it's in our top 10.*Dear Zachary* is so terrible because it's a True story. The hubby and I just rented that tonight for the first time. After, my  husband said, "Fuck that movie!" It was a great movie, but we're never watching that shit again. It actually kind of fucked up our evening.It occurred to me yesterday in one of the "Lori is such a bitch" threads. Shane's only right because the world is as crazy as he is now.It would force us to adopt public transit, which we need to do for like a million different reasons.My cousin did the same to pay for college and escape her asshole stepfather.Aang and Katara!The Flash is so awesome! I'm so angry that Grant Gustin won't be playing him in the movie. :(It's about a guy who takes a long time to mature into the kind of man the woman of his dreams would fall in love with. His number of sexual partners is irrelevant to the kind of husband and father he becomes.I dislike that episode because I dislike Beth. She's a fucking useless character. Carl at 12 was more capable than she was at 18.S2 holds up really well on subsequent viewings. It's actually S3 that I can't stand.I agree. It feels like a huge step backwards for Sansa. She was just getting a handle on how to deal with court intrigues, and then this happens to her. All so Reek can be redeemed. It doesn't even have anything to do with her, it's all for Reek's benefit.One of the local DJs even commented on it. "I could be driving with my eyes closed, and I still tell when we crossed into OR because the road stopped being crappy and bumpy and loud."Well I guess it's completely untenable, then.&gt; The Europeans didn't ever really find themselves in dire straits

Uh, yeah they were. No, the Natives weren't fucking them up, but they *really* struggled to survive at first.Then please explain why the roads in my neck of DC weren't also completely fucked. And DC has much harsher winters than Seattle."[Volunteers starting service after October 1, 2014 are paid $8,775 (before taxes) at the close of 27 months of service.](http://www.peacecorps.gov/volunteer/learn/howvol/faq/apply/)" That sounds fucking awesome, at less than half the rate of E1s in the military. There's also no GI Bill-type deal with the Peace Corps (although maybe there should be).

I lived in DC for a while, and although potholes happened, every spring they were filled in. Generally, the roads in VA and MD were in much better shape than the roads here in WA. And that's with the region's frozen winters.But drinking isn't going to solve your bad home situation. Joining the military can.WA really likes its regressive taxes. We have no income tax, and our wealthy pay half the tax rate our wealthy Oregonian neighbors do. Meanwhile, our poorest pay twice what OR's poorest do. 

Don't let the high gas tax fool you. WA is *very* anti-tax. Nearly every tax increase this last week failed in the elections, and Tim Eyman's latest super-majority requirement passed, again, even though our SC previously ruled it unconstitutional. Maybe your school district should have found a way to bus you to school. I sure as fuck don't want a 14-year-old behind the wheel.I did pretty much the same drive from San Diego, and I had the same experience. And it's not like it improves once you leave Tacoma.True, but I'm not just referring to this specific scenario. Kids have all sorts of ways they can ruin their lives.Is it not clear from the context?&gt; Obamacare allowed 18yr olds drive drunk

Oh good lord, that's not even close to accurate. This is a little different than sending your BF photos of your boobs. 

&gt;Students at the school described a competitive point system that classmates used to accrue photographs. Different point values were assigned to different students. Students who collected naked photographs gained points by adding these desirable children to their collections.Did you *really* just ask for nude photos of middle school kids?Are the other Indian mascots viewed by Natives as offensive? I mean, it's one thing to name your team the Aztecs or the Comanches, but Redskins? It's like naming them the Darkies or the Coloreds.I Just rewatched it a couple of weeks ago. She's really not a bitch. I guess that's justmore evidence that you should read the article before commenting, Pervert. 

" the children in the pictures were believed to be students at the high school as well as eighth graders from the middle school."As someone who has driven on highways in other states, no, the highways here are fucked. Like I said, I had to dodge the same pot hole in the left lane of the 405 for 5 years. And there's that section of 5S in Kent that's so bad, the first several times I drove it I thought I had a flat tire. So now I know to avoid the two (TWO!) lanes that are fucked up.You sound too stupid to know that I'm right.Oy, yeah, that's way worse.So it shouldn't be a crime for an 18-year-old football player to have nude photos of 13, 14, and 15 year olds?I work in a chemistry lab and I am on a government watch list because of that. So, I get ya.I was more thinking about drinking and driving, committing other serious felonies, or making babies.That's actually my point. WA gets all its revenue through regressive taxation like car taxes, gas taxes, and sales taxes. OR gets theirs through income tax, which is progressive.Why? His parents had died and his older sister's husband used to beat him. He had nowhere to go and no one to turn to for help. What else should he have done?It's not. I grew in San Diego and went to SDSU, home of the Aztecs. A few years ago there was a big kerfuffle about our mascot (Monty Montezuma) being too cartoony and stereotyped. The group angry about was all Native America.They were all talking about you behind your back. Source: My brother, who has lived in Missouri for the last 30 years, complains about the gay people he sees when he visits us in San Diego."Why do *I* have to change? He's the one who sucks."Those guys were pretty awesome. I am impressed!And the problem isn't the kids who are victims, it's the kid who are bullies. Don't punish the victims for the bullies' actions.He sounds like one of those idiots who thinks Star Trek is boring because it doesn't' have enough fighting.hGaIrAd NtTo FtUeClKlI WwAiTtEhR MtAhReK

Damn, I can't believe that actually worked out perfectly! 11 hours and 22 minutes of *perfection*!They Live.So you think it's okay for an 18-year-old to have nude photos of 13-year-olds? You obviously have your mind made up that Lori is an unrepentant bitch, and that Shane was a good guy wronged by her. Have a great life.So if a dude tried to rape you, you'd just be cool with it and choose him as your sexual partner? Somehow, I doubt that. If so, you're pretty fucked up."I'm so sad that I got caught!"It fucking sucks here. I can't wait to move back to SD.When did Lori do anything at all like what Shane did?Yeah, it totally ruined his life joining the military at 15. Which is why he went into the Navy at 18, served on the Enterprise for the entirety of her commission (and if you don't understand what that means, then you should probably stop talking), and then retired at e38 years old and became a civvie contractor for the Navy. 

But please, do go on how that was such a terrible idea for my grandfather.Nope. I just don't understand why people post pictures of commercially available TWD toys on this subreddit. There's no fucking point. At least if people post art they made themselves it's something they spent hours on instead of clicking a button on Amazon and waiting 3 days for it to show up.You need to watch the first two seasons again. The MOMENT Rick was back, Lori was done with Sahen. She NEVER led him on or gave him mixed signals. They had to interact because they lived in close quarters, but she absolutely never went out of her way to talk to him. Aside from the day of Dale's funeral, when she was trying to honor Dale's memory by making amends with Shane. 

If you think casually and disinterestedly talking to someone while at other times almost literally telling them to fuck off means they're interested in you, you have very poor social skills. If anything, Lori was a bit TOO harsh on Shane.I think I lost the beat, but untce untce untce untce*coughcough*

*Half* a season.There is a fuckton of stuff going on in the show on that one single day. It's going to take a few episodes to hammer that shit out. This episode happened on the same day they started herding the horde. It's only been like 6 hours since the horde broke free. (At least until night fell, anyway.)I'm pretty sure she was enraged and taking shit out on the walker.People complain that TWD kills lots of "redshirts" and then they turn around and complain when the show tries to get us to know those redshirts so they're not redshirts anymore. *shakes head*Things haven't been resolved because the show is still on that very same day. We've had 4 episodes taking place in the present time, and it's all been on the exact same day. Like, only 6 or 8 hours have passed. It *finally* became night in tonight's episode.&gt; her magical disappearing sister

What are you talking about? The walkers got her outside the prison after she shot the Gov.You're watching the wrong show if you think the character development is boring. That's what this show is about. The Walking Dead.S2 actually holds up really well when you binge on it. It helps that you know Lori and Dale are right about how fucked up Shane is.If you kill enough on just the other side of the wall, eventually you build a ramp of dead bodies the walkers can just climb up. But really, ~~it~~ Andrea made a great shot and Darryl DID look just like a walker. I don't blame her for taking the shot. With how weak zombie heads are, it probably would have gone right in.&gt; new york city with its pre apocalypse population of 8 1/2 million would have less than 2000 people to divide its resources amongst, there just wouldn't be the desperation for resources that we see with such a drastic population decline.

While I agree with you that the numbers are wrong, animals and other pests would destroy any food not sealed up in a can or jar in just a few months. Not to mention that's assuming that every single person who died turned into a walker. Yet zombies eat all of a person's body (see: Lori) leaving nothing behind. So those people don't turn into walkers. So while the 5000:1 ratio might be correct, the actual numbers proposed aren't even close to accurate.The best part is Jesse Pinkman actually says, 'Yeah, SCIENCE!" and not, "Science, bitch!"One problem: It can't be a virus because viruses aren't alive; they're just bits of genome wrapped in a nice ~~candy~~ protein coating. They just take over a living cell's functions, and they have no ability to do those functions themselves.Yeah, don't think too hard about it. It's literally impossible for the pathogen to be a virus because viruses need live hosts to do their thing. They're not living, and they don't have any cellular functions. Once a host cell is dead, the virus is inert. The virus wouldn't be able to reboot the cerebellum because the virus would be totally inert because it's not alive.

TL/DR: Just roll with it, like we all do over how Carl has aged 6 years in 2 years.Maybe conditioner is hard to obtain in the zombie apocalypse.You know these are totally different writers, right?So Spencer is just as mature as 14-year-old Carl? Makes sense. He's had his whole life handed to him as the son of a Congressperson.I just watched S4 again, and I kind of wish they'd had the Gov attack the prison out of nowhere. I wish I knew how shocking would be to just out of the blue have a fucking tank show up and blast the shit out of your home. I get why they did it the other way (so we'd know shit was about to go down), but I would love to have not known and just WHAM! ~~George Michael!~~ The Governor!She actually did go all the way through med school, she just decided to become a shrink after instead. And I agree with the other guy that her ignorance of the concept of lancing an infected wound is pretty outlandish. I have *zero* medical training, and I know that.&gt; Carl's actor is absolute shit

WHAAAAAAAT

The scene in that episode in S4B where Rick is regaining consciousness and Carl thinks he's reanimating makes me tear up every time. Chandler Riggs does a great job on this show, especially considering he's never had to deal with any losses like his character has dealt with. There's 15,000 of them. Also, they would never be able to clear the killed ones away from the gate, so they'd essentially be building a pile of corpses for the walkers to climb up and over into Alexandria.*sigh*

Because it's the Alexandrians coming to these conclusions. &gt; assbutt

Okay there, Castiel.Hey, Carl's  just trying not to ruin it for his dad later that day.So, twice is too many for you?It's probably not actually *sewer* water, though. Not 2 years into the apocalypse. Just rain runoff.John Bernthal did a great job.

Shane was fucking crazy and considered killing Rick even back in S1, and then he tried to rape Lori. The guy was nuts.The town just went through one very traumatic event, and they're undergoing a second a very short time later. Of course they're going to be processing what's going on and trying to come to terms with what just happened and what's now happening.Pretty sure Nicholas didn't play the hero card.And? 4b took place over 2 days. It's only been a couple of months since they lost the prison. The show's story progresses slowly because every single fucking day is a fight to survive.I understand you're complaining about a very realistic plot-point in a zombie apocalypse setting. You know the Iron Curtain was just a figure of speech and not an actual curtain made out of iron, right?He's actually right, though.It's actually really rare. Most illegal immigrants just want to lead normal lives with their families. The crime rate of illegals (aside from being here illegally) is actually far lower than the general legal resident population of the US.I totally agree. 

Also, apparently that walker inside the house was Betsie, David's wife from two episodes ago. She killed herself after finding out David had died. She probably had no idea she'd turn, because they've all been so sheltered.It actually did hit him in the head, just grazing him. Not the ear.I wasn't addressing whether or not they should be here, only that them committing felonies is actually really rare. OP was trying to paint this as something that happens all the time, and it's really not.Yeah, that TOTALLY wouldn't set the surrounding area on fire or attract even more walkers.It's apparently [7 days](http://walkingdead.wikia.com/wiki/The_Walking_Dead_TV_Show_Timeline) between the fall of the prison and everyone meeting up at Terminus.I'm constantly grossed out by everyone's hair and nails and skin.&gt;  Shane was prepared to leave the group, but Laurie asked him to stay and planted the subtle idea that her and Carl still needed him

Lori had that talk with Shane on the day of Dale's funeral. The episode opens with Rick saying that they can honor Dale's memory by healing the group. Lori was attempting to heal the group and honor Dale's memory by mending her relationship with Shane. 

It's not Lori's fault Shane interpreted that as, "I should totally kill Rick."Shane was super fucked up. He aimed his gun at Rick's back in S1E5. He then tried to rape Lori in the next episode. Then he murdered Otis *and didn't even bother putting him out of his misery.* He just shot Otis in the leg and took off. Next, Shane helped torture Randall. Then Shane tried to murder Rick. Then Shane murdered Randall and tried to murder Rick *again.* 

Every single action Shane took was to help Shane and only Shane. Every decision Shane made was in his own best interests, not the group's. Rick might be a bit of a cold hardass now, he still makes decisions *in the best interests of the group.* And Rick does a lot of the really bad stuff himself so his loved ones don't have to. Rick carries those burdens so others don't have to. 

Rick and Shane are nothing alike. Shane *NEVER* would have risked his life to draw those 30,000 walkers away from Alexandria.That's not even close to the same thing.It's a side plot. It literally does nothing to further the overall plot of the series. it makes no difference that Severus Snape was the Half-Blood Prince.&gt; The Men Who Stare at Goats for

Ewan McGregor&gt;  for some reason. 

Gee it's not like both her son and her husband died within the last 2 weeks.Title not taken from articleIt sucks for that lady because she probably DID fear for her life thanks to our stupid sensationalist 24-hour news cycle. And now she's in trouble for trying to stay safe.&gt; But just because someone says or does something that you don't agree with or like doesn't mean you're being harassed.

I would argue that having drinks thrown at you because you're walking down the street holding your gay boyfriend's hand counts as harassment. Fun Fact: Lots of blacks fled the Jim Crow era South prior to and during WWII. Why should Americans strive to be just as bad as other cultures and countries?Because a lot of the time, the people against illegal immigration specifically hate Mexicans and their culture. But not you, Jose. You're one of the good ones.They already did...Fucking hell, am I going to have to debunk this bullshit Storm Front talking point again here?

The only people who are auto-registered to vote are people who can prove they are eligible for the *regular* license and attest to their right to vote. People who can only get the "illegals" license aren't eligible to vote and aren't part of the auto-registration program. It's pretty fucked up that people brought here when they were little and have no memory of "home" will be forced out of their True home. But what the fuck do I know? I'm only a white person born and raised in San Diego.2 is a mechanically better game since they fixed a lot of glitches, particularly in multiplayer. But 1 just has a special somethin' somethin' that keeps me coming back for more. I just beat it with my husband and our friend for like the 10th time.That's not canon. Edit: People, it's really not canon. It's just wild speculation on the internet based on the Greek origin of centaurs. A cracked.com article isn't canon.I may just hate Umbridge more than I hate Joffrey.Umbridge is the perfect little fucking Nazi.I'm not sure your employer can switch your schedule around on you like that.&gt; San Diego? That place is basically a gated community known as "North Tijuana".

Congratulations, you understand my point. I'm a white American from San Diego, and yet even I think it's bullshit to sent people back "home" when all they know is America. It's not *their* fault they spent the first four years of their lives in Mexico/whatever. 

Also, fuck you for comparing San Diego to Tijuana. You've clearly never been to TJ. Not even the worst parts of Detroit or New Orleans are as bad as TJ.

&gt;It just really sucks when we have murders by illegal immigrants that have been deported multiple times for serious stuff. 

That absolutely does suck. However, those murderers are already being deported. The 5 million people about to be deported are the ones who did nothing, who just settled down and got jobs and had families. The ones about to be deported are normal people living normal lives.

And your friends who hate illegal immigration have it backwards. It's not nearly impossible to legally bring family over *because of illegal immigration*, we have rampant illegal immigration *because it's so difficult to legally bring family over*. I have a friend who met his Mexican wife while they both were in college in San Diego. They got married in Mexico because his wife's mom was dying from breast cancer and couldn't make the trip to San Diego. Then they tried to bring his wife into the US after her student visa expired, they were told that their marriage didn't count because it was a Mexican marriage, and of course since they couldn't get his wife on American soil in order to get an American marriage license, they were fucked. He moved down to her town in Mexico and worked in the US remotely. She got pregnant, and his company forced him to come back to the US or quit. So he went back to SD and his pregnant wife had to stay in Mexico. During this entire time, they'd been working to get her a green card. she didn't get to come join her husband until she was *38 weeks pregnant*, and even then they had to process the application through Texas because it would have been a much longer wait to do it in San Diego. He was told "Be prepared to at any moment go to that TX border crossing and get your wife as she enters the country." And that's exactly what happened. When she was 38 weeks pregnant.

If it's that difficult to bring your *pregnant wife* into the United States from Mexico, of fucking course it's nearly impossible for you to bring anyone else. Of fucking course people turn to illegal immigration in desperation.&gt; They don't pay a dime in taxes

WRONG!

"[The 11.4 million undocumented immigrants currently living in the United States collectively paid $11.84 billion in state and local taxes in 2012](http://www.itep.org/immigration/)."

Edit; I love getting downvoted when I provide a politically neutral citation.I think that when I'm reading about Umbridge, I hate her more than Jofrey. But when I'm reading about Joffrey, I hate *him* more.They're the ones downvoting you.You know, your original post came off as pretty condescending, judgmental, and combative. For example: 

&gt;Most of us have learned not to get in the way of a pitchfork wielding mob hell bent on creating echo chambered "safe places" and running full out on feawlings.

That's not you trying to explain your point of view. That's you whining that the majority of people on Reddit disagree with your views. You are judging /u/zarathustran for reacting emotionally to your pathetic, provocative post, which is exactly why you made it a pathetic and provocative post. You *wanted* someone to react that way, so you could jump in and say, "SEE?! SEE?! This is what I'm talking about!!!"

So, congratulations. Zarathustran fell into your trap. But I see through you, and I see what you did.No, he's not. He intentionally baited his first post to get a rise out of somebody. He didn't ask her how an event occurred, he asked her \u201cWhy didn\u2019t you just sink your bottom down into the basin so he couldn\u2019t penetrate you?\u201d and \u201cWhy couldn\u2019t you just keep your knees together?\u201d These are not questions someone asks when they think the victim is actually a victim. Especially telling is his use of the word "just" in both cases. The judge asked, \u201cWhy didn\u2019t you **just** sink your bottom down into the basin so he couldn\u2019t penetrate you?\u201d and \u201cWhy couldn\u2019t you **just** keep your knees together?\u201d

He's not asking these questions in pursuit of justice, he's asking these questions to diminish her credibility and hurt her case. Hey, OP, if you'd simply copied and posted the headline from the article *as the rules of this subreddit explicitly state*, then you wouldn't have misspelled "permanently".We get a fucking holiday for dead presidents, but we have to work when we vote. Just make voters' day a holiday. It would be awesome if you were able to give everyone the day off, but only if they actually voted. A little incentive from work to actually do your civic duty.&gt; It's full of mindless sjws and white knights. 

Bullshit. It's full of people righteously outraged by the rape culture mentality of this judge.&gt; And according to the article she also asked him if he had a condom. 

So? Maybe she was willing to have sex with him until he sid he didn't have a condom. Or maybe she was willing to have sex with him and asked him if he had a condom, and then she changed her mind?

Also, from the article: 

&gt;He also indicated that she had not explained \u201cWhy she allowed the sex to happen if she didn\u2019t want it?\u201d

So apparently, this judge thinks that if women don't have to get raped, they totally have the power to just not be raped.Did you read the rest of the article? Maybe the judge thinks women can just snap their fingers and prevent themselves from being raped. 

&gt;He also indicated that she had not explained \u201cWhy she allowed the sex to happen if she didn\u2019t want it?\u201dYes?&gt; So presumably this recent episode is spanning more than a few weeks.

No, it's literally the exact same day as the day with the zombie pride parade.Right??!I thought it was a delightfully human mistake.Really? I though the showed remarkable maturity and strength of character in choosing to not beat the shit out of him. &gt; If they are the strongest, why is it not likely that they make it?

Because they are the ones risking their lives the most often.&gt; The problem I had with last week's episode is that it retreads over a theme that at this point is painfully obvious; the people in Alexandria are not prepared for the world outside.

No, last weeks' episode shows us that the Alexandrians are finally realizing they're weak, and some of them are choosing to do something about it. Until now, the Alexandrians have been thinking Rick et al are fucking crazy and violent. Now they understand the world they live in.And more adorable, too.Now you know how I felt! That fucker totally wanted to claw my face off!FOOLED YOU! I'm a fucking ghost!Oh, I'm sorry, I just feel that when someone fucks up and a small child dies, there should be some sort of punishment.I *love* the way Chandler Riggs said, "[I get it](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=g926jnPNqjc)." It's super condescending, like Ron is so beneath him. Like, this is *his* "no more kid stuff" talk with Ron. Except Ron is 17, not 11.&gt; just sit on various Alexandria house porches smoking and making fun of people for comic relief

Nah, Rick has no patience for porch dicks.Yep. Kids make really bad decisions. I know, because I used to be a kid, and I remember some of the shit I did. (No, I never played with a gun.)I think Dr_Facepalm conveys the same message.&gt; Video's and **whiteness's** talking about it?

Holy Freudian slips, Batman!The International Spy Museum is pretty fucking awesome.Yeah, I totally heard that in Krieger's voice.&gt; there was one of those fast food restaurants that was either a KFC or a Taco Bell, depending on the angle from which it was viewed.

LOL, I love that description. :)Yeah, the Udvar-Hazy Center! I lived not too far from that place, so we used to go quite often. There's so much shit to see in DC, it's really hard to pick. I lived there 19 months and I still didn't get to see everything. For example, I never made it to the Ford Theater or the Capital Building. Peer pressure isn't just for getting teenagers to have sex and do drugs!Except in the US, it's extremely difficult to prove libel or slander. Unlike what the other guy posted, in the US, you have to prove guilt of libel and slander, as opposed to assuming guilt and having to prove innocence.The German parts of my family moved here in the 1830s. [An entire political party was invented to oppose them.](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Know_Nothing) For a nation of immigrants, America is pretty fucking xenophobic. And for the record, my family is 100% assimilated into American culture, because duh.It might be the best school in the area. A friend of mine works at a Cathedral Catholic High School in San Diego. It's an outstanding school that takes kids of all religious backgrounds, not just Catholics. There's a bit of religious studies involved, but it's more academic and less religious. They couldn't even get a guilty verdict for the Westboro Baptist Church cunts.I actually detected quite a bit of condescension in his voice. Like, Carl knows Ron is a shit and that Carl is better than him in pretty much every way.Which is totally inappropriate.Yep, I have other parts of my family that did the same. Edward Whalley even came to the Colonies becuase he was allied with Oliver Cromwell, and actually was one of the Regicides that signed the death warrant for King Charles. He was literally an illegal immigrant, and a wanted man with his own death warrant. Somehow I've managed to not overthrow the US government, even though it obviously runs in my genes. (/s)Honestly, you probably understand the chemistry behind it better than your typical MD.I don't understand all the hate for "This is how it is now." OF COURSE there are going to be a lot of conversations about that in these circumstances. The group just found a whole community that had been sheltered from the apocalypse for 2 years. That community has to adapt or die. It makes sense that "This is how it is now" would be the theme of this season.Why do you hate Lori?Oh please. There aren't 30 "shitty episodes where nothing happens" on TWD.&gt; AMC would have had the bullet go through the hat or something.

What? Why the hell would you think that? AMC showed Rick biting out a dude's throat, and they showed Carl almost getting raped. Why would they avoid showing Carl's eye getting shot out?I agree, and I think it would be WAY more controversial if they showed Rick chopping off a child's hand instead of an adult's. And we know AMC doesn't shy away from child murdering.I think it's just as likely that Carl will try really hard to save Ron and fail, and it'll be a defining moment of Carl's life.I think they may have Rick chop off Sam's hand to keep Jessie alive. The entire concept of chopping off a child's hand and letting him die in order to save his mother is pretty shocking, and I think it would be a neat variance for the show.&gt; Gas would ignite, and they would fry in an instant. 

Nope. Mythbusters tested this and it turns out, shooting a gas tank in a car doesn't make it explode.&gt; Cliffhangers are essential to this sort of television but making them effective requires talent, which is what's missing from TWD. 

Sure, uh huh. The crew of TWD are talentless hacks. Why the fuck are you even in this sub if you think that?I think it was also that Carl was handling a problem because he knew his dad was dealing with more important shit. not that someone trying to murder isn't important, but it was kid stuff compared to what Rick was having to handle.But his character had real growth in that episode, and we see him starting to bond with Michonne.He's said that the show won't let him cut it, so apparently there are plot reasons for having his hair long like that.&gt; Secondly, seriously evaluating acting on The Walking Dead is equivalent to writing a review about your local McDonald's on Zagat.

I don't even know what that means.His, "Look, I get it. My dad killed your dad." was so well delivered. Condescending, understanding, and yet also dismissive. It was his "No more kid stuff" speech to Ron. &gt; Rick is always right. Despite the fact that the danger for this half of the season is mainly driven by his plan going awry. A plan that on it's face seems pretty stupid. And the writers' way of assuring the audience it isn't stupid is having Rick's yes-men yell "it had to be done!" to the skeptics.

I guess you forgot that he was wrong about attacking the hospital. It was Tyreese and Darryl who convinced him to do it the other way. Which would have worked had Beth not fucked it up at the last minute. Also, bloody Rick screaming at the Alexandrians was probably not the best way to prep them for the world outside.&gt; I'm really hoping 6b focuses a bit more on other characters like Gabriel, Eugene, Rosita, Aaron and Heath because right now they are just sort of there.

Well, the first half of the season has taken place over only ~36 hours. &gt; Show them living with how it is now

But they ARE doing that. Nicholas's redemption arc. Enid's struggles with PTSD and her inability to make new emotional bonds. Jessie killing the walker in the house through the front door. Even Spencer stealing the food, and Denise coming to terms with her new role as the group's MD. And let's not forget Father Gabriel. They ARE showing. They're also verbalizing, because that's what people would do in those circumstances.So? They also showed Maggie cutting Judith out of her mom's uterus. Well, maybe not, but there's definitely some fine acting in this show.Well, yeah, that's True. I mean, zombies are pretty impossible scientifically speaking, but they exist in TWD. I guess I can't be too picky about exploding gas tanks, can I?Carol shot a child with a handgun. And that child murdered her little sister with a knife. I don't think viewers would boycott the show if a pregnant woman and her fetus were murdered, seeing as how there are plenty of other equally awful things that have actually aired.Both Shane and Lori though they'd lost Rick. It's pretty normal for people who are in mutual mourning to reach out to each other. Especially since Lori's relationship with Rick was already pretty rocky even before she thought he was dead.Haha, it's not THAT extreme! Just no more kid stuff, okay?He's getting really great material to work with, which really helps. In every scene where Carl isn't being a dumb kid, Chandler fucking nails it. The scene where Lori dies. Finding Judith's car seat. Even his anger towards Rick after the prison falls. He isn't even talking, but his rage is displayed through his body language. And then when he thinks Rick has turned. He starts sobbing and his voice cracks, which has to be embarrassing for a teenaged boy. There's drool coming out of his mouth, but again, he just lets the scene play out. I'd be too embarrassed to let that slide, but I guess that's why I'm not an actor. Basically, when he has to *really act*, he does a great fucking job. I don't know how he channels those emotions, because odds are he's never felt anything like what he's supposed to be portraying. Holy shitsnacks, dicknuts!Oh wow, I just realized what that means. &gt; And mutual mourning doesn't explain Shane continuing to advance Lori after Rick returned. 

Shane was definitely a selfish asshole in that regard.Damn, that's a good point. Apparently all the rest of society agrees with me, so maybe you're the one who's wrong.And Grant Imahara.God *damn*. That's the most gilded post I've seen, ever. Edit: It's gained 3 since I commented.Shit, even data analysts have to deal with that shit. There's nothing worse than having to dig through someone else's shitty code.&gt; Edit: Great, my highest rated comment ever is about paint.

Just for that, I'm upvoting you!That's *exactly* my job!!I actually prefer the music from Borderlands 1. True story: On the day BL2 came out, I drove to Game Stop to pick up our preordered copies the morning it released, and I heard Ain't No Rest for the Wicked on the radio! I was very pumped!A friend of mine did that to his toddler son. The poor little guy had a massive cut and bruise on his forehead. :("ANOTHER!"&gt; why do the poorest get to have families and i'm left with nothing? 

What does that have to do with your situation? If you want kids, go make some.In America, you're more likely to be attacked by a Christian radical than an Islamic radical. Boo fucking hoo. Maybe y'all will think twice before assuming all Muslims are terrorists, now that you know how it feels when it happens to you.&gt; So these videos are edited (just like every other video), some things are taken out of context (par for the course in journalism today - see Trump), but that doesn't change the cavalier and appalling attitude of planned parenthood that these videos showcased. 

What you just said is, "The videos were edited, but I still really dislike Planned Parenthood because they're jerks!" Good job. Way to use your brain.&gt; or want my tax dollars supporting

Stop whining. We all have to pay for shit we disagree with. That's what happens when you're part of a society that has 320,000,000 people in it. I severely opposed the war in Iraq, but I'm still paying for it. Get over it. &gt; holsters on the stirrups

Nice turn of phrase!&gt; But ~~their~~ **Planned Parenthood Action Fund's**  entire goal is to keep abortions legal

&gt;~~Their~~ **Planned Parenthood's** first priority is running a health clinic

You have really bad reading comprehension. He even broke those into two different paragraphs, with one paragraph for each entity, and you still misinterpreted what he wrote.

Will those facilities be called "prison?"Lack of regulation also allows for [rivers to literally catch on fire](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Cuyahoga_River#Environmental_concerns).Really? You need a citation for that? It's a numbers game. The US has nearly [250 million Christians](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Christianity_in_the_United_States), and [less than 3 million Muslims](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Islam_in_the_United_States). 

But just in case that's too hard for you to comprehend, [here](http://www.globalresearch.ca/non-muslims-carried-out-more-than-90-of-all-terrorist-attacks-in-america/5333619) [you](http://www.nytimes.com/2015/06/25/us/tally-of-attacks-in-us-challenges-perceptions-of-top-terror-threat.html?_r=0) [go](http://www.addictinginfo.org/2015/11/30/youre-7-times-more-likely-to-be-killed-by-a-conservative-terrorist-than-a-muslim-extremist/). Obviously we have way more Christians. I'm not sure what your point is, though.But you're making a choice. Don't make a particular choice and then whine when other people make a different choice. Poor people don't *get* to have kids while you don't. Poor people are just choosing to have kids. You have that same choice. The only thing stopping you from having kids is you.Allergies are directly tied to asthma, so your husband may have come into contact with something he's allergic to, or he's developed a allergies to something he didn't used to be allergic to. I'm from San Diego, and I'm only allergic to grass there. Now that I'm in Seattle, I'm allergic to every fucking thing that pollinates. In San Diego, I could completely managed my allergies with taking Claritin during the spring when grass is pollinating. In Seattle, I have 2 inhalers, nose spray, eye drops, Singulair, Benadryl, and Zyrtec. If I don't take *at least* the Zyrtec, Benadryl, and nose spray, I get terrible sinus infections and bronchitis.&gt; Middle schoolers are also super mean when it comes to pointing out differences in their peers

Junior high was the worst 3 years of my life, until my dad died when I was 35. Now they're just the second worst trio of years in my life.That's really common, so don't feel bad about doing it. I had to learn to just *accept* a compliment with a "Thank you!" instead of trying to downplay it. It's still hard, though, even about stuff I know I'm good at. Way back in the day, at my first real office job, whenever my supervisor saw me she'd say, "Smile, Damn Dog!" No, bitch. I'm not going to walk around the office with a fixed smile on my face. Not only is that stupid, it's fucking creepy. Also, why don't you tell anyone else to smile all the time? I don't even have resting bitch face. I really don't. My older brother used to think he was really agile. He's not. He's actually pretty clumsy and not at all athletic. One day, he actually said, "I'm really dexterous!" I kind of chuckled, and he said, "No, really, this one time in college-" And I cut him off and said, 'Yeah. One time. In college. 10 years ago." He gets it now.People tell you you're ugly?? You're not. At all. I used to scare the shit out of my coworkers by accident because of that. Apparently I'm stealthy.I have a really great memory regarding events and dates. It turns out, it's really disconcerting to other people when you say shit like, 'Remember how three April 7ths ago we went to lunch and you had the Greek salad for the first time and you fucking loved it?" It sounds creepy and stalkery. I *swear* I'm not stalking you. I just remember when stuff happened.My mom has *terrible* allergies that cause really bad asthma. She developed them about 15 years ago, out of the blue. She's been tested for everything, and they still haven't figured out what she's allergic to.For most STEM aside from computers, grad school is a requirement if you want to jmake more than $40k these days. I know, because I wanted to be a chemist and found out that I'd need at least a masters to do anything more advanced that isolating shit from other shit.Sorry, the other guy was whining that the poorest get to have families and he doesn't. He does get to have a family. He's just choosing not to. He's making a choice and then whining about it.Yeah, no kids for us, either. We're not opposed to the concept, but we didn't have the burning desire for them, either. Therefore, no kids, and the side benefit is we have a lot more financial freedom.We both know that the one terrorist attack on September 11 skews the numbers. In the 14 years since, the number of Christian terrorist victims has been far higher than Muslim terrorist victims. No, he's whining that poorer people "get to have a family" while he doesn't. The only thing stopping him from having a family is him. It really is.But he's saying that "the poorest *get to* have families." It's not that poor people *get* to have a family, it's that they choose to. He can also choose to have a family. The only thing stopping him from having a family is him.I remember the date that happened was 8/7, which I remember because Joel's birthday is 7/8 and my brain made a connection I now can't unmake!Dude, the information is out there. I've posted three links just in this thread alone.I would have gone to medical school and become a doctor. Now I'm too old to spend all those years not working, so I'm going into nursing instead. I'm not ashamed of nursing, I just feel like I didn't live up to my potential.Mine is similar. 

A few years ago, my husband and I were moving to Seattle from DC. In the middle of Montana, I got a phone call from my mom with news that my dad had died. I got to cry on the side of I-90 for 15 minutes, and then I had to get back in my car and drive for another 10 hours before we could stop. I didn't even get to be with my husband as I was driving our car and he was driving the moving truck. The day my father died, I spent alone, driving through Montana.Sigh. Look, I'm going to explain this to you like you're five. 

My original comment was, "In America, you're more likely to be attacked by a Christian radical than an Islamic radical." I'm not talking about all over the world, I'm talking about the United States. In the United States, it's much rarer for Muslims to be radicalized, because it turns out that folks who have things to lose don't want to give it all up for a (in their eyes) better life after death. Essentially, their life here isn't bad, so they are much less likely to want to die in the name of Allah to get into Heaven sooner.

Yes, worldwide, Muslims are more likely to commit terrorist acts. I'm not talking about worldwide, I'm talking about America. Why? Because I'm in America and most people on Reddit are, as well. While it's terrible that ISIS kills so many people (including other Muslims) in other parts of the world, they're not in America killing people here. The people in America who kill Americans due to religion are Christians. 

The majority of terrorists in America are Christians. You can be a terrorist without being Muslim. The issue is that it seems like only Muslims get called terrorists, for some reason. What Dear did last week was terrorism, and the most common form of terrorism in the United States. *Christian* terrorism. This guy's religious beliefs has caused him to want people to be afraid of going to Planned Parenthood. That is, by definition, terrorism.Explain what? People in America have better lives than people in Syria or Afghanistan or Iraq. Therefore, it's harder to radicalize people, because it turns out that people who *don't* have nothing to lose don't want to give it all up. They *don't* want to go out in a blaze of glory to get into Heaven sooner, because life isn't bad here. This is the same justification white people use to be afraid of black people.I provided 3 citations, but I'm making things up. Okeydokey.Carol did fuck up though by forcing a confrontation with Morgan when zombies have invaded their safe zone. If she'd waited until later, the guy would be dead from his wound, or everyone would be dead from the walkers, or the walker would be gone and she'd have Rick and Michonne backing her up. I agree that Morgan should have killed that guy, but Carol also shouldn't have forced that confrontation when she did. She fucked up worse than Morgan did, IMO.And Carol provided him with that opportunity. She should have waited until things calmed down in Alexandria before addressing the issue.So you think people can't be monsters?Actually, my subtheme is that, in America, there is no real reason to fear Muslims. TWhat advice? My post is about how the other dude isn't a victim. He said "poorer people get to have families." Poorer people don't *get* to have families, they *choose* to have families. He can also *choose* to have a family, he's just choosing not to. There's no privilege or permission involved. We don't need this right now. You're part of the problem. Go away.Seriously, people don't do this to spread cheer and happiness.Yes, this is exactly the thing you should be taking away from this tragedy.Because the victims are the most helpless. It's the most shocking, and the most likely to succeed in freaking everyone out.To be fair, the US 2.5 times as large as the EU, with a much more diverse population. California by itself is larger than many *countries*, and with a larger populations that's also way more diverse. Don't be a dick.Now's not the time, asshole.Because I want to live in a society where I need to bring my gun with me to the doctor's office.I mean, they're not wrong.Spreading terror as part of a religious or political agenda is literally the definition of terrorism. We don't know if that's what's going on here, but the odds are high that since it wasn't just one shooter, it was politically or religiously motivated, which makes this an act of terror.I'd rather have a Muslim as a neighbor than you, you racist POS.They're trying to do the most harm. Attacking the most helpless in our society guarantees the most outrage and psychological harm to our society, and also means they won't get anyone fighting back during the attack.Eh, what else are they going to do? I see it as a giant FUCK YOU to the terrorists.Eh, I see it as a giant FUCK YOU to the terrorists.Imagine how Obama feels. :(I'm reminded of that every time I have to get x-rayed to get on a plane.I don't think these 3 shooters are at all like Adam Lanza.Yes, but other reports are saying 3 white males. So, who the fuck knows?No, Trump is just pandering to morons.Bombs are also illegal, but I guess we should change that since terrorists will also somehow manage to make bombs anyway, right?The Second Amendment has nothing to do with terrorism. Banning guns won't stop terror attacks. I say this as someone who thinks we need stricter gun laws. Nothing was going to stop what happened today.Adam Lanza was Muslim???I think we're all in "This shit again" mode.If they're professional killers, then they suck, because they killed a lot of people who weren't their intended target.Oh yeah, they're already here.And Virginia doesn't, but that didn't stop 32 people from getting murdered at Virginia Tech. 

How about you don't be a dick?I get what you're saying, and [there's been a history of that type of thing backfiring](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Munich_massacre#Negotiations). But, the bad guys have left the scene, and they're not coming back.Seriously, call your mom.Nah, LA has really shitty traffic.With 3 shooters, it probably is terrorism.Definitely leave her a message, then. And send her a text, just in case. My brother didn't call anyone after the big Seattle earthquake in 2001, and we were freaking out for several hours. No, he targeted 6-year-olds.When the fuck has a good guy with a CC ever stopped a mass shooting or a terrorist attack?Yep, the best thing we can do in response to this is carry on with our lives.So it's like Walter White going to the retirement home and taking out that old guy in a wheelchair?&gt; negros 

It's not 1870, son.People don't normally get away with mass shootings like this.Maybe these are the good guys with guns the GOP is always talking about.Whatever it is, it's code 4, meaning all clear.You mean like [this guy](http://img2.timeinc.net/people/i/2014/news/140106/phil-robertson-768.jpg)?Someone who wants to spread terror and not have any victims fighting back.It's being reported on the scanner, but take it with a grain of salt. [This guy](http://img2.timeinc.net/people/i/2014/news/140106/phil-robertson-768.jpg) could pass for a Muslim terrorist to a panicky eye witness.Right, because a mass shooting in a concert hall seems so much better.[This guy](http://img2.timeinc.net/people/i/2014/news/140106/phil-robertson-768.jpg) looks like he fits that description. Clearly it's [this guy](http://img2.timeinc.net/people/i/2014/news/140106/phil-robertson-768.jpg).Are you kidding? There all over this thread.You meant to say gunshot victim, right?Delete this shit. Unconfirmed suspect name. You know you're a partisan hack when you give a politician shit for making a speech after a very real terrorist attack.It's probably less the political view and more that this shithead was already spewing this crap and the bodies are still warm.He means his ass.I'm guessing POTUS has more information than Reddit does.Oh, they're everywhere.Oh, sorry, I meant bigot. Same diff.Actually, Obama just said that people on the no fly list can buy guns. That's probably something we should rectify.For what? People who are panicking ARE stupid. There are people calling in reports of every male they think is out of place. A Hispanic male in a silver truck with the doors open. A white guy wearing a trenchcoat.It says unconfirmed...Yeah, the non-bigot is the problem. DERP.So you think the police scanner completely details all the information the police have? Or do you think maybe they're not talking about the specifics because they know 100,000 people are listening online?There are so many reports of "suspicious male" now. Male hispanic in a silver truck with the doors open. White male wearing a trench coat. Vehicle at golf course with guns in it. It's ridiculous. People are panicking and just calling everything in.Seeing as how it was 3 guys, probably not.So you only care when white people are on the no fly list?Because murdering the most vulnerable in our society is horrifying, and also those people are the least likely to fight back.Yeah, because Ireland doesn't have a history of violence or terrorism.It's probably some sort of domestic terrorism. I think you're right in that ISIS would plan on not getting out alive, but I doubt it's cartel related. Too many dead.Where is that confirmed?&gt; You know there are white american that have been added to the no-fly list right? 

Yep, you did.So, not confirmed.What else is he supposed to do? The man steps in front of the podium and half the nation rushes out buys another gun.So, inactive nonshooter?What's to "believe" in? Our justice system is flawed enough that I don't think it's worth the risk of killing an innocent person.To be fair, the left also screams about mental health care. We have shitty mental health care in the US in part thanks to that great Republican, Ronald Reagan.Pretty much all of Southern California is 2 hours away from this, though.I figured.For what do I owe them an apology?Right, because people never fail to notice that a different person responded to them. No need to be dick about it.Right, because mankind never did anything evil before the modern era.&gt; Bellevue square mall Bellevue,wa

I live in Seattle, and there's nothing anywhere on the internet or on the radio about anything like this.&gt;  possibly targeting the conference for someone in particular

With 14 dead and a dozen more wounded, I doubt it was a cartel hit.I live in Seattle, and there's nothing anywhere regarding any shooting in Seattle.[This guy](https://www.reddit.com/user/cornfedbred) posted it from a brand now account 18 minutes old. No source or citation.Just like there was no school shooting or mall shooting (in either SB or Bellevue, WA).What if it's just a concerned citizen guarding his neighborhood from the bad guys?Citation, please.14 dead, though. I doubt it's a cartel hit.And his point is that no gun laws would have stopped this attack.It's 2 hours just to San Diego.ABQ was cleared, no active shooter. 

Dunno about NY. 

Bellevue Wa is a bullshit lie posted by a brand new Redditor.It certainly doesn't FEEL like Islamic terrorism, because those guys usually die. But this is wildly unusual for cartel activity in the US. Mexico, it's another day ending in s, but not in the US.Gun control was never meant to combat terrorism.How is it personal if 14 people are dead and a dozen more wounded?Attention whoring asshole. AKA, typical internet troll.Speaking as someone who thinks we do need stricter gun control laws, no law was going to prevent this tragedy. Some tragedies just transcend law.http://www.broadcastify.com/listen/feed/12443/webAnd Jewish male college students.UNCONFIRMED. Delete your post.APC, I think.A trial run that killed 14 people and the bad guys got caught?3 somebodiesListening to it was very similar to how listening to the capture of the Boston dickhead.It's the most since Newtown.With 14 dead people and another 17 wounded? Doubt it.It's 14 dead and 17 wounded. Still awful."No shots fired at Amazon."It's NO shots fired at Amazon, and yes, it's THE Amazon.My streaming somehow got backed up by about 4 minutes, according to my husband who was listening to the same channel. I had to refresh.No shit, moron. Thanks for contributing.He's almost as bad as the idiot who created an account to start a rumor about a shooting in Bellevue, WA.Gun control laws were never meant to prevent terror attacks. But you knew that.You know America has children that know how to turn on the news, right?Dude, the Amazon flows into the US.You just won $20!I don't think it's the liberals who are afraid of Muslims. We're not the ones pissing ourselves at the idea of Syrian refuges.No, I understood you. You're just wrong....

I was joking too...They sure did. That's why the camera quickly zoomed out.There are clearly 2 dead guys at the SUV. One outside and lying in a pool of blood, and another that was pulled out of the SUV by the swat unit.I just heard the all accounted for on the scanner, too.Kids are probably watching, though. *takes off clothes*Way to spread the hate and fear, jackass!An assassination that killed 14 people and wounded 17 more? I doubt it.A lot of parents are still at work.It's not at all confirmed.And gun control laws don't exist to prevent terrorism.&gt; kids see worse stuff irl. 

No they fucking don't.Why have any laws at all, right? I mean, people just break them anyway.I watched the news when I was a kid, especially when shit was going down. I was also a latchkey kid from 10 onwards.And that's why when bad guys murder their opponents, they don't do it in public.Why are you so convinced it was Muslims?I don't think gun control laws are intended to prevent terrorist attacks.There are a hundred posts in here about how it's definitely Muslim terrorists. Reddit can be really stupid.No, Islam is a religion. You can be prejudiced against the followers of a religion.That's only True if the crazed killer is white, though. I think a lot of people are on high alert. There have been a lot of "suspicious male" reports that ended up being nothing.Not that I'm agreeing with this joker, but Hispanics can be white.Sounds like you're also prejudiced against Muslims.Then why did you bring up Muslims at all?I'm guessing the T word is terrorism, but what's the M word?No there weren't.Are you smelling toast????Dwarf hipster wizards.I didn't say viewed differently, I said prejudiced.I doubt that info has been released yet. "Suspect's down"Thanks for that. I've been reporting anyone posting any names for that very reason. We don't need a witch hunt.How about we don't post the names of rumored suspect, okay?No, there's no citation.The US Constitution disagrees with you.It's terrorism, jackass. Mental health care and gun control laws won't do anything to stop terrorism.No there's not you fucking troll. Brand new account 1 hour old.  This is the second fucker to post a hoax shooting at a mall in Seattle.Securing the homeland.The US has more Muslims now than it did on 9/11. Not sure why you think this attack is worse for Muslims in America than 9/11 was.Yes, but that wasn't terrorism. That was a fucked up kid doing evil shit.The Middle East has *open* carry and there are terror attacks there every fucking day.So is terrorism and murder.I'm having a hard time believing that. I mean, who gets into an argument and then comes back with 3 buddies wearing body armor and facemasks, who later throw pipe bombs out of cars? This feels premeditated, not spontaneous.My gun shoots terror, not bullets!Step 1. Get in argument.

Step 2. Get 2 buddies.

Step 3. Don body armor.

Step 4. Obtain pipe bombs.

Step 5. Kill the person you got in a fight with and also 13 other people, and shoot an additional 17 people.

Step 6. Flee the scene but stay in the immediate area.

Step 7. Lob pipe bombs at the cops

What are you talking about? Seems totally logical and spontaneous to me!&gt;  think Jade Helm.

Which resulted in zero murders.And it's unconfirmed so stop with the posting of that name. How about we don't incite any witch hunts, mkay? Delete your post, asshole.&gt; That a mass shooting of this scale can happen in the state that has the most restrictive gun laws in the union is pretty telling about how effective those laws are.

Those laws were never meant to prevent acts of terrorism.Please don't post the names until they're confirmed by the police.But who the fuck has pipe bombs just sitting around for settling grudges??How about we don't post unconfirmed names, okay?Fuck, one of her interns probably got the name from Reddit. I've seen it here a dozen times.But I WAS talking about terrorism.Muslim Hispanic?They're meant to prevent more run of the mill violence.I'm going to laugh in your face if it ends up being foreigners.[This is why you don't post names.](https://twitter.com/ShepNewsTeam/status/672232777950076929) Delete your post.Or they read it on Reddit. I saw that name posted here 3 hours ago.The chief was pretty clear that they felt the SUV scene was possibly unsafe, which I'm taking to mean they think there may be explosives involved so they don't want to disturb the bodies.The FBI and the cops seemed really confident these people were involved in the shooting.Those are literally the words the police chief used.At least 2 people involved in a shooting that claimed 14 lives and left 17 others wounded? It's probably terrorism, of one type or another.Unconfirmed. No witch hunts. Delete your post.They weren't 3 hours ago when I made that comment.Yes. Radical Christians kill more people in America than radical Muslims do.I've been thinking terrorism all day, even without knowing their backgrounds. 3 people don't just murder 14 people for funsies.Maybe it was terrorism with a personal vendetta thrown in for good measure.Twitter doesn't have to verify information before shit gets posted.Oh fuck off, grasshopper. Just because I don't reflexively hate all Muslims that doesn't make me a hipster.Whatever makes you feel superior, Cletus.Where is the other one?My former employer used to have holiday parties on Thursdays so employees would be let inclined to get shitfaced.Eh, I know a Muslim American citizen whose parents arranged his marriage. It happens.Earlier today there were assholes in this thread saying, "I hope this was Muslims!"It's been a cesspool all day. Earlier folks were actually saying, "I hope this was Muslims!"He's on the grassy knoll.Your friends are pussies.My office once had a holiday party in March. Who the fuck cares?Americans can be evil, too, moron.The workplace violence rumor has been going on all day, even long before any details about the shooters were released. I didn't believe it then due to the circumstances, and I don't really believe it now. I suppose it's possible that this dickheads wanted to make a terrorist attack *and* kill off some coworkers.Oh fuck off. You're clearly a troll. Edit: Looking at his posts today, he is in fact a conservative using this tragedy as an opportunity to shit on liberals and Clinton.Well, a lot of them are dead, and a lot more are in the hospital.Gun control laws will never stop a terrorist attack, if that's what this is. I say that as someone who thinks we do actually need stricter gun laws. But terrorism transcends the law. You can't easily stop it.That is his wife, and it's an arranged marriage. It's very possible she was just following his orders.So that means you're never going to respond to me again. Sounds great!I agree, but like I said, we're never gong to pass enough gun laws to stop a terrorist.Let's say 1 percent of men are rapists...As opposed to the conservative that killed a bunch of people last week...I reckon it's possible he wanted to make a terrorist attack and decided why not kill all the assholes he works with? Two birds, one stone.&gt; Here's to hoping for many more Muslim terrorist attacks before the election!

Wow. You are a serious asshole. You want Americans to be murdered so your candidate gets elected POTUS. You're a piece of shit.The workplace violence theory has been running around this thread all day, long before we knew anything about the murderers.Saint Bernads are my favorite species of dog.That's fucked up too, but unless OP is Chris Matthews, what he said is irrelevant now. (I actually don't even know who Chris Matthews is. I don't watch TV news.)This really is a weird incident. Because I just fucking googled it?Maybe he just saw [the post by the shithead](https://www.reddit.com/r/news/comments/3v6iq7/authorities_respond_to_20_victim_shooting/cxlfuk3) who wants more Muslim terrorist attacks so Trump will get elected.If she's a devout Muslim (I think she's from Saudi Arabia), she may think shooting her husband or even just disobeying him would damn her to hell. I have Christian family members who feel that wives must obey husbands, unfortunately. See you next week.The Fort Hood shooter did both, though.The hint of question was because I can't believe you asked such a dumb question.According to some Muslim clerics, yes. Radical Christians have the same weakness, though. Or did you already forget about Planned Parenthood?Uh, you do realize that most terrorists are conservative, right? Like the dude last week who shot up the Planned Parenthood?What dicks for including employees of all religions and not just Christians!It was sarcasm. Still a shit post, though.The important thing here is that you get to feel like a victim. Enjoy.It was 3 pipe bombs, not a factory. Let's keep the hyperbole out of here, okay?A whole bunch of Crusades authorized by a whole bunch of Popes disagree with that statement.Chronicles 15:12-13 ESV :

"And they entered into a covenant to seek the Lord, the God of their fathers, with all their heart and with all their soul, but that **whoever would not seek the Lord, the God of Israel, should be put to death, whether young or old, man or woman.** "That's definitely the thing you should be angry about today.A few hours ago someone said, "OMG, I'm only like 2 hours from there!" Dude, all of Southern California is within 2 hours of there.He's right. Ruby Ridge and Waco were two main motivations for OKC. Edit: He was refuting the thing about Christian fundamentalism, not Ruby Ridge and Waco.Because there's no way we could do both, right? Neither one of those things would make me suspicious, especially not during this time of year.&gt; Despite the best efforts of a few Liberals with multiple accounts down voting everything they can

Look at you with that bullshit statement again. How many times are you going to say that stupid crap?Ah, I see what you mean now. I thought you were refuting the thing about 'Waco and Ruby Ridge, and I didn't even see the thing about him being a fundie. He definitely wasn't a fundie.And more of that shit, too. To quote Andy from Hot Fuzz, "Change the fucking record!"Wow, you're an idiot.Haha, right!?Wow, you're just a bright and shiny gem, aren't you?"Redditor for 42 minutes"

What are the odds you're that guy whining about all the liberals using (imaginary) alt accounts to downvote all his posts?You're like, the 5000th person to mention Islamic terrorism. Welcome to the thread.They also said the shooters are male and female. Gotta be an agenda there!!!That was exactly my thought. This past 2 weeks, because of the holidays and also our scheduled monthly cat food order, we've gotten 8 different deliveries. Also, apparently you're not allowed to have garage workshops anymore. You're just going to keep threadshitting, aren't you? Edit: This is the moron who said Obama created ISIS.90% of Muslims are Sunni, so I wouldn't assume anything.If it was peanutbutter, then it was definitely Michonne!They attacked a holiday party, not the workers or patients at the center. The center was just the rented venue.I've been saying it was terrorism all day, jackass. Edit: In fact, 15 hours ago, I was massively downvoted for saying, "[It's terrorism, jackass. Mental health care and gun control laws won't do anything to stop terrorism.](https://www.reddit.com/r/news/comments/3v6iq7/authorities_respond_to_20_victim_shooting/cxl33qs)" and [here's one from 20 hours ago](https://www.reddit.com/r/news/comments/3v6iq7/authorities_respond_to_20_victim_shooting/cxksdq9), and yes, I was downvoted there, too. I told him to delete the post because it was the unconfirmed name of the suspect.How is he spinning? It's a weird event that doesn't fit the typical workplace violence OR terrorist attack.To see if they got a lot of packages delivered in a short amount of time and if they have a garage workshop, of course.I'm going to explain this to you like you're a moron. 

The United States has this thing called the Constitution. It lays out exactly what the government can and can't do. The First Amendment to the Constitution explicitly states that all people have the right to practice whatever religion they want, or not practice whatever religion they want. It's part of the foundation of our nation, and its part of what makes America America.

What you're suggesting flies in the face of the Constitution and what it means to be an American. You probably didn't realize that because you live in Europe, or maybe you just let your emotions speak for you.He does have an older brother, with the same first and last name but different middle. In fact, the press was erroneously passing around the brother's photo for a while because they suck.No, that's just audio from the scanner from the same incident. I know because I clearly remember all those things happening, including the talk about the guy breathing in the back seat with a gun strapped to his chest. (It was the woman, actually.)&gt; But nobody has the balls to call a spade a spade

Congratulations, yours is probably the 5000th post where Islamic terrorist was mentioned. Guns aren't THAT expensive.It can't, because there's also this little thing called the establishment clause of the First Amendment that bars the government from passing laws that favor one religion over another.

This is part of what makes America great. I don't know about that part.No, transfats are the worst of both worlds. Carbs at least do something for you, whereas transfats just wreck your body."Drug kingpin is the brother-in-law of an Assistant Director of the DEA"That was the Declaration of the Independence, not the Constitution. The Declaration isn't legally binding in any way.

You should probably stop posting, because you clearly have no idea what you're talking about. Also, you keep saying, "our" but I know you live in Europe. Don't talk talk about "our country" because you don't live in the United States. If you want to fuck up your own country and outlaw Islam, go ahead. But keep your fucking hands off America.It's definitely a really weird situation, which is why they haven't firmly declared it was terrorism. It was apparently a targeted attack on his coworkers, and he even got into a heated argument with them before shooting the place up. But the guy is Muslim and seems to have ties to radical networks in Saudi Arabia, maybe.And he got his wife involved in the murders, which is not normal for workplace shootings. It's probably a little from column A, a little from column B.&gt; But what if Congress and the President don't like this Constitution and want it changed?

There's a process in place for amending the Constitution. It's hard as fuck to do, though, and has only been done 27 times.

&gt; There's also no separation of Church and state anymore when you have state Governments and Churches fighting over Gay Marriage. 

Uh, yes there is. Churches are free to marry or not marry whomever they want. That's why I can't force a Jewish synagogue to marry my husband and I, or why a Muslim can't force the Church of Latter Day Saints to marry them. Nobody can force a church to marry anyone. Before this summer, plenty of churches had private weddings for gay couples that weren't legally recognized by the state. FLDS do church marriages all the time, because bigamy is illegal.

The separation of church state also means that the Mormons can't pass legislation forcing all people to get married in their temples. It also means that Mormons (or whomever) can't pass legislation banning gay marriage. Separation of church and state is why Muslims haven't outlawed alcohol and pork in the United States. 

What's happened is that now gays are free to get married *by the state*. I'm aware of that, but we're not discussing the government infringing on peoples' right to privacy. We're talking about "a process to phase out Islam all together." That's blatantly unconstitutional in the US, and would never, ever happen. Cats actually can't digest plant matter, which is why they're obligate carnivores. They either puke it up, or it passes through as poop.My cat tries to trade his little foam soccer balls for food. So now we call those balls "food tokens."Maybe it's an ocelot!I sooooo badly want a bunny, and your story does nothing to dissuade me.

WORTH. IT.Just yesterday, my cat took a shit. Apparently earlier he'd ingested some of my long hair, and a little poo was dangling from his ass attached to some hair going *into* his ass. He kept trying to scoot, and it wasn't working. I chased him around the apartment with a paper towel, and the fucker kept running away because he knows what's going to happen. Eventually the hair snapped and the poo fell. It actually wasn't even messy at all, just annoying that I had to pick up my cat's poo.Mr. Hands!That bullshit against the Mormons was definitely unconstitutional, I totally agree. I don't think that would fly these days, though.It's actually a lot harder to successfully make a bomb than it seems. In fact, NPR said this morning the assholes yesterday didn't actually succeed. As I stated elsewhere, it's a lot harder to successfully make a bomb than Hollywood would have you believe. The people yesterday TRIED to make pipe bombs, but they didn't actually work (although that didn't stop the bomb squad from disposing of them). You also can't easily buy chemicals without ending up on a watch list. Source: I work in a chem lab, and I'm on a watch list because of it.That dude is my first cousin 11x removed!&gt; Black Skinhead

Or he's an idiot and doesn't know that the Spartans were Greek.If you want to destroy my sweater,

Hold this thread as I walk awayYippee kiyay, motherfucker!I'm pretty familiar with Thomas Brodie Sanger's voice (thanks to Doctor Who), and that wasn't him. I think it was Bran.He was 23, 14 years ago.I stopped watching when he left. And I say this as someone with a massive crush on Tom Welling. I just couldn't get past the bullshit teen drama crap.It's fucking retarded.It's two episodes, and I've seen them several times. I can conjure his voice in my head right now, giving that "He is like fire and ice and rage" speech. And there's also his roles in GOT and Maze Runner. Why is it so weird that I can tell his voice?Weezer is cool, but that line is fucking retarded.No, there's no middle ground in America because we have only 2 parties. One in the middle, and one on the right.My sister in law posted a bitchy comment when the ACA passed. She was complaining that her adult son, who has two kids of his own, was now going to have to pay a fine because he didn't have insurance. I said, "Hey, aren't his kids on Medicaid? Why should I have to pay for his kids because he's too immature to be a responsible parent?" Ohhh, she got angry. So very angry. But she couldn't explain why it was unfair to "Teddy" that he had to pay a fine for not having insurance, while it's *not* unfair to me that I have to pay for his kids get Medicaid because he can't hold a steady job.

BTW, Teddy now has a third kid on the way, from a different woman. His parents are raising his other 2 kids, are still on Medicaid because he's still the legal guardian of those kids. And he still doesn't have health insurance.Their taxes are higher, but all their medical needs are covered with no out of pocket. It more than makes up for the higher taxes.You know, a lot of liberals were pushing for single payer, or at the very least a public option. The first wasn't put on the table by Obama, so I blame him. The second was taken off the table by the GOP, and I blame them. The private free market that's been fucking us for decades regarding health care? No, thank you. &gt; An atheist pro choice republican would agree with this.

You might as well be saying unicorns and fairies would agree with this.1. The millions of poor people who are now on Medicaid thanks to the expansion.

2. The millions of Americans who can buy subsidized insurance.

3. The millions of Americans who have pre-existing conditions and found it to be literally impossible to get insured before the ACA.

In short, tens of millions of Americans would be fucked if this was repealed.&gt; ghee government 

Clarified butter government?Because they're not as obstructionist as the GOP, and also they know Obama will veto it.Why the hell are you getting downvoted? The GOP is doing this for votes. They know it'll never be signed.Well they did vote against the Violence Against Women thing a couple years back, because apparently lesbians don't deserve to be protected.&gt; OJ doesn't fit the profile of someone who would kill his wife, at all.

The guy's in fucking prison *right now* for armed robbery and kidnapping. He's *exactly* the kind of guy who'd kill his wife.Evil people often think they're they're the good guy. &gt; Well forensic evidence pretty clearly painted the picture

No, it didn't. That's part of the problem. The local cops fucked up gathering the evidence. They didn't cover the crime scene with tarps and then it rained, which obviously fucks up the crime scene. &gt; It painted the picture that a fight occurred and **Zimmerman seemed to sustain more injuries**.

Well, except for that fatal gunshot wound.Exactly. There wasn't enough evidence to prove his guilt. Part of why is because the original investigation sucked and the cops didn't treat the crime scene like a crime scene.Didn't he? Wasn't that "rescue" staged to make George look good?George Zimmerman made a really bad decision the day he decided to follow an unarmed black kid around his neighborhood. Why did he make that decision? Because he had a gun, and that made him feel invincible. He *never* would have followed Martin around if he hadn't had the gun. He'd have just called the cops and waited for them to take care of it. And we'd have one fewer dead black kid to mourn.I have a 2000 deductible, and I've never had to pay a penny because I stay in network. I didn't even have to pay for an ambulance ride a couple years back, when I got into an accident (not my fault) and broke my ankle. In fact, we didn't have to pay for any of that medical care, not even the crutches or the boot. Edit: Which is actually awesome because the dumb cunt wasn't insured.Exactly. He's penny wise and pound foolish. He's *exactly* the person who needs a low deductible because both he and his wife utilize their insurance a lot. 

I have a lot of allergy prescriptions. If I don't take them, I get terrible sinus infections and bronchitis. As a result, when my husband and I had to buy our own insurance a couple years back, I intentionally got one with great prescription coverage. Yes, I may have paid an additional $130 each month, but I'm also picking up 7 different prescriptions, one of which at the time had a market price of over $200/month (Singulair, which is now generic and cheap).&gt; failure is imminent since the law was passed

Any day now, it's going tofail. I mean, it hasn't yet. Tens of millions of more Americans are insured now, and the cost of insurance hasn't increased as quickly as it did before the ACA. But any day now, it's going to fail. Aaaaaany day.You know what's sad? When my brother and I were born in the 1970s, my parents had $0 out of pocket. Somehow, over the last 40 years, we've lost progress made.That's a mighty broad brush you've got there. I mean, you're not wrong. But you're conflating American Muslims who are a minority to all the rest of the Muslim world. And that's pretty bullshit. I have a gay Jewish Mexican-America friend who has Syrian features (his family immigrated to Mexico from Syria a couple generations back). He shaved his goatee off after 9/11, because he was worried he'd be mistaken for a Muslim, even though he's pretty much the polar opposite of a radical Muslim.&gt; At what point do you just go "Alright, fuck it, I'm done being part of ______ group"?

So you think billions of Muslims should change their religion because a very small percentage of Muslims are violent dicks? &gt; Farooks neighbors didnt report suspicious activity for fear of profiling, and that is precisely the attitude that needs to be overcome.

The neighbors only thought it was suspicious because they weren't white Christians. Any white couple with an infant that gets a lot of packages in a short amount of time may be remarkable, but not causing suspicion. And millions of white Americans have garage workshops. My dad, my uncle, and grandfather all had garage workshops. Fuck, my grandfather had a goddamned machine shop in his 3-car garage. 

It's really easy to confirm your worst fears in hindsight. But should we live in a society that calls the cops on their neighbors for having a garage workshop and receiving a bunch of packages? I mean, it's the holidays right now. I think I've gotten something like 10 packages in the last 2 weeks. My cousin is about to have a baby. She's received dozens of packages, both gifts and things she's bought on her own to prepare for the baby. Should people call the cops on us, because that's now suspicious behavior in America? 

The fact is, the neighbor was suspicious specifically because of her neighbors' ethnicities. A white neighbor wouldn't have raised the same red flag. Just because she was right, that doesn't mean her suspicions were**n't** raised due to negative stereotyping.

Edit: Fixed an error

Edit: 3 more packages arrived today! Somebody call the FBI!!The Bible also says that nonbelievers should be killed. So, they should worry about Muslims on the other side of the planet and ignore the hate being spewed at them by their neighbors?Yeah, it's all made up. Except for how it's totally [not all made up](http://www.motherjones.com/mojo/2015/11/anti-muslim-hate-crimes-rise).Well, I'm atheist, so yeah, I can get behind that. A rare that could probably sell for like $1000 on Ebay. 

I'm curious why you would vote for the GOP, though.So even though he's violent and an abuser, he doesn't fit the profile because he never used a knife? That doesn't even make any sense.The entire political debate in our nation has moved far to the right. Just because the Democrats are more left of the GOP, that doesn't make them actually to the left of center.No, it's math. I just heard on NPR that one of the victims was newly engaged to be married, and I remembered your earlier post. Found your comment and looked for more current information from you. 

I'm so sorry.  :(How is the GOP any more fiscally conservative than the Democrats? Both spend like crazy, but at least the Democrats try to pay for it.I see your point. 

As a female, when I am in a parking lot at night, I only worry about the males in my area. If I'm going to be raped, it's not by a woman. The extreme majority of males aren't rapists, but the extreme majority of rapists are males.All of the "evidence" against Jason Simpson is coincidental. But Christianity has hatred, bigotry, homophobia, and misogyny. Should all Christians also abandon their religion?Okay, but there's a difference between "There's evidence that hasn't been tested" and "the evidence points to Jason." Also, OJ Simpson is spending 30 years in prison for armed robbery and kidnapping. Jason Simpson is a free man. If Jason is so out of control, why isn't he in prison for other crimes, too?&gt; There is a mountain of physical evidence that was never tested, and all available evidence that was tested points towards Jason. 

There is no REAL evidence that points at Jason. All the evidence that points at Jason is circumstantial. I'm not saying the physical evidence available shouldn't be compared to Jason. I'm just saying that the evidence that points to Jason is 100% circumstantial.I'm an atheist, and I agree with you. If you don't feel like explaining what you mean, then why the fuck did you even comment?San Bernardino has 200,000 people living there. Why would you think it would only have one crime per day?I'm amazed that CNN is airing this about themselves. *Finally* somebody cares about us!So the only thing stopping a bad guy with a bomb is a good guy with a bomb. Got it!And that's why the left says there's a war on women. Guys just don't face the same scrutiny as women, at least not when it comes to unwed parentage.

Also note they want to ban pregnant students, but didn't say *unwed* and pregnant, just pregnant. Gee, I wonder why Black Lives Matter is a thing.Holy shitsnacks! ^^*how* ^^*do* ^^*you* ^^*know* ^^*that* ^^*about* ^^*me?*Filthy whores! We watched it because there was buzz, and we thought it was meh. Not as awful as typically scary movie blockbusters, but still not good.There's a wall in Pike Place Market in Seattle that's had a disgusting mass of chewed gum stuck on it. It's a cultural phenomenon, and it completely disgusts me.What in the holy hell are you talking about?I, too, know what it's like living the shadow of a massive metropolitan giant. I grew up in San Diego. The Matthew McConnaughey?The same way everyone hears "Coral" when Rick calls for Carl. He definitely doesn't say Coral, he says Caahrrl. But the internet is stupid. One person made a dumb and inaccurate joke, and now it's a thing.2001, attending SDSU. Get out of class at 1pm, have to be at work in 2 hours. Discover I have a flat tire. A nice young man changed it for me. I was a fattie at the time, so he wasn't doing it to get into my pants. He was just being a nice guy (which is way better than him changing my tire just to get into my pants).Actually, I was quietly mocking all the gun nuts who say "The only thing that can stop a bad guy with a gun is a good guy with a gun."Earlier, I commented that when I, a white female, am walking at night to my car or whatever, I only worry about the males in my area. I'm not going to get raped by a woman, I'm going to get raped by a man. So I keep track of where the men are, just in case.

Of course, the odds of me being raped by a stranger are minuscule. Almost as minuscule as my neighbor making bombs in his garage.Not pregnant *unwed* students, just pregnant students. Also, not guys about to become fathers, just gals about to become mothers. While I agree with you, what that's going to do is allow even more men to die in combat, as the women assume the less combat-oriented roles in the military. 

The real solution is to do away with registering for the draft completely. In this day and age, it's not like the government can't us and conscript us, anyway.Actually, it's very likely that drafting women will allow even more men into combat, as the women occupy the non-combat roles. &gt; The first judge to give a male rapist community service won't have their job for very long.

[Are you sure about that?](http://www.dallasnews.com/news/crime/headlines/20140501-judge-say-14-year-old-who-was-sexually-assault-wasn-t-the-victim-she-claimed-to-be.ece)

Also, did you just conflate punching someone with rape? He's arguing that making women and men register for the draft is applying a shittier standard to both genders. I mean, he's pretty clear what he means.What happens now if both parents are already in the military? NPR interviewed a woman in the Army who'd been in for 13 years. She was ecstatic about the decision to allow women to serve in combat, but she's sad since she feels like she missed her opportunity.Because women have been asking for this. It's really hard to rise through the ranks if you're not in a combat role. Since women weren't allowed in combat roles, it's been very difficult for them to make a career out of the military. Also, plenty of women want to fight for their country.Wow, you're such a victim. Actually, lots of [feminists think women should be just as draftable as men.](http://womensenews.org/story/military/130227/military-equality-in-her-view-includes-the-draft) These are the same people pushing for women to be allowed in combat, after all.

Of course, lots of people think *neither* gender should have to register for the draft. I fall into that category, despite being both a woman (which means it doesn't affect me) and too old to be drafted.Why would feminists fight to get women allowed into combat and then fight to have women excluded from the draft? Your position makes no sense. Edit: fixed typoTwo years ago, [59% of women thought women should be included in the draft](http://thehill.com/policy/defense/307047-poll-majority-of-americans-support-women-in-military-draft). Only 35% of male respondents want women to be drafted. So, it's not women preventing this from happening.The moment people saw Carl with [that flashlight and gun in the tombs of the prison](http://i.kinja-img.com/gawker-media/image/upload/s--HFKQjdei--/186iv3bovxythjpg.jpg), everyone knew he was a changed kid. And a badass.You should try punctuation, man. You have some good points, but it's really hard trying to figure out what you mean because of your lack of punctuation.Enjoy your victimhood. My arms are crossed! That means I'm obfuscating and you can't see me!!Also, that post *literally* has nothing to do with the draft. ~~It *really* is.~~

Oops, wrong person. 

And yeah, they cleaned it, but they're also going to let people add the gum back.It *really* is.&gt; Maybe the tarp will help when you run out of sunscreen.

*grabs your shirt front*

That can never happen! DO YOU HEAR ME! *That can never happen!I read the article, 

&gt;The Federal Government just granted Carson-Newman University a waiver that allows the school to ban gay students, unwed mothers, women who've had an abortion and **even students who may be pregnant.**

Are you saying I should have done additional research aside from reading the article?I really shouldn't have had to explain the joke, though. It was super-duper obvious.I'm an atheist, so I'm totally cool with that. :)Jesus, that's stupider than the [Boston Mooninite](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/2007_Boston_Mooninite_panic) thing.I read the entire article. Nowhere does it say only unwed pregnant women. If it's a shitty article, take it up with the dude who posted it.That's a really great point.Wait. Another user is yelling at me for *merely* reading the article and not doing additional research before posting, but *I'm* the one being a condescending dick?I read your post. You were whining that you didn't see any feminist groups fighting to be included in the draft. Hey, maybe post a better article instead of trolling the people in this thread who read *this* article. Which makes perfect sense for specialized roles.

Back in the day, I was friends with a little squirt of a dude. 5'6", weighed 145lbs soaking wet and with his clothes still on. Not athletic, not in outstanding physical shape, not bulked up and muscular. 

The dude was a Marine. A TOW gunner, in fact. Every hump he struggled to finish, but finish he did. How is he any better for the military than any of the female athletes in college or high school? I can name 10 females who, at the time, could run farther and faster than him and do more push-ups. Why? Because they were athletes, and he was not. They were taller than him, weighed more than him, and in better physical condition than him. 

*Why shouldn't* the Marine Corps accept women like that, when they're willing to accept men like that guy? Is the *average* female going to be in better shape than the *average* male? No. But they let in a less than average male while arguing that a better than average woman still wasn't good enough for a combat role.I used to be friends with a short dude. 5'6", 145lbs soaking wet. Skinny as a rail, not athletic in the least. He was a Marine TOW gunner. If he can make it in the Marines as infantry, so can any athletic woman. There's no sense in allowing that guy into the Marine Corps in a combat MOS and not allowing any female athlete to do the same. I'm not saying ALL women can make it, but all women should have the opportunity try, like my friend did. I knew a dozen women who could have outperformed in physically at that point. They were taller than him, stronger than him, in better physical condition. Why? Because they were athletes (not just athletic, but actual athletes). There's no reason to exclude a woman with 12 Varsity letters and then turn around and accept a Daniel Radcliffe type in her place.I knew a very short guy who basically had the physique of Daniel Radcliffe. He was a Marine, in an infantry MOS (TOW gunner). If he can make it, so can any athletic woman.I used to know a dude who was 5'6" with the physique of Daniel Radcliffe: very, very skinny. He was a Marine. He was not athletic in the least, and he barely made it through boot camp. Every year, he barely passed PT. He was a Marine through sheer grit and determination. If you'd feel more comfortable with that guy next to you than a [women like this](http://az.milesplit.com/files/az/09Trackphotos/637R8042.jpg), you've got some issues you need to work out. 

And that being said, for women getting into actual combat MOSes, they should have to pass the same physical requirements as men. Please keep in mind that when that happened, the extreme majority of Congress was male. So it wasn't females arguing against women in combat, it was men.&gt; Exceptions do not disprove the rule. Every time a post like this comes up, invariably there is somebody who says "hey but I know this one guy...". It's so predictable on Reddit. 

I'm not citing the exception that proves the rule. I'm saying that there's no reason that female athletes could serve well in combat roles. They already let physically substandard males serve, so they should have no problem with letting physically superior females into the same MOSes.

&gt;Finding, vetting, recruiting, training, and testing potential soldiers takes time, money and effort. And it makes no damn sense trying to sift through 100 female candidates to find the ten that maybe might be good enough to make the cut.

Do you not understand the military has requirements before they'll let you join ? It's not that hard to filter out the women who don't meet those entrance standards. Also, we're talking about a draft situation. Drafting millions of Americans takes time, effort, and mone anyway.Two years ago, [59% of women thought women should be included in the draft](http://thehill.com/policy/defense/307047-poll-majority-of-americans-support-women-in-military-draft). Only 35% of male respondents want women to be drafted. So, it's not women preventing this from happening.I knew a guy who basically had the physique and athletic prowess of Daniel Radcliffe (meaning, short, skinny, and not at all athletic). The guy was a Marine. If *he* can be a Marine, then so can any female athlete.Why? It's a massive organization, and it takes a lot of work to manage it. Why do people think CEOs of charities shouldn't be well compensated? &gt; Women who do this are of the lowest. 

Nah, actual rapists are probably lower."So many" means 2-8% of rape accusations. More rapes are never reported than False accusations are made.Reddit has a fairly misogynist mindset. 

Edit: For example, there's this gem right here in this thread: "[Women are inherently extremely self centered and demand the rights to do whatever they want without consequence](https://www.reddit.com/r/news/comments/3vk0yh/police_woman_lied_about_rape_near_iu_bloomington/cxoczdj)"

Edit 2: Another gem from the same guy: "[Turns out not a single one is capable of anything even resembling ethics, morality, or responsibility](https://www.reddit.com/r/news/comments/3vk0yh/police_woman_lied_about_rape_near_iu_bloomington/cxodnc9?context=3)."

Edit 3: So, I read through the posting history /u/FletcherReedAMA from just the last 24 hours. He's a massive misogynist. He absolutely despises women, and he really needs to get some counseling or he's going to spend his life being miserable.&gt; Are the ladies really breaking down the doors to be Infantry? 

Fuck yes they are. Women are the ones pushing to be allowed into combat roles, and men are the ones fighting against it.And how are we supposed to know that you're a "cool" cop who won't pull us over for going 5 over?That's awesome!

Also, not that WA has legalized marijuana, I feel like the odds of that happening were already diminished. Pot is super popular in every state, the other drugs, not nearly so much.Now you're splitting hairs.It upsets you? boo fucking hoo. Over 50% of rapes are never reported. No, assbutt. Because Reddit loves to shout to the skies every time a woman Falsely accuses a man, which is extremely rare, while ignoring shit like the backlog of rape kits to be tested and the number of rapes that just go unreported.Okay, dude, only 329 cases have been cleared by the Innocence Project. In the grand scheme of things, it's a very tiny number which is statistically too small to be relevant. It's also not a random subset of the convicted population, and there are orders of magnitude more rapes each year than there are murders. (The IP focuses on serious crimes.)

Also, you're conflating "incorrect eye witness" with "malicious False accusation." It's way more likely for a rape victim to be incorrect about her attacker than it is for a woman to completely fabricate a rape story in order to destroy the life of a guy. ALL eye witness testimony is flawed, not just rape.&gt; Women are inherently extremely self centered and demand the rights to do whatever they want without consequence

Dude, you've got issues if you actually believe that. And you're a misogynist. You're just as bad as those feminazis who say that all men are inherently rapists. Edit typo

Edit: So, this guys is a huge misogynist. Just read his post history from today. 

"[I actually hold them [women] to real standards. Turns out not a single one is capable of anything even resembling ethics, morality, or responsibility.](https://www.reddit.com/r/news/comments/3vk0yh/police_woman_lied_about_rape_near_iu_bloomington/cxodnc9)"

"[Women believe that being held responsible for their behaviors in any way, and not having the ability to do whatever they want is misogynistic](https://www.reddit.com/r/news/comments/3vk0yh/police_woman_lied_about_rape_near_iu_bloomington/cxocmsr)"

"[Women are inherently extremely self centered and demand the rights to do whatever they want without consequence, and many men are whipped into submission and without hesitating give them whatever they want](https://www.reddit.com/user/FletcherReedAMA)"

["Women are such worthless subhuman shit"](https://www.reddit.com/r/news/comments/3vk0yh/police_woman_lied_about_rape_near_iu_bloomington/cxofc2h)Nope, it was all of the big stations, [including Fox News](http://www.nytimes.com/2015/12/05/us/landlord-lets-reporters-into-san-bernardino-suspects-apartment.html).It was [all of them](http://www.nytimes.com/2015/12/05/us/landlord-lets-reporters-into-san-bernardino-suspects-apartment.html). Didn't MSNBC show him breaking the door open?I'm not saying it's not a problem. I'm saying it's a much, much smaller problem than Reddit thinks it is.I know 7 different people who were raped. 2 of them were adults when it happened, one a freshman in high school, and the other 4 were children raped by their father or grandfather. 2 of them were male. Guess how many reported it to the police? Zero. It's through polls we know the number of rapes that go unreported. I'm sure the number isn't perfect, but if I know of seven people who were raped and who didn't report it, it's got to be fairly prevalent. It looks like it's [8-10% where police believe no crime was actually committed](http://www.slate.com/articles/double_x/doublex/2014/09/False_rape_accusations_why_must_be_pretend_they_never_happen.html). That article also goes into why that figure may be erroneously high. 

And again, more rapes are just never reported than are False and malicious accusations. Yes, malicious accusations are a problem, but the scales of justice are woefully imbalance regarding rape, in general.I totally agree that both are issues that need to be resolved. But for some reason, Reddit likes to jump all over every single instance of a woman Falsely accusing a man of rape.You really need to see a counselor. You've got major issues regarding women, and they're not based in reality. I'm not kidding. You need help. 

Edit: I just went through your history. You absolutely hate women. You really need help. Yeah, that happens, but it's nowhere near as prevalent as unreported cases of rape. Like not even close.&gt; I have. Two confirmed that men are responsible for how women behave because women deserve whatever they want. A man who fails in any way gets what's coming to him.

Keep going. Your attitude isn't normal, or healthy. 

&gt;Not exactly. Do you hate a scorpion because it stings, or snake because it strikes? It's just what they do.

Women aren't scorpions or snakes. They're people, and every person is different. I don't judge all men based on the actions of a few, yet you judge all women based on your few interactions with them. 

&gt;And again, it's because of "men" like you who gladly jump to their defense. Notice how you ignored me calling you out and easily believing men are violent monsters but the thought of a woman lying is incomprehensible to you? You ignored it, because it contradicts your training to be of faithful service

I ignored it because I'm not a man and it was therefore irrelevant to the conversation.&gt; There are accusations of child abuse made by the mother against the father in 60% of the custody hearings where both Parents seek sole custody.

CITATION NEEDED

&gt;Look it up.

No, it's your assertion. Provide a citation.I have provided citations in this thread. 

And now I'd like your citation.From that article, 

&gt;In fact, as Emily Bazelon and Rachael Larimore wrote in Slate five years ago, official data on what law enforcement terms \u201cunfounded\u201d rape reports (that is, ones in which the police determine that no crime occurred) yield conflicting numbers, depending on local policies and procedures\u2014averaging 8 percent to 10 percent of all reported rapes.Yeah, there was a creepy older dude who used to picket my community college. Turns out, he had terminal cancer and wanted to "make a real and positive impact on the world before he died."&gt; The argument being made is that the purpose of guns is to kill, and this isn't really up for debate. That's the express purpose for which they were invented. Whether that's killing other people or animals for food doesn't matter, it's purpose is to kill...
&gt; 
&gt; 
&gt; 
&gt; ...well, to be pedantic, it's purpose is to move a metal object from point A to point B from a distance with sufficient force to do significant damage to a target object. But, I digress.

I like you! You have a good sense of humor and you convey information in a creative and entertaining way!I hope you're gay, because if you're straight, your life will be long, lonely, and painful.Yeah, because Germany embraced Nazism overnight. It sure wasn't a slow process that occurred over decades. /s"Aaand, uh, uh... SAN DIMAS HIGH SCHOOL FOOTBALL RULES!"

*thunderous applause*So, I've been posting here quite a bit. I've quoted /u/FletcherReedAMA several times for his misogyny. And of my posts that quote him have been downvoted like crazy. This is the guy who literally said, "[Women are such worthless subhuman shit](https://www.reddit.com/user/FletcherReedAMA)". I'm getting downvoted for pointing out this type of misogyny is quite prevalent on Reddit. Instead of convincing me I'm wrong, those downvotes are convincing me I'm right, because several people apparently agree with /u/FletcherReedAMA. 

So yeah, Reddit is a pretty misogynist place, and I sometimes wonder why I come here.No, but they rape people.Nope, I actually genuinely feel bad for you, because clearly you're an unhappy person. You're straight, and you hate women, and that means you'll spend the entirety of your life alone.I did no such thing. If you read his history, it's all bashing women. He absolutely despises women. All of them. Every single one. She *never* led Shane on. The moment Rick was back, she kicked Shane to the curb, in no uncertain terms. I think at one point she bluntly says, "I'm Rick's wife, and Carl is Rick's son, and this baby, even if it's yours, is Rick's." She was so very clear about Shane needing to GTFO. And then he tried to rape her at the CDC, and she had to claw his face to get him to back off.

And then at the end, the only reason she even tried to make amends with Shane is because Dale died. Dale died thinking the group was hopelessly broken. Rick's eulogy to Dale is essentially, we honor Dale's memory by unbreaking the group. And like 3 minutes later Lori approaches Shane to make amends. It's not Lori's fault Shane interpreted that as, "I should totally kill Rick."First of all, both Shane and Lori thought Rick was dead. It's only  natural they'd seek comfort in each others' arms. They're the only two who know what it's like to have lost Rick. Second of all, they were with that group since they got stuck on the highway. They've been with them for weeks at this point. &gt;  And supposedly Skyler was one of the most hated fictional characters on tv. Like, ever.

I never understood why. Walter was literally turning into a murderer and a drug kingpin, but it's Skylar we're supposed to hate? She's doing her best to make a sandwich out of the shit Walter keeps handing her, and of course she's failing. People just have no empathy, for some reason. I mean, they have tons of empathy for Walter, but not Skylar, even though she never murdered anyone or started them down this road to ruin.I think it might end with Rick dying and Carl taking up his ~~mantle~~ gun. And I'm telling you, they weren't strangers. Sam Witwer played the walker in the tank.Your comment makes no sense, because the Paris attackers used lots and lots of guns.Also the Planned Parenthood shooter was a terrorist.

Holy shitsnacks, I got downvoted for stating a fact. Not to mention, the victims in San Bernardino were the attacker's coworkers. That's super unusual. This attack wasn't a clear cut case of terrorism or workplace violence. It's both.Really? Because George W Bush's invasion of Iraq directly led to the formation of ISIS. As much as the Democrats may suck, they're not why ISIS exists today. That fault lies firmly on W.But the GOP are why ISIS exists. The Bush invaded Iraq under False pretenses and that directly led to destabilization of the entire Middle East, and led to the creation of ISIS. So why the fuck would you vote for the GOP?&gt; I thought he was rather more moderate on gun control, on account of being a senator from Vermont where his voting record was forced to be more moderate.

You're 100% correct.Apparently we still need to clean up Bush's fucking mess.So the law in CA actually helped save lives? Hunh.LOL, that's funny because she's a lesbo!

Grow the fuck up.Long before we knew anything about the shooters, I was calling it terrorism. Two people don't go into a place and murder 14 people for fun.You fuckers will never be happy.It was a really weird event, though. The guy shot up his work place, but he also brought his wife. He knew the people he killed, which is AFAIK, not the case with other acts of terror. And he got into an argument with his coworkers at that party and came back 30 minutes and killed all his coworkers with his wife. So, not really clear on what exactly was going on. I don't think there's anything wrong in waiting to see what the authorities glean from actual evidence.Uh, why? I only remember one Redditor going out of his way to defend the shooters. I did see a whole bunch of people say, "I hope this was Muslims!" though. I don't see how liberals have any reason to have their feet in their mouths about this.Yeah, fuck Obama for not reading his tea leaves 7 days ago and making an announcement about a terror attack that hadn't occurred yet!&gt; Perhaps if it was in a world as they knew it... but it wasn't. Their homes gone, family and friends dead - the world had ended. A few weeks isn't enough under those conditions. 

Uh, dipshit, that's exactly why they weren't strangers. These people had already been through the wringer together. They'd already had to fight to save each other. I'm not sure about that. I got into a flame war with him earlier today in /r/news, and he was posting very similar shit. The dude's fucked in the head. So first someone bitches that he's always a week late. Now you're bitching that it's too soon. Make up your minds.&gt; There was a gigantic outcry from public liberals, including the president, latching on to the concept that this was either a typical mass shooting, or an attack related to militant conservatives, well before the facts were known.

No, there wasn't. No, it doesn't make any sense, because the attackers in Paris used guns. &gt; They hadn't been through anything yet as a group,

They've been together as a group for over a month. Lori and Carl met Carol on Day +15, and Rick returns Day +60. You're telling me they experienced absolutely nothing in those 45 days?

Also, do you think people don't bond during times of crises? Why do you think the WWII miniseries was called Band of Brothers? HINT: They weren't actually brothers, they just bonded during the war through terrible shared experiences.Why are you carrying on with this dude? He's a piece of shit. He hates all women. There's no reasoning with him. Just walk away.Well you've clearly made up your mind that Obama is the worst president ever, so I'm out. That' a pretty common thing in religion. Why do you think Europe went to war with itself for decades? At one point, I think there were 3 different "official" Popes, and that's not even including all the different Protestant sects. England has a particularly bloody history regarding the Catholic/Protestant schism.Also, didn't the shooters try to modify their weapons so they'd be fully auto, and they fucked it up? How many more people would have died if he could have bought a full-auto weapon legally?Not this type of weird.Yeah, t hat's pretty bullshit. My CC has a mandatory E$10 printing fee that's attached to your account. You can use that money all quarter to print things off computers or make photo copies. Unfortunately, the printers are shit, and only black and white, so I think I've spent an entire $5 in the time I've been going here. So I'm out $10 a quarter for every quarter aside from the one quarter I went out of my way to use the printer in the library.It's because Shane was a dick to a little kid. There's a difference between letting Rick take back over as a father figure and being a dick to a little kid.[The Thirty Years' War.](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Thirty_Years'_War)&gt; Unless you were treating your partner like shit

Are you listening to what the guy is saying? He's gigantic asshole. No wonder he attracts assholes as potential mates. How does that saying go? "if everyone around you seems like an asshole, you're the asshole". &gt; a female without a tent

Is that... Is that a thing? Should I be worried? 

*looks around*&gt; People are happier with their own kind.

Nope, people will just latch onto some other bullshit reason to hate each other.Yep. Lends a bit of credibility to all those rape stores we keep hearing about our modern military.He used his nudity as a way to disarm the people he was talking to. If they were nonplussed, it'd be a lot easier for him to get what he wanted from them. Want to ruin your night? Go watch The Rabbit-Proof Fence.It's like when someone mixes up apart and a part. They mean literally the exact opposite thing. The ancient Celts used to go into battle nude to show how their manhood wasn't shrunk up inside the torso out of fear.Yeeeeah, I'm going to need a citation for that.They were a product of their time. Everyone agrees that the northern Abolitionists in America were right, but the odds are very high that every single one of them was still racist against blacks. [This](http://spartacus-educational.com/GERroehm.htm) has a pretty detailed account of Rohm's capture, and it doesn't say anything about that. So, citation, please.*shrug*

I don't think the Celts were particularly scientifically advanced for the era.I guess the other dude thinks coating yourself in garlic is easier than just taking a bath.Holy shitsnacks! Upvote not just for the Vercingetorix ref, but also for spelling his name correctly.Yep. You're probably right. Nice find.&gt; I feel like Daryl has grown tired of caring for others. He seems to have distanced himself from everyone, specially from Carol. He's become so sad, that his death would actually be a relief for him

I completely disagree. Daryl is the one who most feels the group should find more survivors. That's literally the exact opposite of withdrawing from people.I have a really hard time watching her scenes. Andrea wasn't a great character and she didn't have great writing, but Laurie Holden also really isn't a great actress. It's a trifecta of suck.I absolutely love 4b. I loved putting the pieces together of where everyone is in relation to everyone else. It takes place over a short amount of time, but it gave us the opportunity get to know Bob and Sasha and Tyreese, and of course we learn so much about Michonne! Also, hello, The Grove is fucking amazing. And, of course, "They're fucking with the wrong people."

5a is also fantastic. They did a fantastic job. I wasn't a fan of Beth's arc, but that's because I don't like Beth as she was pretty fucking useless. I mean, even Carl at 13 was more useful than Beth at 19. Anyway, we got to know Noah, who I thought was an awesome character. Overall, I think 4b onward have been some of the best TV out there.

Edit: I forgot about Carol's pyrotechnic awesomeness in 5.1. Holy shitsnacks!I was gonna downvote you for making a crack at Joe, but then I remember that the VP literally has no official job duties except for breaking a tie in the Senate.Well, Putin *is* a master propagandist. Why *wouldn't* we hold up a gigantic [CITATION NEEDED](https://upload.wikimedia.org/wikipedia/commons/thumb/3/31/Webcomic_xkcd_-_Wikipedian_protester.png/300px-Webcomic_xkcd_-_Wikipedian_protester.png) sign for everything he says?You gasoline, or natural gas? 

Also, oil is cheap because Saudi Arabia flooded the market. Nope. ISIS wouldn't exist without George W Bush deciding to have a little adventure in the desert.As a liberal, I agree with you on that shit. Either the TSA works, or it doesn't work. If it works, then the no fly list is a disgrace and should be scrapped. If it doesn't work, then the TSA is a disgrace and should be replaced with something that actually does work. The no fly list should not exist.Is that supposed to be a bad thing?I don't understand why you think that. It's way more likely they actually loved their kid and wanted her to be with her grandmother when shit went down. And they told the grandmother they were going to the doctor so she wouldn't rat them out. Right, and every Adam Smith is named after THE Adam Smith.You know the election would have happened before both this and Paris, right?Because McCain would have been awesome for 2.5 years until his heart gave out and Palin took over.The US sucks Saudi cock. I mean, we didn't deal with the Saudi after 9/11, and 14 of the hijackers were Saudis. Maybe he's just going to guard a mosque...Ever faced an army of Roman soldiers?Cool, I was hoping you were going to say something like that.Appa? Yip. Yip.He's a mad genius!MY CABBAGES!The DVD for Avatar was the last thing my dad gave me before he died unexpectedly 5 weeks later. Not even that very emotional connection could get me to keep Avatar. I took it to Half Price Books like, 3 years ago.But that was the point, though. Definitely watch the Fellowship commentary with the Hobbits. It's fucking hilarious!Yeah, [he did](https://upload.wikimedia.org/wikipedia/en/c/c5/Obiwan1.jpg). And holy shitsnacks, is he gorgeous!And for me it's Superman Returns. I think Brandon Routh absolutely nailed Christopher Reeve's Superman.I actually really like Reloaded. The music is fucking amazing, and that chase scene literally had me on the edge of my seat.It was hysterical to see the Americans fleeing across the Rio Grande into Mexico. The entire theater erupted in laughter, and we were in San Diego so you know half the audience was Mexican.Everybody loves Empire of the Sun. It's fucking amazing. I think I've seen it a good 20 times. While I agree it sucks they didn't put that in, Miranda Richardson was *fucking amazing* as Rita Skeeter.For me, it's the fact that [SPOILER](#s "Harry's death conferred onto everyone he cared about the same protections his mother's death conferred to him. Voldemort was literally unable to harm anyone fighting against him, because Harry chose to die.") And that wasn't mentioned at all in the movie, and a lot of people missed it in the book as well.There is definitely something very endearing about him doing that. The wand chooses the wizard, and in this case, the wizard chose that wand.Wow. I had no idea!And? Being POTUS ages you, and he was already old as fuck (72) in 2008.Palin is a complete fucking idiot. As imperfect as Obama has been, he's not an idiot. Sarah Palin couldn't negotiate her out of a wet paper bag.The vast majority of what the TSA does is security theater. I don't feel any more safe or any less safe because of them. I sure hate flying more, though.

Also, unlike everyone in this thread, I actually don't think Obama has been a terrible president. I voted for him twice. The people here bitch about him for not using the exact phrase "radical Islamic terrorism" and for not saying it 2 seconds after he heard about the shooting. Meanwhile, they're as silent as mimes about how Bush's adventure in the desert helped create ISIS. I'll take a president who waits for the facts to come in before making a statement over a president who completely destabilized an an entire region for no good reason any day of the week.Thanks. My life has a new normal now, so it's alright. Literally the same could be said about any job. Musicians aren't special snowflakes who can only succeed if they're passionate about their work. There's a lot of design that goes into successful music. There's a lot of technical stuff she may enjoy that does evoke an emotional response in here, even if the performance part doesn't. 

In short, she's earning a living and she apparently likes well enough what she does. Not sure why that's a big deal.*hem hem*&gt; The one thing Putin has said repeatedly is that countries need to be autonomous and shouldn't have to bend to the will of one super power without agreeing to it.

Except the nations that Russia wants to control. Did you forget that shit in Ukraine already?Not every Joshua is named after Jesus.Nowhere did I say we should have invaded Saudi Arabia. But if hadn't had an oil man in the White House on 9/11, I bet we'd have invested a shit ton of more money into renewable energy. We don't need to invade SA, we just need to stop depending on them for our energy needs. Actually, it wasn't ready-made. [He tried to modify it illegally to become full auto, and failed](http://www.latimes.com/local/lanow/la-me-ln-san-bernardino-shooters-illegal-modify-rifle-20151204-story.html).

What I'm saying is, that federal gun control law probably saved a lot of lives that day. But of course Reddit isn't talking about that. They're talking about what the proper definition of an assault rifle is.Like military personnel at military bases.

Wait. 

*holds up index finger, then walks away*&gt; California's gun laws have proven ineffective

Except the shooter last week tried to illegally modify his gun to make it full auto. He fucked it up so it *wasn't* full auto, so it's very likely that gun control law saved lives. You're more likely to die because you were an irresponsible gun owner than you are to die by the hand of a terrorist. Oh, a fellow cocaine enthusiast!

(Not really, just an Archer joke)Citation needed 

Edit: LOL, just seconds after posting this asking for a citation, I've got a downvote. Way to go, Reddit!Look, I'm pretty open to the idea of legalizing drugs, but don't we know that Afghanistan is the source of most heroin these days? &gt; But if that guy really was scared to speak up for fear of being branded a racist, that's pretty awful too.

Except he was probably only worried *because* of the race of his neighbors. How many white Americans have garage workshops, have friends over on a regular basis, and receive a lot of packages? A whole fuckton of us. But nosy neighbors don't call the FBI on us because we don't fit that negative stereotype.There's a difference between that and being brown and receiving a bunch of packages and having a garage workshop. I've gotten like 15 packages in the last 2 weeks because of the holiday season. I guess someone should call the FBI because I might be a terrorist. Oh, wait, I'm a white atheist, so that doesn't fit the narrative.

The only reason that neighbor was suspicious is because those people were brown and not white.Because the suspicious behavior isn't suspicious at all if you're white. Getting a lot of packages, having friends over, and doing a lot of work in a garage workshop are all perfectly normal things that tens of millions of Americans do. The only reason the neighbor was worried is because of the ethnicities of the people involved. Just because he was right, that doesn't mean he wasn't suspicious due to the wrong reasons.Meanwhile, in [Texas](http://thescoopblog.dallasnews.com/2015/11/armed-protesters-set-up-outside-islamic-center-of-irving.html/) 2 weeks ago...

911: 911 what is your emergency?

Caller: There are a dozen white men walking around a Mosque with guns.

911: What are they doing?

Caller: They are looking really aggressive.

911: Stand down, citizen. Those are just Patriotic Americans doing their civic duty protecting you from those radicalized Muslims in your neighborhood. 
And? Military personnel, even unarmed, are the least soft target possible.

Edit: Oh my god, people, military personnel aren't soft targets that won't fight back.Again, it was only suspicious because they're not white. And my point is that if we'd invested a trillion dollars into renewable energy research 14 years ago, we'd have made a shit ton of progress towards making a world not reliant on Saudi Arabia's oil.Yep, I've been downvoted twice for that comment, even though my statement factually correct.I understand how full auto works. I need a citation from you that shows full auto isn't deadlier than semi-auto. It's your assertion, back it up with a citation.Did he? Is there a citation? Because I don't remember any of that, and I was an established adult on 9/11.And? It's an example of a gun law working.And? Military personnel are as far away from "soft targets" as you can get.Downvotes for your overusage of **bold** formatting.&gt; It is easier for the GOP to sit back and just attack everything he does without actually having to stake out a position yourself.

And that's even easier than actively blocking everything Obama tries to do to fix shit.The far Right will still blame Obama, but nothing Obama could ever do would meet their approval. Meanwhile, the rest of us with brains will see that the GOP once again obstructed Obama getting anything done.Where the fuck do you live that your rent is less than your taxes?I lot of us wanted single payer, but we were called socialists. So then we asked for a public option, and again we were called socialists. Over the summer during a heat wave, there was knock at my door. It was an animal control officer, and for a split second I was worried. Then I came to my sense, because I am a white, middle class woman in a middle class neighborhood. I felt stupid for being afraid, even for just a split second. 

And in that moment I made a conscious decision to not let the shit the media spews at us make me afraid. 

And in case anyone was wondering, a neighbor had left his two dogs in his car with the windows rolled up.Except wealth disparity is the root of many of America's problems, while 9/11 isn't.I find that pretty hard to believe, honestly.Really, [they're not helping at all?](https://www.washingtonpost.com/world/national-security/shia-muslims-hold-antiterrorism-rally-in-washington/2015/12/06/03b2bf80-9c81-11e5-8728-1af6af208198_story.html)

Turnbob said, "They target those who can't fight back." Military personnel are the least likely target to not fight back.Then I ignore everything you have to say on the subject. Want me to listen to you? Provide citations. Otherwise I'll think you're just spewing bullshit because you have an agenda.Oh wow, like, how about I cite all of reality for you? Sure, but that doesn't go against the assertion that terrorists are drug manufacturers. How much money do you make? I'm guessing based on the raw dollar amount, it's well over $100k. Our combined income last year was about $75k, and we paid half your amount in taxes (~$5k). And for the record, we pay close to $18k in rent each year in our suburb of a suburb of Seattle, which is obviously more than three times as much as we paid in federal income tax. 

So, you're well off and bitching about your tax rate.

Edit: So, this guy has made other comments since I posted this, and he hasn't replied to me. That tells me that he does in fact made a lot of money, and he is in fact bitching about his higher tax rate. Then why the fuck even reply to me?Huh, TIL the military is considered soft targets and not likely to fight back in an attack.And? The law helped.I'm done. He said they attack people who can't fight back. That doesn't describe the military, because their job is to literally fight people.I do so long as his running mate isn't a retard like Sarah Palin. And then the Right yells about Obama leading from behind.Do you REALLY need proof that 9/11 was less harmful to America than decades of growing wealth disparity?Haha, RIGHT!?That's actually a remarkably wise point of view.No no no. Hate leads to *suffering*. Right?! You just get swiftboated. 

Oh. That's the link you posted.Yeah, this is the"news" channel that has felon Ollie North as a commentator.Aka a huge idiot.Holy shit, that's really fucked up.Remember when we did that after 9/11? It worked out so well for us, too..."Obama had nothing to do with that. It was Seal Team Six."Dozens of laws? Wow, in 7 years? AMAZING!Right, because men never murder their children. 

Except, you know, all the fucking time. [Here's a particularly horrifying case.](http://www.cnn.com/2012/02/05/us/washington-powell-explosion/)Are you implying that males *aren't* overwhelmingly the gender that rapes? I mean, that's the correlation you're trying to make, right, since you mentioned teaching [gender] to not [crime]?Living people have faired very poorly on this show. The odds of medical personnel being alive due to their skills are higher than the odds of regular joes being alive.I couldn't stand Beth. She was fucking useless. Even Carl at age 13 was more useful than Beth. Who did Rick turn to when the prison was overrun with talkers and everyone was sick? Not Beth, the 19-year-old. He turned to his junior-aged son. He was definitely a tragic character. He was the Rick of that group, only this time he actually got murdered by his Shane.&gt; He refused to let Shane die even though it was apparent that it was impossible for them both to escape, and hence save Carl.

Nah, Shane was just an idiot. He didn't need to kill Otis to escape, and he certainly didn't need to be so cold blooded and shoot him in the fucking leg. They were a good 25' ahead of the walkers. All they had to do was conserve their ammo and keep up the pace. Shane fucked up. Again.Why shouldn't he be? Especially to the other teenaged boy in the group who's never even so much as held a gun?"Look, I get it. My dad killed your dad. But you need to understand: Your dad was an asshole."

And Carl's voice is just dripping with condescension and impatience. Also, his "So was yours" response to Ron's "Your dad is a killer" and of course the "I KNOW! Now give me the gun!"Is that a rule? I'm pretty sure that's not a rule.It doesn't matter.Other diseases still exist.Is it profiling to understand that 90% of rapists are male? Call me when 90% of child murderers are women.Call me when [race] commits 90% of [crime].Well, except for that one dude in San Diego...How exactly do you pronounce "fuckkkkk"? Fuck-k-k-k-k like it's a staccato?Yeah, all those idiots posting that "copyrights notification" bullshit facebook annoy the crap out of me.Yeah, but she's literally trying to stay alive. She thinks she's the last Stark.Thank you! You're the first person I've ever seen who also had this complaint. When my husband and I watched this episode, I facepalmed and then yelled at the TV, "Prokaryotic life needs to be tiny because it depends on diffusion to obtain nutrients!" 

That was the last episode of Doctor Who I watched.Did you know that eggs don't gain mass as the fetus gestates? Aside from some gasses, eggs are pretty much a closed system, and the fetus relies on the contents of the yolk for nutrients to grow. But that writer didn't know that. I lost track of the facepalms that episode. That was also the last episode of Doctor Who I watched. I say that and I'm literally wearing a Doctor Who shirt right now, and I have 10th Doctor poster hanging up 18" from my monitor. :(

Edit: And now I'm wearing my Doctor Who pajama bottoms. My husband and I watched the first two episodes of Mad Men and we had to stop. Every single character on that show is a total asshole."And I save people." Fucking *ugh*. I much prefer emo "I killed my entire species" Doctor.It doesn't matter what it was supposed to be, because it absoultely failed in every way. It's like the writer googled "bacteria" and found the Wikipedia article and said, "Oh, it's prokaryotic" without understanding what that means. Also, eggs don't gain mass as the fetus gestates. All the mass is already in the egg. That's actually the whole fucking point of an egg. And then the space dragon laid an egg 2 seconds after hatching, magically recreating the moon! YAY!Yeeeeah, it was. But, I'm a science nerd.Yep, I stopped there, too. And I'm right now wearing a DW shirt and I have a 10th Doctor poster hanging up in my office. I think I'm out until someone else takes over as showrunner. Joff is definitely an evil little fuck. Oh my god, are you facebook friends with my aunt?? I shit you not, she literally used those words when I told her it wouldn't work.&gt; EDIT: Your god is pleased by this offering of gold.

This is definitely the best ever "obligatory thanks for the gold kind stranger" post.So, like what are your Domains? What's your favored weapon?Shane's an attempted rapist. I have no problem with Lori telling Shane to stay the fuck away."But above all they desire *power*" with her voice dripping with distaste and condescension on that last word. Fucking brilliant!INSTEAD OF A DARK LORD YOU WOULD HAVE A QUEEN!Fucking perfect!My brother and my niece did that pledge. 

*makes awkward Kermit the Frog face*At least the dogs don't post political bullshit.The best bumper sticker I ever saw read: 

SUPPORT OUR TROOPS

BRING THEM HOMESo, uh, my 45-year-old brother just started dating an 18-year-old girl. :SDon't you think she looks tired?At my school in San Diego, we sang This Land is My Land every Friday.When my dad was 25, he wrecked his motorcycle. He slid on his face across an intersection and slammed into the tires of a big rig. His right ankle was shattered, but although his bubble helmet was scratched to shit, his face was fine. That helmet literally saved his life, and if he'd died, me and my brother wouldn't have been born.  

Wear your helmet, folks. Nope, the only thing that grants all the benefits of marriage is marriage. I don't even smoke, and yet I still feel freer. It must be a contact high from my neighbor. I'm not kidding. He/she lights up every evening, and his/her wifi network is named FlyingHigh. But I totally don't mind.Two days ago, a Redditor told me that I'm a beta male who's been brainwashed into doing everything women tell me to do simply because I told him he was misogynist for saying all sorts of misogynist things. I'm not exaggerating, this guy said shit like, "All women cheat." and "Again, I get it, you're a woman, you are too primitive to understand the concept of morality, integrity etc" and "Again, it is impossible for a woman to give a shit about a man beyond his direct and immediate usefulness." and "Again, you are a woman, you do not have the mental capacity to understand anything beyond "am I being benefitted?"" (These aren't what I read the other day. These are things he said on Reddit *today*. All the guy does is complain about how awful women are.)

The best part is I'm a woman, and it *really* pissed him off when I told him so. 

The worst part is he was upvoted several times by other assholes. Reddit can really suck sometimes.That realization in my teens was a huge step on my path to atheism."Those of you who publicly play music **off your phone speaker**: why?"*Classic* part_time_nerd.Years ago, my asshole downstairs neighbors were blasting some bass-y hip hop, which was a pretty frequent occurrence. I went downstairs and kindly asked them to turn it down, because it was loud as fuck. They said okay, but then didn't actually do it. So I popped in Master of Puppets, pointed my speakers at the floor, and cranked that shit up. I played one song, hit pause and listened, and happily turned my stereo off. I never really had a problem with them again.Motherfuckin' bagpipes.Yeah, teenagers are assholes.You know, kudos to the first person to join in. They turned a shit situation around into something totally awesome.Looks like I meet all the class requirements, including the Pathfinder thing. Where do I sign up, oh Smart-Alecky one? 

*averts eyes, oh Lord*&gt; Carl was literally right next to his father when the fence fell and later found him when the Governor steamrolled the place.

But Carl was only "literally right next to his father when the fence fell" because Rick had gone to get a pubescent boy to do manual labor instead of an adult female.  If anything, Rick should have gotten both Beth and Carl.

Beth was useless. At least Lori washed clothes and cooked. Beth just sang.&gt; her refusal to become jaded

Whaaaaaat? This is the girl who tried to kill herself in the beginning of S2. This is the girl who didn't give a fuck that her boyfriend died. She was *super* jaded.I think they have to settle and find a place they can make into a home before that can happen.Cool, I'm Neutral Good, so that's only one step away, so it's perfect!It made a huge impression on me and I was an adult!I can't stand Clara, though.I understand that people do bad things. But *of course* not every person is a bad person. This guy thinks all women are bad. Regardless of his life experiences, that's a fucking stupid thing to think. IMO, he's even worse than racists, because he made this decision off 7 bad relationships he had (never once considering he's part of the problem). SO he's judge half the world's population based on 7 women.Washington State has a Running Start program that allows kids as young as 16 to take college courses. And "gun carrier" isn't a protected class.Why the hell are you being downvoted for obvious sarcasm?2 or 3??? Holy shit, STOP THE PRESSES! CALL IN THE NATIONAL GUARD!It's pretty hard to row a dinghy from North Africa to Maine.&gt; It was simultaneously pretentious and ignorant

That's what pretentious means. 

"attempting to impress by affecting greater importance, talent, culture, etc., than is actually possessed."I agree completely with that. Reddit loves the concept of armed civilians defending masses of students against crazed gunmen, but the odd of that happening are slim. Remember how the two assholes who shot up that Walmart killed a concealed carrier? CC is not the solution.Please name one CA college in a rural area.So he did nothing. Just like what the vast majority of carriers would do. And there's nothing wrong with that.I actually said the very same thing in [nother post hours ago](https://www.reddit.com/r/news/comments/3oaeni/gov_jerry_brown_bans_concealed_guns_on_california/cvvxxp6). There's no reason we should expect concealed carriers to be our saviors. Most people who CC do it for their own safety, not so they can get into a shootout with a crazy dude.It was a toy.Uh, every single UC school you named is in a city. I just had a guy tell me it wasn't a toy gun because it looked a lot like a real gun. *shakes head*I'm just going to say this as gently as possibly: You really have no clue what you're talking about. San Diego is home to the bulk of the Pacific Fleet, and houses the HQ for the Naval Air Force and Air Force Pacific. It also has the Naval Special Warfare Center. You know. the Navy SEALS. In addition, the bulk of the Navy's helicopter fleet is stationed in SD. As for the Marines, SD is home to both Camp Pendleton (with 42000 active duty personnel at any given moment) and MCRD (the place where they train new Marines on the west coast). 

There is no reason any invading alien fleet would attack LA and not San Diego. I'm not saying don't attack LA. I'm saying it's stupid that the aliens never attack San Diego. One of the reasons I like Battle: Los Angeles is they explicitly state that San Diego was already attacked and neutralized.Now you know how all women feel at night on campus. Really? You don't think women walk to their cars at night with their ignition key in their fist, *just in case*? You don't think women always park under the street light? You don't think women are keenly aware of their surroundings when walking to their cars at night? You must be a guy. Actually, you must be a pretty self-centered and oblivious guy, because I know plenty of guys who completely understand why women take such safety precautions at night. 

Oh, wait. [You're the same dude who told me that Tamir Rice's toy gun wasn't a toy.](https://www.reddit.com/r/news/comments/3oaexa/tamir_rice_shooting_was_tragic_but_reasonable/cvw0ckt) Based on the comments you've made just today, I'm guessing you're more than a little bit racist against black people and possibly Muslims. You post a lot in /r/TumblrInAction, so I'm guessing you're a guy looking to be outraged that other people have reasons to be angry.What the fuck does Trump have to do with this????&gt; you have never met some oncology terrorists who have to be validated as right.

YOu had me until you threw the word "Terrorist" out there. Why'd you have to go and do that? It casts doubt on your entire argument by making you look like a reactionary fool.He can't. For him to acknowledge the inherent racism against blacks in America would require him to acknowledge that he's part of the problem. Potato breadHaha NOICE!Not NJ, NYC. Seriously, I have visited numerous cities in the US, and only in NYC were the majority of people I encountered assholes. I even know a native New Yorker who once told me he intentionally sends tourists off in the wrong direction, because "If they're too stupid to know how to use a grid, they deserve to be lost." &gt; New Jersey is the most population dense state in the country. This is despite being in the bottom 5 of square miles (so least amount of land).

Uh, the reason why NJ is has the greatest population density is *because* of its small land mass, not despite.It might explain some stuff.Stephen Maturin and Jack Aubrey.Not women.I did see the map. It's not labeled "rural" and "urban." You're going to have to do better than that.&gt;  I think that was one of the main issues with Shane.

Shane was downright fucked in the head. He zoomed past that line you can't cross and retain your humanity, and he did early in S2. Rick still isn't where Shane was then, and Rick has bitten out a guy's throat.Go back to Storm Front, jackass.Dr. Bhamba: This is all my fault. I knew there was a problem with the pasta sauce, but I did not notify my superiors because, well, I'm a drug addict. My goodness, how I love the drugs. I would take them in my house. I would take them with a mouse.

Veronica: With a mouse, people. Now that's rock bottomIf that was True, then please explain all those Mormons in Utah donating millions to help get Prop 8 passed in California.And by "no expiration date" we mean it's happy just hanging around as it is and it won't react with anything or decay into something else.By "blowing some up" do you mean the walkers?Right?!?

The scary thing is, a few people have upvoted that guy, which means he's not the only one who's all Archer regarding helium. Exactly. He didn't NEED to kill Otis, he just couldn't figure out another way.  If you watch that scene again, you can see they're a good 20-25 feet away from the walkers. All they had to do was keep moving. Also, they kept taking potshots at the walkers. You know, the ones that were 20 feet away at worst. They should have saved their rounds and kept going, only shooting when they absolutely had to. 

Shane made a really bad decision that day, and I think he knew it. The broke when he shot Otis, and he never recovered. Between that and his obsession with Lori undid him. 

And I also don't believe that Rick would ever shoot an innocent person like that just so he could escape. Rick doesn't think that way. Rick may be the kind of dude to who breaks another dude's neck because that other dude is screaming about getting half is face eaten off. But that dude was already going to die, and he was going to get the rest of them killed, to. Rick *still* just doesn't kill people for fun and games.Okay. The way you phrased it made it sound like you wanted to blow up the helium. That's why you got downvotes.That would be radioactive decay, so, no.What's your point? Do you REALLY think white men never rape black women? And why are you even bringing race up in the first point? I didn't say anything at all about race. 

Based on the posts you've created since you made this account yesterday, I'm going to operate on the assumption that you're a conservative racist. If it walks like a duck and quacks like a duck, it must be a duck.Oh, it would be. Remember Carol blowing up Terminus? Yeeeeaaaaah!When I was a kid (1980s), we got to wear costumes, but it was a totally normal school day otherwise.It's actually the opposite of political correctness. It's because so many dick parents don't let their kids dress up and participate because Satan that the school district felt that it was unfair to those kids to continue. It's an example of one small group ruining a good thing for everyone. It's not just JWs, it's Christian fundamentalists. My cousin's stepfather refused to let her participate in Halloween when she was a kid because Jesus. And it wasn't just that she didn't get to participate, she had to watch her classmates participate. Imagine if you were the only kid not allowed to participate in Christmas, but you still had to sit around and watch the other kids eat candy, sing carols, and open presents. Her mom eventually let her just stay home from school on those days. 

And then fast forward a half a dozen years, and her stepfather absolutely allowed her little brother to participate in Halloween. It was just *Erin* who wasn't allowed, because her stepf